Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0230.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11. (1) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, there is appropriated for the public schools of this state and certain other state purposes relating to education the sum of $17,769,551,300.00 $17,688,951,300.00 from the state school aid fund, the sum of $78,830,600.00 from the general fund, an amount not to exceed $41,000,000.00 from the community district education trust fund created under section 12 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.262, an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00 from the school transportation fund created under section 22k, an amount not to exceed $71,000,000.00 from the enrollment stabilization fund created under section 29, an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 from the school meals reserve fund created under section 30e, an amount not to exceed $18,000,000.00 from the great start readiness program reserve fund created under section 32e, an amount not to exceed $334,100,000.00 from the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund created under section 147b, and an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship public provider fund created in section 27d. For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, there is appropriated for the public schools of this state and certain other state purposes relating to education the sum of $19,017,010,000.00 from the state school aid fund and the sum of $83,876,100.00 from the general fund. In addition, all available federal funds are only appropriated as allocated in this article for the fiscal year years ending September 30, 2025 and September 30, 2026. (2) The appropriations under this section are allocated as provided in this article. Money appropriated under this section from the general fund must be expended to fund the purposes of this article before the expenditure of money appropriated under this section from the state school aid fund. (3) Any general fund allocations under this article that are not expended by the end of the fiscal year are transferred to the school aid stabilization fund created under section 11a. Sec. 11j. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $23,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for payments to the school loan bond redemption fund in the department of treasury on behalf of districts and intermediate districts. Notwithstanding section 296 or any other provision of this act, funds allocated under this section are not subject to proration and must be paid in full. Sec. 11m. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 $5,000,000.00 for fiscal year cash-flow borrowing costs solely related to the state school aid fund established under section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Sec. 11s. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $5,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 and from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $3,075,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purpose of providing services and programs to children who reside within the boundaries of a district with the majority of its territory located within the boundaries of a city for which an executive proclamation of emergency concerning drinking water is issued in the current or immediately preceding 9 10 fiscal years under the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421, and that has at least 4,500 pupils in membership for the 2016-2017 fiscal year or has at least 2,700 2,600 pupils in membership for a fiscal year after 2016-2017. (2) From the general fund money allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated to a district with the majority of its territory located within the boundaries of a city for which an executive proclamation of emergency concerning drinking water is issued in the current or immediately preceding 9 10 fiscal years under the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421, and that has at least 4,500 pupils in membership for the 2016-2017 fiscal year or has at least 2,700 2,600 pupils in membership for a fiscal year after 2016-2017, an amount not to exceed $2,425,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purpose of employing school nurses, classroom aides, school social workers, and community health workers; for the provision of behavioral or mental health supports, parental engagement activities, community coordination activities, and other support services; and for purchasing program supplies. The district shall provide a report to the department in a form, manner, and frequency prescribed by the department. The department shall provide a copy of that report to the governor, the house and senate school aid subcommittees, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director within 5 days after receipt. The report must provide at least the following information: (a) How many personnel were hired using the funds allocated under this subsection. (b) A description of the services provided to pupils by those personnel. (c) How many pupils received each type of service identified in subdivision (b). (d) Any other information the department considers necessary to ensure that the children described in subsection (1) received appropriate levels and types of services. (3) For 2024-2025, 2025-2026, from the general fund money allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $650,000.00 for nutritional services to children described in subsection (1). (4) For 2024-2025, 2025-2026, from the state school aid fund money allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 to an intermediate district that has a constituent district described in subsection (2) for interventions and supports for students in grades K to 12 who were impacted by an executive proclamation of emergency described in subsection (1) concerning drinking water. Funds under this subsection must be used for behavioral supports, social workers, counselors, psychologists, nursing services, including, but not limited to, vision and hearing services, transportation services, parental engagement, community coordination, and other support services. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 12d. (1) From the school consolidation and infrastructure fund created under section 11x, there is allocated for 2023-2024 only an amount not to exceed $110,000,000.00 for the purposes of this section. (2) From the amount allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $75,000,000.00 for grants to districts and intermediate districts to support costs related to internal consolidation within the district or intermediate district. All of the following apply to grants under this subsection: (a) The department shall allow grants for applicants that have already taken actions for internal consolidation within the previous 2 years and grants for applicants that have not yet begun internal consolidation activities. (b) The department shall prioritize applications from districts and intermediate districts that meet any of the following criteria: (i) Are in an opportunity index band, as described in section 31a, of 3 or higher. (ii) Are an intermediate district for which the percentage of pupils in membership who were determined to be economically disadvantaged in the immediately preceding fiscal year is equal to or greater than the minimum percentage for a district or public school academy to be in an opportunity index band, as described in section 31a, of 3 or higher. (i) (iii) Are experiencing declining enrollment. (ii) (iv) Have no ability to issue bonds for infrastructure needs, or have made a good-faith effort, as determined by the department, to issue bonds for infrastructure needs. (c) Grants may be used for operational expenses related to internal consolidation and for infrastructure needs. Infrastructure needs may include, but are not limited to, the removal of buildings. (3) From the amount allocated in subsection (1), $35,000,000.00 is allocated as follows: (a) $15,000,000.00 to Detroit Public Schools Community District to support the construction of the Cooley High School athletic complex. (b) $10,000,000.00 to Wayne RESA to support the construction of an academic and professional building in the city of Wayne. (c) $5,000,000.00 to Beecher Community School District to support the construction of a high school in the district. (d) $4,000,000.00 to Taylor School District for costs related to a new high school in the district. (e) $1,000,000.00 to the School District of the City of Hamtramck to support the costs of building infrastructure upgrades and maintenance. (4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 16. (1) This section applies to districts with support category buildings. Districts must comply with this section using funding made available to the district under sections 22b and 31a. (2) A district described in this section shall allocate not less than 10% of available targeted student support dollars for targeted student interventions and supports as described in section 16a for students enrolled in support category buildings. The targeted student interventions and supports must be used in a way that addresses the goals outlined in the district's Michigan Integrated Continuous Improvement Process (MICIP) plan. The district shall ensure that the operation of this section supplements, rather than supplants, the amount of per-pupil funding allocated to support category building in the immediately preceding fiscal year. To demonstrate compliance with this section, the district shall provide documentation in a form and manner, and on a timeline determined by, the Michigan School Turnaround Hub established in section 16c to the intermediate district in which the district is located or an agent of the intermediate district in which the district is located. (3) Districts described in this section shall provide information regarding spending under subsection (2) to the Michigan School Turnaround Hub. Districts shall provide all the information necessary for the Michigan School Turnaround Hub to make updates to the list of eligible targeted student interventions and supports described in section 16a. (4) By not later than 4 weeks after the start of the school year, a district shall provide notification to the parents and legal guardians of students enrolled in support category buildings about available targeted student interventions and supports. (5) By not later than August 31 of each year, a district described in this section shall provide an annual report to parents and legal guardians through mail, email, and a posting on the district's website that summarizes, at a minimum, the services provided with expenditures under subsection (2) in the immediately preceding school year, the amount spent on those services in that school year, and contact information or other methods to enroll students in similar services in the current school year. (6) A district described in this section shall furnish any information necessary to ensure that the district is in compliance with the spending requirements to the following entities: (a) The intermediate district in which the district is located or an agent of the intermediate district in which the district is located. (b) The department. (7) If an intermediate district, the agent of an intermediate district, or the state determines that a district described in this section is out of compliance with this section, the department may seek to recapture up to 10% of available targeted student support dollars awarded to the district. (8) The operation of this section must not reduce or delay the release of any funding for constitutional obligations of this state. The department shall continue to release funding allocated to districts under sections 22b and 31a(3) beginning in October of each fiscal year. (9) As used in this section: (a) "Available targeted student support dollars" means the sum of the following: (i) The resulting quotient of the total amount received by the district from allocations under section 22b divided by the total number of pupils enrolled in the district multiplied by the number of pupils enrolled in support category buildings. (ii) The resulting quotient of the total amount received by the district from allocations under section 31a(3) divided by the total number of pupils determined to be economically disadvantaged for the purposes of section 31a multiplied by the number of pupils determined to be economically disadvantaged for the purposes of section 31a who are enrolled in support category buildings. (b) "Support category buildings" means school buildings identified by the state accountability system as comprehensive support and improvement schools, additional targeted support schools, or targeted support and improvement schools. (c) "Targeted student interventions and supports" means items included in the MiStrategyBank described in section 16a. Sec. 16a. (1) The MiStrategyBank must be updated and maintained by the Michigan School Turnaround Hub established in section 16c to comply with this section. (2) Items within the MiStrategyBank must consist of tutoring programs including, but not limited to, those created by for-profit vendors, nonprofit vendors, intermediate districts, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind, that are aligned with high-impact tutoring standards and include all of the following criteria: (a) Tutoring is provided in groups of 4 or fewer students. (b) The tutor or tutors provide consistent service to students throughout the school year. (c) Tutoring is provided a minimum of 3 times per week for at least 20 to 30 minutes per session. (d) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, tutoring is implemented throughout the school day. Tutoring that is part of a before- or after-school program may be approved if the tutoring meets the other criteria described in this subsection. (e) Trained tutors provide the tutoring. Trained tutors may include teachers, paraprofessionals, community providers, AmeriCorps members, or other individuals who have received training. (f) The program uses a high-quality curriculum that uses research-based strategies that are aligned with state academic standards. (g) Tutoring is data-driven and includes the use of formative assessments and student progress measures that meet the criteria in subdivision (h). (h) Progress monitoring is part of the tutoring program, and uses curriculum-based measures that include all of the following: (i) Identification of a valid, reliable progress monitoring assessment tool that is curriculum-based. (ii) Implementation of standardized procedures for collecting data. (iii) Standardized repeated assessments over time that are graphed. (iv) Comparisons with a goal set using validated strategies. (v) Collecting data with fidelity, documented by direct observation using a checklist with immediate performance feedback. (vi) Graphed progress monitoring data that is reviewed by a team every 4 to 8 weeks to determine student response to intervention. (i) Progress monitoring tools that must do all of the following: (i) Have a sufficient number of alternate forms. (ii) Specify minimum acceptable growth. (iii) Provide criterion-referenced or norm-referenced benchmarks. (iv) Possess validity and reliability for the performance score. (j) Tutoring fidelity is established through direct observation using a checklist with immediate performance feedback provided by a qualified staff person, such as an instructional coach. (k) Tutoring does not replace Tier 1 or core instruction time or curricula for reading or math. (l) Tutoring is supplemental to core academic instruction and not a replacement for core academic instruction. (m) Tutoring assessment and intervention is evidence-based, with experimental research studies, 1 of which must be published or pending publication in a peer-reviewed publication. (3) All tutoring programs in the MiStrategyBank must be reviewed by the Michigan School Turnaround Hub. The Michigan School Turnaround Hub shall convene a committee to review tutoring programs for inclusion in the MiStrategyBank. The committee described in this subsection must include all of the following members: (a) Two certified teachers representing elementary and secondary schools. (b) A representative from the MiMTSS TA Center. (c) A representative from an institution of higher education with a teacher preparation college. (d) Two representatives of the department. (e) One representative of the MAISA Michigan Collaboration Hub. (f) An intermediate district designee with a background in English language arts. (g) An intermediate district designee with a background in mathematics. Sec. 16b. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $250,000,000.00 to support district efforts to implement educational best practices. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2026-2027, the allocation from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 for the purposes described in this section will be $90,000,000.00. (2) The department shall pay not less than 70% of the funding allocated in subsection (1) to each district with 1 or more buildings identified by the state accountability system as a comprehensive support and improvement school, an additional targeted support school, or a targeted support and improvement school. All of the following apply to money paid under this subsection: (a) Payments must be made by the department to districts on an equal per-student basis, calculated using the number of students enrolled in buildings identified by the state accountability system as comprehensive support and improvement schools, additional targeted support schools, or targeted support and improvement schools. (b) Money received by districts must be used only for the purpose of implementing targeted student interventions and supports in buildings identified by the state accountability system as a comprehensive support and improvement school, an additional targeted support school, or a targeted support and improvement school. Targeted student interventions and supports implemented by recipient districts must be aligned with the district's Michigan Integrated Continuous Improvement Process (MICIP) plan. Districts may use funds received under this section to reimburse a student's parent for outside tutoring services. (c) The department shall make payments to districts in full not later than December 20, 2025. (3) The department shall make available up to 20% of the funding allocated in subsection (1) for matching awards to other eligible districts. As used in this subsection, "other eligible districts" means districts that did not receive money from the calculations under subsection (2) and that have 1 or more buildings identified as being in the bottom fiftieth percentile on the Michigan School Index System. All of the following apply to money paid under this subsection: (a) Other eligible districts shall apply for funding in a form and manner determined by the department. Districts must apply for funding under this subsection by not later than December 20, 2025. (b) Payments must be made by the department to other eligible districts on an equal per-pupil basis. The department shall ensure that the per-pupil amount paid under this subsection does not exceed the per-pupil amount paid under subsection (2). (c) Other eligible districts shall identify matching dollars from other fund sources for money received under this subsection, and shall use those dollars for the same purpose as funding received under this subsection. By not later than November 20, 2025, the department shall develop a sliding scale to determine the matching rate for districts. The sliding scale described in this subdivision must require a progressively higher district matching rate the closer the identified building is to the fiftieth percentile on the Michigan School Index System. (d) Money received by districts must be utilized only for the purpose of implementing targeted student interventions and supports in buildings identified as being in the bottom fiftieth percentile on the Michigan School Index System. (e) Targeted student interventions and supports implemented by recipient districts must be aligned with the district's Michigan Integrated Continuous Improvement Process (MICIP) plan. (f) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section by not later than January 20, 2026. (4) By not later than August 31 of each year, districts that receive funding under subsection (2) or (3) shall report to parents and legal guardians through mail, email, or through a posting on the district's website that summarizes, at a minimum, the services provided with funding received under subsection (1) in the immediately preceding school year, the amount spent on those services in that school year, and contact information or methods to enroll students in similar services in the current school year. (5) The department shall make available up to 10% of the funding allocated in subsection (1) to address chronic absenteeism in buildings that have a chronic absenteeism rate of 20% or more. All of the following apply to money paid under this subsection: (a) Districts shall apply for funding under this subsection in a form and manner determined by the department. (b) Payments under this subsection must be made on an equal per-pupil basis. (c) Buildings that receive funding under this subsection may use those dollars for any purpose permitted under section 22b, but must reserve a portion of funding to address the causes of chronic absenteeism. Funding may be used for purposes including, but not limited to, resources for students and their families, attendance administrative staff, and marketing campaigns. (d) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this subsection on a schedule determined by the department. (6) By not later than June 1, 2026, districts receiving funding under this section shall provide information regarding the usage of funding received under this section to the Michigan School Turnaround Hub established in section 16c, in a form and manner determined by the Michigan School Turnaround Hub, necessary for the Michigan School Turnaround Hub to make updates to the list of eligible targeted student interventions and supports to include the most impactful programs. (7) Districts that receive funding under this section may use up to 5% of funding received for administrative costs and to ensure compliance with sections 16, 16b, and 16d. (8) In order to receive funding under this section, a district must implement a no cellular telephone policy that, at a minimum, prohibits cellular telephone use in the classroom. (9) As used in this section, "targeted student interventions and supports" means that term as defined in section 16. Sec. 16c. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $3,000,000.00 to Clinton County Regional Educational Service Agency to work with other intermediate districts and the Michigan Association of Intermediate School Administrators to serve as the Michigan School Turnaround Hub. The Michigan School Turnaround Hub shall do all of the following: (a) Develop and implement methods to collect information necessary to make determinations of district compliance with sections 16, 16b, and 16d. Methods developed and implemented under this section must utilize, to the greatest extent practicable, existing data collection and reporting mechanisms, including those used by the regional data hubs, the center, the department, and the federal government. (b) Provide guidance to intermediate districts on methods to support constituent district implementation of sections 16, 16b, and 16d. (c) Update and maintain the MiStrategyBank, including reviewing the eligibility of programs for inclusion in the MiStrategyBank. (d) Collect information from intermediate districts pertaining to districts determined to be out of compliance with section 16, 16b, or 16d and provide that information to the department in a form and manner determined by the department. (e) Provide recommendations and work with relevant organizations to better connect existing data collection and intervention systems to ensure information is shared between systems as efficiently as possible. This includes, but is not limited to, working with the MiDataHub, the MiMTSS Technical Assistance Center, the Michigan Early Warning and Intervention Monitoring System, the center, and the department to review and streamline the sharing of data that may be useful in improving student academic outcomes. (f) By not later than December 1 of each year, provide an annual report to the governor, the house and senate subcommittees responsible for school aid, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director on best practices being utilized by districts and buildings to provide targeted student interventions and supports and to improve parental engagement, including recommendations for state-level changes that would improve student academic outcomes. (2) The department shall make payments from funds allocated in this section in 1 lump sum by not later than November 20, 2025. Sec. 16d. (1) Districts that receive funding under section 22b or 31a shall use a portion of those dollars to ensure the requirements of this section are met. (2) Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, and each year thereafter, for a district with a building identified by the state accountability system as a comprehensive support and improvement school, an additional targeted support school, or a targeted support and improvement school, the district shall provide a mailed notification to all parents and legal guardians of students in such buildings that includes the following: (a) The standing of the building under the state accountability system, including whether the building is a comprehensive support and improvement school, an additional targeted support school, or a targeted support and improvement school, and how this designation was determined. (b) A summary of what the building is doing to improve the standing of the building, including a summary of the strategies being implemented as part of the building's Michigan Integrated Continuous Improvement Process (MICIP). (c) Information regarding the schools of choice program and public school academy enrollment, including a list of all other schools in a 20-mile radius, including traditional public schools, public school academies, and nonpublic schools. (d) A method, including contact information, to receive feedback from parents and legal guardians on ways to improve the standing of the building. (3) Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, and each year thereafter, a district that receives funding under section 31a through the opportunity index formula shall provide a report to parents and legal guardians that details the amount of funding received under that section, how the district distributed that funding in a way to target buildings with the highest needs, and what evidence-based interventions were implemented with those dollars. The report must include a method, including contact information, for parents and legal guardians to provide feedback on the utilization of these dollars as well as to seek more information about services and interventions available for their children. (4) Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, and at least once every 5 years thereafter, each district shall perform a comprehensive review of the literacy curriculum used by the district in grades K to 5 to determine whether that curriculum is evidence-based and aligned to state standards. If the district determines that curriculum is not evidence-based or not aligned to state standards, the district shall provide mailed notification to all parents and legal guardians of students in grades K to 5 receiving instruction with that curriculum that includes all of the following: (a) A statement informing parents and legal guardians that the curriculum used by the district is not evidence-based or not aligned to state standards, and could negatively impact student academic outcomes. (b) A plan, including a projected timeline, for when a new curriculum will be adopted that is evidence-based and aligned to state standards. (5) Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, and each year thereafter, each district must allow time during regular board meetings or board of directors meetings for presentations, discussions, and public comment on each of the following: (a) Strategies to enhance parental engagement. (b) Available transparency and accountability dashboards, with special focus on buildings within the district identified as support schools under the Michigan School Index System, with a focus on what the district is doing to address deficiencies. (6) Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, and each year thereafter, each district shall provide a report to the department on student progress on local interim benchmark assessments and other state assessments. The report described in this subsection must be provided to the department not fewer than 3 times annually. (7) Beginning during the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, and each year thereafter, each district must make available on its website homepage and via an email communication a link to and explanation for how to use the Parent Dashboard for School Transparency made available on the MI School Data portal. Sec. 16e. (1) It is intended that, beginning in 2026-2027, there is established an appropriation to distribute funding to districts in a manner that recognizes student performance on state assessments as calculated under this section. Money shall be paid to districts that meet student academic performance funding goals under subsections (2) to (5). Payments received under this section may be used for any purpose for which payments under sections 22a and 22b may be used. (2) The maximum amount of the incentive payment for student academic performance is an amount equal to $250.00 per pupil. Payments calculated and awarded to qualifying districts under subsections (3) and (4) must be calculated and awarded separately, and a district may receive a payment under either or both subsections (3) and (4). (3) An amount not to exceed 50% of the maximum per-pupil amount allocated under subsection (2) must be used to make performance incentive payments to qualifying districts under this subsection based on pupil performance on state assessments in English language arts in grades 3 to 8. The amount of a payment under this subsection is an amount equal to $125.00 per pupil for all pupils in membership in the district. The department shall determine the qualifying districts under this subsection as follows: (a) Using a model determined by the department that incorporates the most recent cut scores adopted for the Michigan student test of educational progress (M-STEP) for each pupil in grades 3 to 8 in the 2025-2026 school year, the department shall calculate a point score using a metric that assigns points to each of those pupils as follows: (i) For each pupil who began the school year not performing proficiently in English language arts and who declines in proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, zero points. (ii) For each pupil who began the school year performing proficiently in English language arts and declines in proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, zero points. (iii) For each pupil who began the school year not performing proficiently in English language arts and who maintains proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, 1 point. (iv) For each pupil who began the school year performing proficiently in English language arts and who maintains proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, 2 points. (v) For each pupil who began the school year not performing proficiently in English language arts and who improves in proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, 3 points. (vi) For each pupil who began the school year performing proficiently in English language arts and who improves in proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, 2 points. (b) Following the calculations under subdivision (a), the department shall calculate a district average for this metric for the 2025-2026 school year by totaling the number of points for all pupils in grades 3 to 8 under subdivision (a) and dividing that total by the number of those pupils. (c) A district is a qualifying district for the payment under this subsection if the district meets all of the following: (i) The district average for the 2025-2026 school year under subdivision (b) is at least equal to a factor of 1.5. (ii) The district tested at least 95% of its pupils in English language arts. (iii) The district had at least 30 full academic year pupils in grades 3 to 8 English language arts with a performance level change designation in English language arts. (4) An amount not to exceed 50% of the maximum per-pupil amount allocated under subsection (2) must be used to make performance incentive payments to qualifying districts under this subsection based on pupil performance on state assessments in mathematics in grades 3 to 8. The amount of a payment under this subsection is an amount equal to $125.00 per pupil for all pupils in membership in a qualifying district. The department shall determine the qualifying districts under this subsection as follows: (a) Using a model determined by the department that incorporates the most recent cut scores adopted for the Michigan student test of educational progress (M-STEP) for each pupil in grades 3 to 8 in the 2025-2026 school year, the department shall calculate a point score using a metric that assigns points to each of those pupils as follows: (i) For each pupil who began the school year not performing proficiently in mathematics and who declines in proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, zero points. (ii) For each pupil who began the school year performing proficiently in mathematics and declines in proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, zero points. (iii) For each pupil who began the school year not performing proficiently in mathematics and who maintains proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, 1 point. (iv) For each pupil who began the school year performing proficiently in mathematics and who maintains proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, 2 points. (v) For each pupil who began the school year not performing proficiently in mathematics and who improves in proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, 3 points. (vi) For each pupil who began the school year performing proficiently in mathematics and who improves in proficiency, as determined by the department, over the school year, 2 points. (b) Following the calculations under subdivision (a), the department shall calculate a district average for this metric for the 2025-2026 school year by totaling the number of points for all pupils in grades 3 to 8 under subdivision (a) and dividing that total by the number of those pupils. (c) A district is a qualifying district for the payment under this subsection if the district average for the 2025-2026 school year under subdivision (b) is at least equal to a factor of 1.5, the district tested at least 95% of its pupils in mathematics, and the district had at least 30 full academic year pupils in grades 3 to 8 with a performance level change designation in mathematics. (5) If the allocation under subsection (1) is insufficient to fully fund payments as otherwise calculated under this section, the department shall prorate payments under this section on an equal percentage basis. Sec. 16f. It is intended that, beginning in 2026-2027, there is established an appropriation for public school academy startup grants. Grants would be for new public school academies that will be located in districts with low Michigan School Index results and low reading proficiency scores. Sec. 16g. (1) The curriculum used by a district or intermediate district must not, in any way, include the promotion of any form of race or gender stereotyping or anything that could be understood as implicit race or gender stereotyping. As used in this subsection, "race or gender stereotyping" means a set of statements, beliefs, or ideas that conform wholly or in part with the following general or particular statements: (a) That all individuals comprising a racial or ethnic group or gender hold a collective quality or belief. (b) That individuals act in certain ways or hold certain opinions because of their race or gender. (c) That individuals are born racist or sexist by accident of their race or gender. (d) That individuals bear collective guilt for historical wrongs committed by their race or gender. (e) That cultural norms or practices of a racial or ethnic group or gender are flawed and must be eliminated or changed to conform with those of another racial or ethnic group or gender. (f) That racism is inherent in individuals from a particular race or ethnic group or that sexism is inherent in individuals from a particular gender. (g) That a racial or ethnic group or gender is in need of deconstruction, elimination, or criticism. (h) That the actions of individuals serve as an indictment against the race or gender of those individuals. (2) State funding must not be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion (DEI) initiatives or programs as outlined in Executive Order No. 14190, "Ending Racial Indoctrination in K-12 Schooling". (3) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy that participates in interscholastic athletic activities shall designate interscholastic athletic teams and sports based on the sex of the participants, with separate teams for participants of the female sex within female sports divisions, separate teams for participants of the male sex within male sports divisions, and, if applicable, co-ed teams for participants of the female and male sexes within co-ed sports divisions. A school district or intermediate school district shall not knowingly allow individuals of the male sex to participate on athletic teams or in athletic competitions designated for only participants of the female sex. This subsection must not be construed to restrict the eligibility of any student to participate on any interscholastic athletic teams or in interscholastic athletic activities that are designated as male or co-ed. As used in this subsection: (a) "Female" means an individual of the sex characterized by a reproductive system with the biological function of producing eggs (ova). (b) "Male" means an individual of the sex characterized by a reproductive system with the biological function of producing sperm. (c) "Sex" means an individual's immutable biological classification as male or female. (4) A parent must receive a written notification from the minor child's school if a request is made by the minor child to change the minor child's name, pronouns, title, or other word used to identify the minor child. (5) If a district or intermediate district fails to meet the requirements of this section, the department shall withhold 5% of the total funds for which the district or intermediate district qualifies under this article until the district or intermediate district complies with this section. If the district or intermediate district does not comply with this section by the end of the fiscal year, the department shall place the amount withheld in an escrow account until the district or intermediate district complies with this section. Sec. 20. (1) For 2024-2025, 2025-2026, the target foundation allowance is $9,608.00.$10,250.00. (2) The department shall calculate the amount of each district's foundation allowance as provided in this section, using a target foundation allowance in the amount specified in subsection (1). (3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department shall calculate the amount of a district's foundation allowance as follows, using in all calculations the total amount of the district's foundation allowance as calculated before any proration: (a) For a district that had a foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year that was equal to the target foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year, the district receives a foundation allowance in an amount equal to the target foundation allowance described in subsection (1) for the current fiscal year. (b) For a district that had a foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year that was greater than the target foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year, the district's foundation allowance is an amount equal to the lesser of (the sum of the district's foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year plus any per pupil per-pupil amount calculated under section 20m(2) in the immediately preceding fiscal year plus the increase in the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, as compared to the immediately preceding fiscal year) or (the product of the district's foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year times the percentage increase in the United States Consumer Price Index in the calendar year ending in the immediately preceding fiscal year as reported by the May revenue estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b). (c) For a district that had a foundation allowance in the immediately preceding fiscal year that was less than the target foundation allowance in effect for that fiscal year, the district's foundation allowance is an amount equal to the lesser of (the sum of district's foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year plus any per pupil per-pupil amount calculated under section 20m(2) in the immediately preceding fiscal year plus the increase in the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, as compared to the immediately preceding fiscal year) or (the product of the district's foundation allowance for the immediately preceding fiscal year times the percentage increase in the United States Consumer Price Index in the calendar year ending in the immediately preceding fiscal year as reported by the May revenue estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b). (d) For a district that has a foundation allowance that is not a whole dollar amount, the department shall round the district's foundation allowance up to the nearest whole dollar. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the state portion of a district's foundation allowance is an amount equal to the district's foundation allowance or the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, whichever is less, minus the local portion of the district's foundation allowance. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for a district described in subsection (3)(b) and (c), the state portion of the district's foundation allowance is an amount equal to the target foundation allowance minus the district's foundation allowance supplemental payment per pupil calculated under section 20m and minus the local portion of the district's foundation allowance. For a district that has a millage reduction required under section 31 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, the department shall calculate the state portion of the district's foundation allowance as if that reduction did not occur. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes continue to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, the taxable value per membership pupil of property in the receiving district used for the purposes of this subsection does not include the taxable value of property within the geographic area of the dissolved district. For a community district, if school operating taxes continue to be levied by a qualifying school district under section 12b of the revised school code, MCL 380.12b, with the same geographic area as the community district, the taxable value per membership pupil of property in the community district to be used for the purposes of this subsection does not include the taxable value of property within the geographic area of the community district. (5) The allocation calculated under this section for a pupil is based on the foundation allowance of the pupil's district of residence. For a pupil enrolled under section 105 or 105c in a district other than the pupil's district of residence, the allocation calculated under this section is based on the lesser of the foundation allowance of the pupil's district of residence or the foundation allowance of the educating district. For a pupil in membership in a K-5, K-6, or K-8 district who is enrolled in another district in a grade not offered by the pupil's district of residence, the allocation calculated under this section is based on the foundation allowance of the educating district if the educating district's foundation allowance is greater than the foundation allowance of the pupil's district of residence. The calculation under this subsection must take into account a district's per-pupil allocation under section 20m. (6) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for pupils in membership, other than special education pupils, in a public school academy, the allocation calculated under this section is an amount per membership pupil other than special education pupils in the public school academy equal to the target foundation allowance specified in subsection (1), or, for a public school academy that was issued a contract under section 552 of the revised school code, MCL 380.552, to operate as a school of excellence that is a cyber school, $9,150.00. $10,250.00. Notwithstanding section 101, for a public school academy that begins operations after the pupil membership count day, the amount per membership pupil calculated under this subsection must be adjusted by multiplying that amount per membership pupil by the number of hours of pupil instruction provided by the public school academy after it begins operations, as determined by the department, divided by the minimum number of hours of pupil instruction required under section 101(3). The result of this calculation must not exceed the amount per membership pupil otherwise calculated under this subsection. (7) For pupils in membership, other than special education pupils, in a community district, the allocation calculated under this section is an amount per membership pupil other than special education pupils in the community district equal to the foundation allowance of the qualifying school district, as described in section 12b of the revised school code, MCL 380.12b, that is located within the same geographic area as the community district. (8) Subject to subsection (4), for a district that is formed or reconfigured after June 1, 2002 by consolidation of 2 or more districts or by annexation, the resulting district's foundation allowance under this section beginning after the effective date of the consolidation or annexation is the lesser of the sum of the average of the foundation allowances of each of the original or affected districts, calculated as provided in this section, weighted as to the percentage of pupils in total membership in the resulting district who reside in the geographic area of each of the original or affected districts plus $100.00 or the highest foundation allowance among the original or affected districts. This subsection does not apply to a receiving district unless there is a subsequent consolidation or annexation that affects the district. The calculation under this subsection must take into account a district's per-pupil allocation under section 20m. (9) The department shall round each fraction used in making calculations under this section to the fourth decimal place and shall round the dollar amount of an increase in the target foundation allowance to the nearest whole dollar. (10) State payments related to payment of the foundation allowance for a special education pupil are not calculated under this section but are instead calculated under section 51e. (11) To assist the legislature in determining the target foundation allowance for the subsequent fiscal year, each revenue estimating conference conducted under section 367b of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367b, must calculate a pupil membership factor, a revenue adjustment factor, and an index as follows: (a) The pupil membership factor is computed by dividing the estimated membership in the school year ending in the current fiscal year, excluding intermediate district membership, by the estimated membership for the school year ending in the subsequent fiscal year, excluding intermediate district membership. If a consensus membership factor is not determined at the revenue estimating conference, the principals of the revenue estimating conference shall report their estimates to the house and senate subcommittees responsible for school aid appropriations not later than 7 days after the conclusion of the revenue conference. (b) The revenue adjustment factor is computed by dividing the sum of the estimated total state school aid fund revenue for the subsequent fiscal year plus the estimated total state school aid fund revenue for the current fiscal year, adjusted for any change in the rate or base of a tax the proceeds of which are deposited in that fund and excluding money transferred into that fund from the countercyclical budget and economic stabilization fund under the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, by the sum of the estimated total school aid fund revenue for the current fiscal year plus the estimated total state school aid fund revenue for the immediately preceding fiscal year, adjusted for any change in the rate or base of a tax the proceeds of which are deposited in that fund. If a consensus revenue factor is not determined at the revenue estimating conference, the principals of the revenue estimating conference shall report their estimates to the house and senate subcommittees responsible for school aid appropriations not later than 7 days after the conclusion of the revenue conference. (c) The index is calculated by multiplying the pupil membership factor by the revenue adjustment factor. If a consensus index is not determined at the revenue estimating conference, the principals of the revenue estimating conference shall report their estimates to the house and senate subcommittees responsible for state school aid appropriations not later than 7 days after the conclusion of the revenue conference. (12) Payments to districts and public school academies are not made under this section. Rather, the calculations under this section are used to determine the amount of state payments under section 22b. (13) If an amendment to section 2 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963 allowing state aid to some or all nonpublic schools is approved by the voters of this state, each foundation allowance or per-pupil payment calculation under this section may be reduced. (14) As used in this section: (a) "Certified mills" means the lesser of 18 mills or the number of mills of school operating taxes levied by the district in 1993-94. (b) "Current fiscal year" means the fiscal year for which a particular calculation is made. (c) "Dissolved district" means a district that loses its organization, has its territory attached to 1 or more other districts, and is dissolved as provided under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12. (d) "Immediately preceding fiscal year" means the fiscal year immediately preceding the current fiscal year. (e) "Local portion of the district's foundation allowance" means an amount that is equal to the difference between (the sum of the product of the taxable value per membership pupil of all property in the district that is nonexempt property times the district's certified mills and, for a district with certified mills exceeding 12, the product of the taxable value per membership pupil of property in the district that is commercial personal property times the certified mills minus 12 mills) and (the quotient of the product of the captured assessed valuation under tax increment financing acts times the district's certified mills divided by the district's membership excluding special education pupils). (f) "Membership" means the definition of that term under section 6 as in effect for the particular fiscal year for which a particular calculation is made. (g) "Nonexempt property" means property that is not a principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal property, or property occupied by a public school academy. (h) "Principal residence", "qualified agricultural property", "qualified forest property", "supportive housing property", "industrial personal property", and "commercial personal property" mean those terms as defined in section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. (i) "Receiving district" means a district to which all or part of the territory of a dissolved district is attached under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12. (j) "School operating purposes" means the purposes included in the operation costs of the district as prescribed in sections 7 and 18 and purposes authorized under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. (k) "School operating taxes" means local ad valorem property taxes levied under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, and retained for school operating purposes. (l) "Tax increment financing acts" means parts 2, 3, 4, and 6 of the recodified tax increment financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL 125.4201 to 125.4420 and 125.4602 to 125.4629, or the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. (m) "Taxable value per membership pupil" means taxable value, as certified by the county treasurer and reported to the department, for the calendar year ending in the current state fiscal year divided by the district's membership excluding special education pupils for the school year ending in the current state fiscal year. Sec. 21f. (1) A primary district shall enroll an eligible pupil in virtual courses in accordance with the provisions of this section. A primary district shall not offer a virtual course to an eligible pupil unless the virtual course is published in the primary district's catalog of board-approved courses or in the statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by the Michigan Virtual University pursuant to section 98. The primary district shall also provide on its publicly accessible website a link to the statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by the Michigan Virtual University. Unless the pupil is at least age 18 or is an emancipated minor, a pupil must not be enrolled in a virtual course that meets virtually for more than 15 days in a school year without the consent of the pupil's parent or legal guardian. (2) Subject to subsection (3), a primary district shall enroll an eligible pupil in up to 2 virtual courses as requested by the pupil during an academic term, semester, or trimester. (3) A pupil may be enrolled in more than 2 virtual courses in a specific academic term, semester, or trimester if both of the following conditions are met: (a) The primary district has determined that it is in the best interest of the pupil. (b) The pupil agrees with the recommendation of the primary district. (4) If the number of applicants eligible for acceptance in a virtual course does not exceed the capacity of the provider to provide the virtual course, the provider shall accept for enrollment all of the applicants eligible for acceptance. If the number of applicants exceeds the provider's capacity to provide the virtual course, the provider shall use a random draw system, subject to the need to abide by state and federal antidiscrimination laws and court orders. A primary district that is also a provider shall determine whether or not it has the capacity to accept applications for enrollment from nonresident applicants in virtual courses and may use that limit as the reason for refusal to enroll a nonresident applicant. (5) A primary district may not establish additional requirements beyond those specified in this subsection that would prohibit a pupil from taking a virtual course. A pupil's primary district may deny the pupil enrollment in a virtual course if any of the following apply, as determined by the district: (a) The pupil is enrolled in any of grades K to 5. (b) The pupil has previously gained the credits that would be provided from the completion of the virtual course. (c) The virtual course is not capable of generating academic credit. (d) The virtual course is inconsistent with the remaining graduation requirements or career interests of the pupil. (e) The pupil has not completed the prerequisite coursework for the requested virtual course or has not demonstrated proficiency in the prerequisite course content. (f) The pupil has failed a previous virtual course in the same subject during the 2 most recent academic years. (g) The virtual course is of insufficient quality or rigor. A primary district that denies a pupil enrollment request for this reason shall enroll the pupil in a virtual course in the same or a similar subject that the primary district determines is of acceptable rigor and quality. (h) The cost of the virtual course exceeds the amount identified in subsection (10), unless the pupil or the pupil's parent or legal guardian agrees to pay the cost that exceeds this amount. (i) The request for a virtual course enrollment did not occur within the same timelines established by the primary district for enrollment and schedule changes for regular courses. (j) The request for a virtual course enrollment was not made in the academic term, semester, trimester, or summer preceding the enrollment. This subdivision does not apply to a request made by a pupil who is newly enrolled in the primary district. (6) If a pupil is denied enrollment in a virtual course by the pupil's primary district, the primary district shall provide written notification to the pupil of the denial, the reason or reasons for the denial under subsection (5), and a description of the appeal process. The pupil may appeal the denial by submitting a letter to the superintendent of the intermediate district in which the pupil's primary district is located. The letter of appeal must include the reason provided by the primary district for not enrolling the pupil and the reason why the pupil is claiming that the enrollment should be approved. The intermediate district superintendent or designee shall respond to the appeal within 5 days after it is received. If the intermediate district superintendent or designee determines that the denial of enrollment does not meet 1 or more of the reasons specified in subsection (5), the primary district shall enroll the pupil in the virtual course. (7) To provide a virtual course to an eligible pupil under this section, a provider must do all of the following: (a) Ensure that the virtual course has been published in the pupil's primary district's catalog of board-approved courses or published in the statewide catalog of virtual courses maintained by the Michigan Virtual University. (b) Assign to each pupil a teacher of record and provide the primary district with the personnel identification code assigned by the center for the teacher of record. If the provider is a community college, the virtual course must be taught by an instructor employed by or contracted through the providing community college. (c) Offer the virtual course on an open entry and exit method, or aligned to a semester, trimester, or accelerated academic term format. (d) If the virtual course is offered to eligible pupils in more than 1 district, the following additional requirements must also be met: (i) Provide the Michigan Virtual University with a course syllabus that meets the definition under subsection (14)(g) in a form and manner prescribed by the Michigan Virtual University for inclusion in a statewide catalog of virtual courses. (ii) Not later than October 1 of each fiscal year, provide the Michigan Virtual University with an aggregated count of enrollments for each virtual course the provider delivered to pupils under this section during the immediately preceding school year, and the number of enrollments in which the pupil earned 60% or more of the total course points for each virtual course. (8) To provide a virtual course under this section, a community college shall ensure that each virtual course it provides under this section generates postsecondary credit. (9) For any virtual course a pupil enrolls in under this section, the pupil's primary district must assign to the pupil a mentor and shall supply the provider with the mentor's contact information. (10) For a pupil enrolled in 1 or more virtual courses, the primary district shall use foundation allowance or per-pupil funds calculated under section 20 to pay for the expenses associated with the virtual course or courses. A primary district is not required to pay toward the cost of a virtual course an amount that exceeds 6.67% of the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year as calculated under section 20. (11) A virtual learning pupil has the same rights and access to technology in the pupil's primary district's school facilities as all other pupils enrolled in the pupil's primary district. The department shall establish standards for hardware, software, and internet access for pupils who are enrolled in more than 2 virtual courses under this section in an academic term, semester, or trimester taken at a location other than a school facility. (12) If a pupil successfully completes a virtual course, as determined by the pupil's primary district, the pupil's primary district shall grant appropriate academic credit for completion of the course and shall count that credit toward completion of graduation and subject area requirements. A pupil's school record and transcript must identify the virtual course title as it appears in the virtual course syllabus. (13) The enrollment of a pupil in 1 or more virtual courses must not result in a pupil being counted as more than 1.0 full-time equivalent pupils under this article. The minimum requirements to count the pupil in membership are those established by the pupil accounting manual as it was in effect for the 2015-2016 school year or as subsequently amended by the department if the department notifies the legislature about the proposed amendment at least 60 days before the amendment becomes effective. (14) Subject to the requirements in this subsection, a district may provide instruction under this section for not more than 15 days in a school year. If a district plans to provide instruction under this section to pupils for not more than 15 days during a school year, the district's plan must be approved by the board of the district and the district must provide notice of the plan to impacted pupils and their parents or legal guardians before enactment of the plan. Days of instruction under this subsection may only be used for the following purposes, as defined by the department: (a) Emergency closures. (b) Student testing days. (c) Professional development purposes, not to exceed a total of 30 hours during a school year. (14) (15) As used in this section: (a) "Instructor" means an individual who is employed by or contracted through a community college. (b) "Mentor" means a professional employee of the primary district who monitors the pupil's progress, ensures the pupil has access to needed technology, is available for assistance, and ensures access to the teacher of record. A mentor may also serve as the teacher of record if the primary district is the provider for the virtual course and the mentor meets the requirements under subdivision (e). (c) "Primary district" means the district that enrolls the pupil and reports the pupil for pupil membership purposes. (d) "Provider" means the district, intermediate district, community college, or other third-party vendor that the primary district pays to provide the virtual course or the Michigan Virtual University if it is providing the virtual course. (e) "Teacher of record" means a teacher who meets all of the following: (i) Is appropriately placed under a valid Michigan teaching certificate or a teaching permit, authorization, or approval issued by the department. As used in this subparagraph, "appropriately placed" means holding a valid Michigan educator credential with the required grade range and discipline or subject area for the assignment, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction. (ii) Is responsible for providing instruction, determining instructional methods for each pupil, diagnosing learning needs, assessing pupil learning, prescribing intervention strategies and modifying lessons, reporting outcomes, and evaluating the effects of instruction and support strategies. (iii) Has a personnel identification code provided by the center. (iv) If the provider is a community college, is an instructor employed by or contracted through the providing community college. (f) "Virtual course" means a course of study that is capable of generating a credit or a grade and that is provided in an interactive learning environment where any portion the majority of the curriculum is delivered using the internet and in which pupils may be separated from their instructor or teacher of record by time or location, or both. (g) "Virtual course syllabus" means a document that includes all of the following: (i) An alignment document detailing how the course meets applicable state standards or, if the state does not have state standards, nationally recognized standards. (ii) The virtual course content outline. (iii) The virtual course required assessments. (iv) The virtual course prerequisites. (v) Expectations for actual instructor or teacher of record contact time with the virtual learning pupil and other communications between a pupil and the instructor or teacher of record. (vi) Academic support available to the virtual learning pupil. (vii) The virtual course learning outcomes and objectives. (viii) The name of the institution or organization providing the virtual content. (ix) The name of the institution or organization providing the instructor or teacher of record. (x) The course titles assigned by the provider and the course titles and course codes from the National Center for Education Statistics (NCES) school codes for the exchange of data (SCED). (xi) The number of eligible pupils that will be accepted by the provider in the virtual course. A primary district that is also the provider may limit the enrollment to those pupils enrolled in the primary district. (xii) The results of the virtual course quality review using the guidelines and model review process published by the Michigan Virtual University. (h) "Virtual learning pupil" means a pupil enrolled in 1 or more virtual courses. Sec. 21h. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $6,137,400.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for assisting districts assigned by the superintendent to participate in a partnership and districts that are required to submit a deficit elimination plan or an enhanced deficit elimination plan under section 1220 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1220, and are located in a city with a population between 8,000 and 10,000 as determined by the department, that is in a county with a population between 150,000 and 160,000, as determined by the department, to improve student achievement and district financial stability. The superintendent shall identify any conditions that may be contributing to low academic performance within a district being considered for assignment to a partnership. The purpose of the partnership is to identify district needs, develop intervention plans, and partner with public, private, and nonprofit organizations to coordinate resources and improve student achievement. Assignment of a district to a partnership is made by the superintendent. (2) A district described in subsection (1) is eligible for funding under this section if the district includes at least 1 school that has been identified as low performing under the approved federal accountability system or the state accountability system. A district described in this subsection must do all of the following to be eligible for funding under this section: (a) For a partnership district under this section, within 90 days of assignment to the partnership described in this section, and for a district described in subsection (1) that is not a partnership district under this section, complete a comprehensive needs assessment or evaluation in collaboration with an intermediate district, community members, education organizations, and postsecondary institutions, as applicable, that is approved by the superintendent. The comprehensive needs assessment or evaluation must include at least all of the following: (i) A review of the district's implementation and utilization of a multi-tiered system of supports to ensure that it is used to appropriately inform instruction. (ii) A review of the district and school building leadership and educator capacity to substantially improve student outcomes. (iii) A review of classroom, instructional, and operational practices and curriculum to ensure alignment with research-based instructional practices and state curriculum standards. (b) Develop an academic and financial operating or intervention plan that has been approved by the superintendent and that addresses the needs identified in the comprehensive needs assessment or evaluation completed under subdivision (a). The intervention plan must include at least all of the following: (i) Specific actions that will be taken by the district and each of its partners to improve student achievement. (ii) Specific measurable benchmarks that will be met within 18 months to improve student achievement and identification of expected student achievement outcomes to be attained within 3 years after assignment to the partnership. (c) Craft academic goals that put pupils on track to meet or exceed grade level proficiency, increase high school graduation rates, reduce class sizes, and improve attendance rates. (d) Provide access to training for district leadership, including, but not limited to, the superintendent or chief administrator and school board or board of directors members, on areas of education fiscal and policy matters. (3) Upon approval of the academic and financial operating or intervention plan developed under subsection (2), the department shall assign a team of individuals with expertise in comprehensive school and district reform to partner with the district, the intermediate district, community organizations, education organizations, and postsecondary institutions identified in the academic and financial operating or intervention plan to review the district's use of existing financial resources to ensure that those resources are being used as efficiently and effectively as possible to improve student academic achievement and to ensure district financial stability. The superintendent of public instruction may waive burdensome administrative rules for a partnership district for the duration of the partnership agreement and for a district described in subsection (1) that is not a partnership district under this section and that receives funding under this section in the current fiscal year. (4) Funds allocated under this section, excluding funds allocated under subsection (5), may be used to pay for district expenditures approved by the superintendent to improve student achievement. Funds may be used for professional development for teachers or district or school leadership, increased instructional time, teacher mentors, or other expenditures that directly impact student achievement and cannot be paid from existing district financial resources. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments to districts under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (5) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $137,400.00 for the purchase of a data analytics tool to be used by districts described in subsection (1). The superintendent of public instruction shall require districts described in subsection (1) to purchase a data analytics tool funded under this subsection as part of the agreements described in this section. (6) The department shall annually report to the legislature on the activities funded under this section and how those activities impacted student achievement in districts that received funds under this section. To the extent possible, participating districts receiving funding under this section shall participate in the report. (7) In addition to the allocation under subsection (1), from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $36,000,000.00 to districts described in subsection (1) for 2023-2024 only for supplemental funding to be used by districts for the purposes of this section in equal installments of $12,000,000.00 in each of the fiscal years 2023-2024, 2024-2025, and 2025-2026. The funds allocated under this subsection for 2023-2024 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2023-2024 are carried forward into 2024-2025. The purpose of the work project is to provide assistance to districts eligible for funding under this section. The estimated completion date of the work project described in this subsection is September 30, 2026. Sec. 22a. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $4,144,000,000.00 $3,937,000,000.00 for 2023-2024 2024-2025 and there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,993,000,000.00 $3,803,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for payments to districts and qualifying public school academies to guarantee each district and qualifying public school academy an amount equal to its 1994-95 total state and local per-pupil revenue for school operating purposes under section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Pursuant to section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, this guarantee does not apply to a district in a year in which the district levies a millage rate for school district operating purposes less than it levied in 1994. However, subsection (2) applies to calculating the payments under this section. Funds allocated under this section that are not expended in the fiscal year for which they were allocated, as determined by the department, may be used to supplement the allocations under sections 22b and 51c to fully fund those allocations for the same fiscal year. (2) To ensure that a district receives an amount equal to the district's 1994-95 total state and local per-pupil revenue for school operating purposes, there is allocated to each district a state portion of the district's 1994-95 foundation allowance in an amount calculated as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the state portion of a district's 1994-95 foundation allowance is an amount equal to the district's 1994-95 foundation allowance or $6,500.00, whichever is less, minus the difference between the sum of the product of the taxable value per membership pupil of all property in the district that is nonexempt property times the district's certified mills and, for a district with certified mills exceeding 12, the product of the taxable value per membership pupil of property in the district that is commercial personal property times the certified mills minus 12 mills and the quotient of the ad valorem property tax revenue of the district captured under tax increment financing acts divided by the district's membership. For a district that has a millage reduction required under section 31 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, the department shall calculate the state portion of the district's foundation allowance as if that reduction did not occur. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, taxable value per membership pupil of all property in the receiving district that is nonexempt property and taxable value per membership pupil of property in the receiving district that is commercial personal property do not include property within the geographic area of the dissolved district; ad valorem property tax revenue of the receiving district captured under tax increment financing acts does not include ad valorem property tax revenue captured within the geographic boundaries of the dissolved district under tax increment financing acts; and certified mills do not include the certified mills of the dissolved district. For a community district, the department shall reduce the allocation as otherwise calculated under this section by an amount equal to the amount of local school operating tax revenue that would otherwise be due to the community district if not for the operation of section 386 of the revised school code, MCL 380.386, and the amount of this reduction is offset by the increase in funding under section 22b(2). (b) For a district that had a 1994-95 foundation allowance greater than $6,500.00, the state payment under this subsection is the sum of the amount calculated under subdivision (a) plus the amount calculated under this subdivision. The amount calculated under this subdivision must be equal to the difference between the district's 1994-95 foundation allowance minus $6,500.00 and the current year hold harmless school operating taxes per pupil. If the result of the calculation under subdivision (a) is negative, the negative amount is an offset against any state payment calculated under this subdivision. If the result of a calculation under this subdivision is negative, there is not a state payment or a deduction under this subdivision. The taxable values per membership pupil used in the calculations under this subdivision are as adjusted by ad valorem property tax revenue captured under tax increment financing acts divided by the district's membership. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, ad valorem property tax revenue captured under tax increment financing acts do not include ad valorem property tax revenue captured within the geographic boundaries of the dissolved district under tax increment financing acts. (3) For pupils in membership in a qualifying public school academy, there is allocated under this section to the authorizing body that is the fiscal agent for the qualifying public school academy for forwarding to the qualifying public school academy an amount equal to the 1994-95 per-pupil payment to the qualifying public school academy under section 20. (4) A district or qualifying public school academy may use funds allocated under this section in conjunction with any federal funds for which the district or qualifying public school academy otherwise would be eligible. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for a district that is formed or reconfigured after June 1, 2000 by consolidation of 2 or more districts or by annexation, the resulting district's 1994-95 foundation allowance under this section beginning after the effective date of the consolidation or annexation is the average of the 1994-95 foundation allowances of each of the original or affected districts, calculated as provided in this section, weighted as to the percentage of pupils in total membership in the resulting district in the fiscal year in which the consolidation takes place who reside in the geographic area of each of the original districts. If an affected district's 1994-95 foundation allowance is less than the 1994-95 basic foundation allowance, the amount of that district's 1994-95 foundation allowance is considered for the purpose of calculations under this subsection to be equal to the amount of the 1994-95 basic foundation allowance. This subsection does not apply to a receiving district unless there is a subsequent consolidation or annexation that affects the district. (6) Payments under this section are subject to section 25g. (7) As used in this section: (a) "1994-95 foundation allowance" means a district's 1994-95 foundation allowance calculated and certified by the department of treasury or the superintendent under former section 20a as enacted in 1993 PA 336 and as amended by 1994 PA 283. (b) "Certified mills" means the lesser of 18 mills or the number of mills of school operating taxes levied by the district in 1993-94. (c) "Current fiscal year" means the fiscal year for which a particular calculation is made. (d) "Current year hold harmless school operating taxes per pupil" means the per-pupil revenue generated by multiplying a district's 1994-95 hold harmless millage by the district's current year taxable value per membership pupil. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, taxable value per membership pupil does not include the taxable value of property within the geographic area of the dissolved district. (e) "Dissolved district" means a district that loses its organization, has its territory attached to 1 or more other districts, and is dissolved as provided under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12. (f) "Hold harmless millage" means, for a district with a 1994-95 foundation allowance greater than $6,500.00, the number of mills by which the exemption from the levy of school operating taxes on a principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal property, and property occupied by a public school academy could be reduced as provided in section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, and the number of mills of school operating taxes that could be levied on all property as provided in section 1211(2) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, as certified by the department of treasury for the 1994 tax year. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, school operating taxes do not include school operating taxes levied within the geographic area of the dissolved district. (g) "Membership" means the definition of that term under section 6 as in effect for the particular fiscal year for which a particular calculation is made. (h) "Nonexempt property" means property that is not a principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal property, or property occupied by a public school academy. (i) "Principal residence", "qualified agricultural property", "qualified forest property", "supportive housing property", "industrial personal property", and "commercial personal property" mean those terms as defined in section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. (j) "Qualifying public school academy" means a public school academy that was in operation in the 1994-95 school year and is in operation in the current fiscal year. (k) "Receiving district" means a district to which all or part of the territory of a dissolved district is attached under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12. (l) "School operating taxes" means local ad valorem property taxes levied under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, and retained for school operating purposes as defined in section 20. (m) "Tax increment financing acts" means parts 2, 3, 4, and 6 of the recodified tax increment financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL 125.4201 to 125.4420 and 125.4602 to 125.4629, or the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. (n) "Taxable value per membership pupil" means each of the following divided by the district's membership: (i) For the number of mills by which the exemption from the levy of school operating taxes on a principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal property, and property occupied by a public school academy may be reduced as provided in section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, the taxable value of principal residence, qualified agricultural property, qualified forest property, supportive housing property, industrial personal property, commercial personal property, and property occupied by a public school academy for the calendar year ending in the current fiscal year. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, mills do not include mills within the geographic area of the dissolved district. (ii) For the number of mills of school operating taxes that may be levied on all property as provided in section 1211(2) of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211, the taxable value of all property for the calendar year ending in the current fiscal year. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, school operating taxes do not include school operating taxes levied within the geographic area of the dissolved district. Sec. 22b. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, for discretionary nonmandated payments to districts under this section, there is allocated for 2023-2024 an amount not to exceed $6,219,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund and general fund appropriations in section 11 and an amount not to exceed $72,000,000.00 from the community district education trust fund appropriation in section 11, and there is allocated for 2024-2025 an amount not to exceed $6,213,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund and general fund appropriations in section 11 and an amount not to exceed $41,000,000.00 from the community district education trust fund appropriation in section 11. For 2023-2024, $33,700,000.00 must be deposited from the general fund into the state school aid fund to reimburse the state school aid fund for community district education trust fund costs in excess of $72,000,000.00, as required under section 12 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.262. For 2024-2025, the amount necessary, estimated at $70,200,000.00 must be deposited from the general fund into the state school aid fund to reimburse the state school aid fund for community district education trust fund costs in excess of $41,000,000.00, as required under section 12 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.262. If the amount allocated under this subsection from the community district education trust fund appropriation under section 11 is insufficient to pay for an increase under this section, any amount exceeding that allocation may be paid from other allocations under this subsection. Except for money allocated under this section from the community district education trust fund appropriation in section 11, funds there is allocated for 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $6,959,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund and general fund appropriations in section 11. Funds allocated under this section that are not expended in the fiscal year for which they were allocated, as determined by the department, may be used to supplement the allocations under sections 22a and 51c to fully fund those allocations for the same fiscal year. (2) Subject to subsection (3) and section 296, the allocation to a district under this section is an amount equal to the sum of the amounts calculated under sections 20, 20m, 51a(2), 51a(3), 51a(11), and 51e, minus the sum of the allocations to the district under sections 22a and 51c. For a community district, the allocation as otherwise calculated under this section is increased by an amount equal to the amount of local school operating tax revenue that would otherwise be due to the community district if not for the operation of section 386 of the revised school code, MCL 380.386, and this increase must be paid from the community district education trust fund allocation in subsection (1) to offset the absence of local school operating revenue in a community district in the funding of the state portion of the foundation allowance under section 20(4). (3) To receive an allocation under subsection (1), each district must do all of the following: (a) Comply with section 1280b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280b. (b) Comply with sections 1278a and 1278b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1278a and 380.1278b. (c) Furnish data and other information required by state and federal law to the center and the department in the form and manner specified by the center or the department, as applicable. (d) Comply with section 1230g of the revised school code, MCL 380.1230g. (e) Comply with section 21f. (f) For a district that has entered into a partnership agreement with the department, comply with section 22p. (4) Districts are encouraged to use funds allocated under this section for the purchase and support of payroll, human resources, and other business function software that is compatible with that of the intermediate district in which the district is located and with other districts located within that intermediate district. (5) From the allocation in subsection (1), the department shall pay up to $1,000,000.00 in litigation costs incurred by this state related to commercial or industrial property tax appeals, including, but not limited to, appeals of classification, that impact revenues dedicated to the state school aid fund. (6) From the allocation in subsection (1), the department shall pay up to $1,000,000.00 in litigation costs incurred by this state associated with lawsuits filed by 1 or more districts or intermediate districts against this state. If the allocation under this section is insufficient to fully fund all payments required under this section, the payments under this subsection must be made in full before any proration of remaining payments under this section. (7) It is the intent of the legislature that all constitutional obligations of this state have been fully funded under sections 22a, 31d, 51a, 51c, 51e, and 152a. If a claim is made by an entity receiving funds under this article that challenges the legislative determination of the adequacy of this funding or alleges that there exists an unfunded constitutional requirement, the state budget director may escrow or allocate from the discretionary funds for nonmandated payments under this section the amount as may be necessary to satisfy the claim before making any payments to districts under subsection (2). If funds are escrowed, the escrowed funds are a work project appropriation and the funds are carried forward into the following fiscal year. The purpose of the work project is to provide for any payments that may be awarded to districts as a result of litigation. The work project is completed upon resolution of the litigation. (8) If the local claims review board or a court of competent jurisdiction makes a final determination that this state is in violation of section 29 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 regarding state payments to districts, the state budget director shall use work project funds under subsection (7) or allocate from the discretionary funds for nonmandated payments under this section the amount as may be necessary to satisfy the amount owed to districts before making any payments to districts under subsection (2). (9) If a claim is made in court that challenges the legislative determination of the adequacy of funding for this state's constitutional obligations or alleges that there exists an unfunded constitutional requirement, any interested party may seek an expedited review of the claim by the local claims review board. If the claim exceeds $10,000,000.00, this state may remove the action to the court of appeals, and the court of appeals has and shall exercise jurisdiction over the claim. (10) If payments resulting from a final determination by the local claims review board or a court of competent jurisdiction that there has been a violation of section 29 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 exceed the amount allocated for discretionary nonmandated payments under this section, the legislature shall provide for adequate funding for this state's constitutional obligations at its next legislative session. (11) If a lawsuit challenging payments made to districts related to costs reimbursed by federal title XIX Medicaid funds is filed against this state, then, for the purpose of addressing potential liability under such a lawsuit, the state budget director may place funds allocated under this section in escrow or allocate money from the funds otherwise allocated under this section, up to a maximum of 50% of the amount allocated in subsection (1). If funds are placed in escrow under this subsection, those funds are a work project appropriation and the funds are carried forward into the following fiscal year. The purpose of the work project is to provide for any payments that may be awarded to districts as a result of the litigation. The work project is completed upon resolution of the litigation. In addition, this state reserves the right to terminate future federal title XIX Medicaid reimbursement payments to districts if the amount or allocation of reimbursed funds is challenged in the lawsuit. As used in this subsection, "title XIX" means title XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-6. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Dissolved district" means that term as defined in section 20. (b) "Local school operating revenue" means school operating taxes levied under section 1211 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1211. For a receiving district, if school operating taxes are to be levied on behalf of a dissolved district that has been attached in whole or in part to the receiving district to satisfy debt obligations of the dissolved district under section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, local school operating revenue does not include school operating taxes levied within the geographic area of the dissolved district. (c) "Receiving district" and "school operating taxes" mean those terms as defined in section 20. Sec. 22d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, an amount not to exceed $12,306,900.00 $13,131,400.00 is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for supplemental payments to rural districts under this section. (2) From the allocation under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $3,734,400.00 $3,984,600.00 for payments under this subsection to eligible districts. A district that meets all of the following is an eligible district under this subsection: (a) Operates grades K to 12. (b) Has fewer than 250 pupils in membership. (c) Each school building operated by the district meets at least 1 of the following: (i) Is located in the Upper Peninsula at least 30 miles from any other public school building. (ii) Is located on an island that is not accessible by bridge. (3) The amount of the additional funding to each eligible district under subsection (2) is determined under a spending plan developed as provided in this subsection and approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The spending plan must be developed cooperatively by the intermediate superintendents of each intermediate district in which an eligible district is located. The intermediate superintendents shall review the financial situation of each eligible district, determine the minimum essential financial needs of each eligible district, and develop and agree on a spending plan that distributes the available funding under subsection (2) to the eligible districts based on those financial needs. The intermediate superintendents shall submit the spending plan to the superintendent of public instruction for approval. Upon approval by the superintendent of public instruction, the amounts specified for each eligible district under the spending plan are allocated under subsection (2) and must be paid to the eligible districts in the same manner as payments under section 22b. (4) Subject to subsection (7), from the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $8,042,100.00 $8,604,200.00 for payments under this subsection to districts that have fewer than 10.0 pupils per square mile, as determined by the department, or that have greater than 250 square miles. (5) The funds allocated under subsection (4) are allocated as follows: (a) An amount equal to $6,093,400.00 $6,501,700.00 is allocated to districts with fewer than 8.0 pupils per square mile, as determined by the department, on an equal per-pupil basis. (b) The balance of the funding under subsection (4) is allocated as follows: (i) For districts with at least 8.0 but fewer than 9.0 pupils per square mile, as determined by the department, the allocation is an amount per pupil equal to 75% of the per-pupil amount allocated to districts under subdivision (a). (ii) For districts with at least 9.0 but fewer than 10.0 pupils per square mile, as determined by the department, the allocation is an amount per pupil equal to 50% of the per-pupil amount allocated to districts under subdivision (a). (iii) For districts that have greater than 250 square miles, have at least 10.0 pupils per square mile, and do not receive funding under subsection (2), as determined by the department, the allocation is an amount per pupil equal to 100% of the per-pupil amount allocated to districts under subdivision (a). (c) If the total funding allocated under subdivision (b) is insufficient to fully fund payments as calculated under that subdivision, the department shall prorate payments to districts under subdivision (b) on an equal per-pupil basis. If funding allocated under subdivision (b) remains unallocated after making calculations under that subdivision, the department may provide the remaining unallocated funding on an equal per-pupil basis to districts receiving funding under subdivision (b)(i) and (ii). (6) Subject to subsection (7), from the allocation under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $530,400.00 $542,600.00 for payments under this subsection to districts where each school building operated by the district is located on an island that is accessible by bridge. (7) A district receiving funds allocated under subsection (2) is not eligible for funding allocated under subsection (4) or (6). A district receiving funds allocated under subsection (6) is not eligible for funding under subsection (2) or (4). Sec. 22l. (1) From the school transportation state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 only an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00 to districts and intermediate districts for transportation costs. Funding for each district or intermediate district is as follows: (a) The department must assign each district and intermediate district to an octile based on the number of riders per square mile and calculate the median cost per rider for each octile. (b) Funds must be distributed to each district and intermediate district as follows: (i) An initial amount at the lesser of the octile's median cost per rider or the actual transportation cost per general education rider at the district or intermediate district. (ii) An additional amount for districts and intermediate districts that have outlier costs per rider that are deemed reasonable, as determined by the department. (c) If funds are insufficient to fully fund payments under this section, payments may be prorated on an equal percentage basis. (2) In addition to the funds allocated under subsection (1), from the school transportation fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2022-2023 only an amount not to exceed $200,000.00 to an intermediate district for a study on district transportation costs. The intermediate district receiving funds under this subsection must submit a report to the department, the state budget director, the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, and the house and senate fiscal agencies by February 29, 2024 on the outcomes of the study under this subsection. Notwithstanding section 18a, funds allocated under this subsection may be available for expenditure until September 30, 2026. A recipient of funding under this subsection must return any unexpended funds to the department in a manner prescribed by the department by not later than October 30, 2026. (3) To remain eligible for funding under subsection (1), by not later than December 1 of the current fiscal year, a school district must submit, in a form and manner determined by the department, to their intermediate district, and a public school academy must submit, in a form and manner determined by the department, to the intermediate district in which the public school academy is located, the number of nonpublic school students the district expects to transport as required under section 1321 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1321. Intermediate districts shall submit this information to the department by not later than February 1. (4) The department shall compile the reports provided by intermediate districts under subsection (3) into 1 legislative report. The department shall provide this report not later than March 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section to the house and senate subcommittees responsible for school aid, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 22m. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $3,500,000.00 for supporting the integration of local data systems into the Michigan data hub network based on common standards and applications that are in compliance with section 19(6). (2) An entity that is the fiscal agent for no more than 5 consortia of intermediate districts that previously received funding from the technology readiness infrastructure grant under former section 22i for the purpose of establishing regional data hubs that are part of the Michigan data hub network is eligible for funding under this section. (3) The center shall work with an advisory committee composed of representatives from intermediate districts within each of the data hub regions to coordinate the activities of the Michigan data hub network. (4) The center, in collaboration with the Michigan data hub network, shall determine the amount of funds distributed under this section to each participating regional data hub within the network, based upon a competitive grant process. The center shall ensure that the entities receiving funding under this section represent geographically diverse areas in this state. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the center. (6) To receive funding under this section, a regional data hub must have a governance model that ensures local control of data, data security, and student privacy issues. The integration of data within each of the regional data hubs must provide for the actionable use of data by districts and intermediate districts through common reports and dashboards and for efficiently providing information to meet state and federal reporting purposes. (7) Participation in a data hub region in the Michigan data hub network under this section is voluntary and is not required. (8) Entities receiving funding under this section shall use the funds for all of the following: (a) Creating an infrastructure that effectively manages the movement of data between data systems used by intermediate districts, districts, and other educational organizations in Michigan based on common data standards to improve student achievement. (b) Utilizing the infrastructure to put in place commonly needed integrations, reducing cost and effort to do that work while increasing data accuracy and usability. (c) Promoting the use of a more common set of applications by promoting systems that integrate with the Michigan data hub network. (d) Promoting 100% district adoption of the Michigan data hub network. (e) Ensuring local control of data, data security, and student data privacy. (f) Utilizing the infrastructure to promote the actionable use of data through common reports and dashboards that are consistent statewide. (g) Creating a governance model to facilitate sustainable operations of the infrastructure in the future, including administration, legal agreements, documentation, staffing, hosting, and funding. (h) Evaluating future data initiatives at all levels to determine whether the initiatives can be enhanced by using the standardized environment in the Michigan data hub network. (9) By not later than January 1 of each fiscal year, the center shall prepare a summary report of information provided by each entity that received funds under this section that includes measurable outcomes based on the objectives described under this section and a summary of compiled data from each entity to provide a means to evaluate the effectiveness of the project. The center shall submit the report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid and to the house and senate fiscal agencies. Sec. 24. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $7,650,000.00 for payments to the educating district or intermediate district for educating pupils assigned by a court or the department of health and human services to reside in or to attend a juvenile detention facility or child caring institution licensed by the department of health and human services and approved by the department to provide an on-grounds education program. The amount of the payment under this section to a district or intermediate district is calculated as prescribed under subsection (2). (2) The department shall allocate the total amount allocated under this section by paying to the educating district or intermediate district an amount equal to the lesser of the district's or intermediate district's added cost or the department's approved per-pupil allocation for the district or intermediate district. For the purposes of this subsection: (a) "Added cost" means 100% of the added cost each fiscal year for educating all pupils assigned by a court or the department of health and human services to reside in or to attend a juvenile detention facility or child caring institution licensed by the department of health and human services or the department of licensing and regulatory affairs and approved by the department to provide an on-grounds education program. Added cost is computed by deducting all other revenue received under this article for pupils described in this section from total costs, as approved by the department, in whole or in part, for educating those pupils in the on-grounds education program or in a program approved by the department that is located on property adjacent to a juvenile detention facility or child caring institution. Costs reimbursed by federal funds are not included. (b) "Department's approved per-pupil allocation" for a district or intermediate district is determined by dividing the total amount allocated under this section for a fiscal year by the full-time equated membership total for all pupils approved by the department to be funded under this section for that fiscal year for the district or intermediate district. (3) A district or intermediate district educating pupils described in this section at a residential child caring institution may operate, and receive funding under this section for, a department-approved on-grounds educational program for those pupils that is longer than 181 days, but not longer than 233 days, if the child caring institution was licensed as a child caring institution and offered in 1991-92 an on-grounds educational program that was longer than 181 days but not longer than 233 days and that was operated by a district or intermediate district. (4) Special education pupils funded under section 53a are not funded under this section. Sec. 24a. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,355,700.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for payments to intermediate districts for pupils who are placed in juvenile justice service facilities operated by the department of health and human services. The amount of the payment to each intermediate district is an amount equal to the state share of those costs that are clearly and directly attributable to the educational programs for pupils placed in facilities described in this section that are located within the intermediate district's boundaries. The intermediate districts receiving payments under this section shall cooperate with the department of health and human services to ensure that all funding allocated under this section is utilized by the intermediate district and department of health and human services for educational programs for pupils described in this section. Pupils described in this section are not eligible to be funded under section 24. However, a program responsibility or other fiscal responsibility associated with these pupils must not be transferred from the department of health and human services to a district or intermediate district unless the district or intermediate district consents to the transfer. Sec. 25f. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,600,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for payments to strict discipline academies and qualified districts, as provided under this section. (2) To receive funding under this section, a strict discipline academy or qualified district must first comply with section 25e and use the pupil transfer process described in that section for changes in enrollment as prescribed under that section and apply annually for funding under section 24. (3) The total amount allocated to a strict discipline academy or qualified district under this section is equal to the strict discipline academy's or qualified district's pupil membership in the immediately preceding year multiplied by an amount calculated by dividing the total allocation under this section by the total pupil membership for eligible strict discipline academies and qualified districts in the immediately preceding year. However, the sum of the amounts received by a strict discipline academy or qualified district under this section and under section 24 must not exceed the product of the strict discipline academy's or qualified district's per-pupil allocation calculated under section 20 multiplied by the strict discipline academy's or qualified district's full-time equated membership. The department shall allocate funds to strict discipline academies and qualified districts under this section on a monthly basis. (4) Special education pupils funded under section 53a are not funded under this section. (5) The department shall make payments to strict discipline academies and qualified districts under this section according to the payment schedule under section 17b. (6) For purposes of this section, the pupil membership for the current fiscal year for a qualified district is the actual number of pupils that are in the custody of a county juvenile agency as described in subsection (7)(a). (7) As used in this section: (a) "Qualified district" means a public school academy that is not a strict discipline academy that enrolls individuals who are in the custody of a county juvenile agency to which both of the following are applicable: (i) The agency had custody of individuals who were enrolled in a strict discipline academy in the 2020-2021 school year. (ii) The strict discipline academy that the individuals described in subparagraph (i) were enrolled in subsequently closed. (b) "Strict discipline academy" means a public school academy established under sections 1311b to 1311m of the revised school code, MCL 380.1311b to 380.1311m. Sec. 25g. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,050,000.00 $750,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purposes of this section. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the operation of the special membership counting provisions under section 6(4)(dd) and the other membership counting provisions under section 6(4) result in a pupil being counted as more than 1.0 FTE in a fiscal year, the payment made for the pupil under sections 22a and 22b must not be based on more than 1.0 FTE for that pupil, and that portion of the FTE that exceeds 1.0 is paid under this section in an amount equal to that portion multiplied by the educating district's foundation allowance or per-pupil payment calculated under section 20. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2025-2026, the allocation from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 for the purposes described in this section will be $750,000.00. (2) Special education pupils funded under section 53a are not funded under this section. (3) If the funds allocated under this section are insufficient to fully fund the adjustments under subsection (1), the department shall prorate payments under this section on an equal per-pupil basis. (4) The department shall make payments to districts under this section according to the payment schedule under section 17b. Sec. 26a. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $14,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to reimburse districts and intermediate districts under section 12 of the Michigan renaissance zone act, 1996 PA 376, MCL 125.2692, for taxes levied in 2024. The department shall pay the allocations by not later than 60 days after the department of treasury certifies to the department and to the state budget director that the department of treasury has received all necessary information to properly determine the amounts due to each eligible recipient. Sec. 26b. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $5,284,000.00 $5,549,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for payments to districts, intermediate districts, and community college districts for the portion of the payment in lieu of taxes obligation that is attributable to districts, intermediate districts, and community college districts under section 2154 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.2154. (2) If the amount appropriated under this section is insufficient to fully pay obligations under this section, payments are prorated on an equal basis among all eligible districts, intermediate districts, and community college districts. Sec. 26c. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $28,300,000.00 $37,700,000.00 for 2023-2024 2024-2025 and there is allocated an amount not to exceed $34,500,000.00 $43,300,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to the promise zone fund created in subsection (3). The funds allocated under this section reflect the amount of revenue from the collection of the state education tax captured under section 17 of the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1677. (2) Funds allocated to the promise zone fund under this section must be used solely for payments to eligible districts and intermediate districts, in accordance with section 17 of the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1677, that have a promise zone development plan approved by the department of treasury under section 7 of the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1667. Eligible districts and intermediate districts shall use payments made under this section for reimbursement for qualified educational expenses as that term is defined in section 3 of the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1663. (3) The promise zone fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid fund to be used solely for the purposes of the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1661 to 390.1679. All of the following apply to the promise zone fund: (a) The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the promise zone fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the promise zone fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (b) Money in the promise zone fund at the close of a fiscal year remains in the promise zone fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) Subject to subsection (2), the state treasurer may make payments from the promise zone fund to eligible districts and intermediate districts under the Michigan promise zone authority act, 2008 PA 549, MCL 390.1661 to 390.1679, to be used for the purposes of a promise zone authority created under that act. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 26d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $14,400,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for reimbursements to intermediate districts as required under section 15b of the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2665b. (2) The amounts reimbursed under subsection (1) must be used by the intermediate district only for the purposes for which the property taxes were originally levied. (3) The Michigan strategic fund and the Michigan economic development corporation shall work with the department of treasury in identifying the amount of tax revenues that are to be reimbursed under subsection (1). (4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of treasury shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department of treasury. Sec. 27a. (1) From the educator fellowship public provider fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00, from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00, and from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 for the MI future educator fellowship program. The funds allocated under this section must be used to offset tuition costs for individuals who are working toward earning their initial teacher certification. At the close of the fiscal year, money allocated under this section that is unspent must be deposited as follows: (a) For state school aid fund money, into the educator fellowship public provider fund in section 27d. (b) For general fund money, into the educator fellowship private provider fund in section 27e. (2) To establish initial eligibility for an award from funding under this section, an individual must meet all of the following conditions by the date of enrollment described in subdivision (b): (a) Have graduated from high school with a diploma or certificate of completion or achieved a high school equivalency certificate. (b) Be admitted to an eligible educator preparation program; be working toward a teacher certification; be enrolled in enough coursework to be considered enrolled full-time during the academic year, as determined by the student's educator preparation program, or the equivalent of full-time participation for individuals enrolled in an alternative certification program, as defined by the department; and, for students at institutions of higher education, be considered at least a junior-level student, as determined by the institution of higher education. (c) Not have previously earned a teacher certification. (d) Timely complete a grant application in a form and manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.treasury. (e) Timely file the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for the enrollment period described in subdivision (b). (f) Timely apply for all available gift aid for the enrollment period described in subdivision (b). (g) Agree to repay any funds received from funding under this section if the individual does not maintain enrollment in their educator preparation program, the individual does not successfully complete their educator program, or the individual does not complete the work requirement described in subsection (7). (h) Have a high school or college grade point average of at least 3.0. (i) Be a resident of this state, as determined for purposes of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid. (3) To establish continuing eligibility for an award under this section at an eligible educator preparation program, an individual must meet all of the following conditions: (a) Maintain full-time continuous enrollment in an eligible educator preparation program, as determined by the educator preparation program, or the equivalent of full-time participation for individuals enrolled in an alternative certification program, as defined by the department, excluding any period of time missed due to a medical or other emergency, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.treasury. (b) Maintain satisfactory academic progress, including a grade point average of at least 3.0, in courses provided by the eligible educator preparation program and meet requirements established by the eligible educator preparation program. (c) Participate in relevant academic and career advising programs offered by the eligible educator preparation program. (d) Timely file the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for each academic year in which the individual receives an award from funding under this section. (e) Timely apply for all available gift aid for each academic year in which the individual applies for funding under this section. (f) Maintain residency in this state, as determined for purposes of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid. (4) An award under this section must not exceed $10,000.00 per academic year or the cost of tuition at the eligible educator preparation program attended, whichever is less. As used in this subsection, the cost of tuition at an educator preparation program that is an institution of higher education is the in-district resident rate plus other required fees, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential; treasury; and the cost of tuition at an educator preparation program that is an alternative certification provider is the cost of tuition plus other required fees, as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.treasury. (5) Awards under this section must be distributed to eligible educator preparation programs on behalf of an eligible recipient on a timeline determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.treasury. (6) Pending available funds, applicants may renew their award for up to 3 years, or until program completion, whichever comes first. (7) To be an eligible recipient of fellowship funding under this section, an individual must pledge to work as a certified teacher in a public school, nonpublic school, or a qualifying public preschool program in this state and must meet 1 of the following work requirements: (a) For a recipient of funding under this section who received an award for 1 academic year, 3 years of work as a certified teacher in a public school, nonpublic school, or a qualifying public preschool program in this state. (b) For a recipient of funding under this section who received an award for 2 academic years, 4 years of work as a certified teacher in a public school, nonpublic school, or a qualifying public preschool program in this state. (c) For a recipient of funding under this section who received an award for 3 academic years, 5 years of work as a certified teacher in a public school, nonpublic school, or a qualifying public preschool program in this state. (d) For a recipient working in a critical needs district, 3 years of work as a certified teacher. As used in this subdivision, "critical needs district" means a district with a median household income in the lowest quartile in each prosperity region, as determined by the department. (8) If an award recipient does not maintain enrollment in their educator preparation program as required under subsection (3)(a), does not successfully complete their educator preparation program, or does not meet the work requirement described in subsection (7), any amount received from funds under this section converts to a 0% interest loan that must be repaid to this state within 10 years, plus any deferment period as determined and approved by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. treasury. The amount of repayment must be reduced proportionate to the number of years worked in schools or qualifying public preschool programs in this state as a certificated teacher out of 5 years. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential treasury shall develop guidance to enforce this subsection. (9) An individual may not concurrently receive funding through programs funded under this section and grow your own programs funded under section 27b. (10) If the amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully fund awards under this section, there is appropriated from the educator fellowship public provider fund in section 27d or the educator fellowship private provider fund in section 27e, as applicable, the amount necessary to fully fund these programs. The state budget director shall provide notification to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on K to 12 school aid and the house and senate fiscal agencies for any additional appropriation described under this subsection. (11) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential treasury shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.treasury. (12) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential treasury shall report to the chairpersons of the house appropriations subcommittee on school aid and education and the senate appropriations subcommittee on pre-K to 12 by February 1 of the current fiscal year. The report must include the following: (a) The number and amount of awards granted in the previous fiscal year. (b) The number of recipients in the previous fiscal year that had their awards converted to loans under subsection (8). (13) As used in this section, "eligible educator preparation program" means a public or nonpublic institution of higher education or an alternative route provider that meets all of the following, as applicable: (a) Is approved by the department to offer teacher preparation programming. (b) Enrolls 1 or more future educator fellowship recipients. (c) Has not been deemed as ineligible to receive Michigan achievement scholarship funding under section 248 as a result of exceeding tuition restraint requirements described in section 248. Sec. 27c. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $30,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 and from the educator fellowship public provider general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $20,000,000.00 $2,500,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the MI future educator student teacher stipend program. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the funds allocated under this section must be paid to eligible educator preparation programs for payments to eligible student teachers working in a district. public school or nonpublic school. At the close of the fiscal year, state school aid fund money allocated funds under this section that is are unspent must be deposited as follows: (a) For state school aid fund money, into the educator fellowship public provider fund in section 27d. (b) For general fund money, into the educator fellowship private provider fund in section 27e. (2) An eligible student teacher under this subsection must meet all of the following: (a) The individual must be admitted to an eligible educator preparation program, be working toward a teacher certification, be participating in required student teaching coursework, and be maintaining satisfactory academic progress. As used in this subdivision, "required student teaching coursework" means credit hours, or the program equivalent, required by an eligible educator preparation program for successful completion of the program. This coursework must include regular placement in a district public school or nonpublic school where the student gains real-world, first-hand experience working in a classroom, teaching students, engaging in the day-to-day activities of a certified teacher, and working daily under the guidance of a certified teacher. (b) The individual must timely complete an application in a form and manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. treasury. The application must include the district public school or nonpublic school in which the individual is working as a student teacher and must include a certification by the district and the individual's eligible educator preparation program that the student is working as a student teacher. If the individual's eligible educator preparation program is not provided by a public institution of higher education, the district in which the individual is working must also provide an assurance that they will forward any amount received under this section from the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential for purposes of the program described in this section to the individual's eligible educator preparation program. (c) The individual must not have received a payment from funds under this subsection previously, unless the individual is enrolled in an eligible educator preparation program that requires multiple semesters of student teaching. (d) If an individual is employed by their district public school or nonpublic school as a teacher of record, they are not eligible for payment under this section. (e) An individual that is a current City Year corps member enrolled in an eligible educator preparation program is eligible for payment under this section. (3) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential treasury shall pay each eligible educator preparation program an amount not to exceed $9,600.00 per academic semester for each eligible student teacher working in a district. If the individual's eligible educator preparation program is not provided by a public institution of higher education, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall pay an amount not to exceed $9,600.00 per academic semester to the district in which the individual is working as a student teacher, and that district must forward the amount received to the individual's eligible educator preparation program. public school or nonpublic school. If funding allocated under this section is insufficient to fully fund all eligible student teachers, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential treasury shall first award funding for eligible student teachers who are also Pell grant recipients and then shall distribute funding in the order in which applications were received. It is intended that payments under this subsection are made at the beginning of the semester in 1 lump sum for eligible student teachers. (4) Eligible educator preparation programs shall pay funds received under this section, in entirety, to the eligible student teacher. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential treasury shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential.treasury. (6) If the amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully fund awards under this section, there is appropriated from the educator fellowship public provider fund in section 27d or the educator fellowship private provider fund in section 27e, as applicable, the amount necessary to fully fund the programs described in this section. The state budget director shall notify the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on K to 12 school aid and the house and senate fiscal agencies of any additional appropriation described in this subsection. (7) As used in this section, "eligible educator preparation program" means an institution of higher education that meets all of the following: (a) Is a public or private institution of higher education in this state. (b) Has an established school of education with an educator preparation program approved by the department. (c) Has not been deemed as ineligible to receive Michigan achievement scholarship funding under section 248 as a result of exceeding tuition restraint requirements described in section 248. Sec. 27k. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, $225,000,000.00 is allocated for 2023-2024 and $24,400,000.00 is allocated for 2024-2025 only to districts and intermediate districts for the purposes under this section. From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, $600,000.00 is allocated for 2024-2025 only to the department to contract with a vendor and for administrative costs related to this section. (2) For 2023-2024, to receive funding under this section, a district or intermediate district must apply for the funding in a form and manner prescribed by the department. (3) For 2023-2024, a district or intermediate district that receives funding under this section shall use the funding only to implement a student loan repayment program in accordance with guidelines issued by the department. The guidelines must include all of the following criteria: (a) A system through which the district or intermediate district verifies all of the following: (i) That each eligible participant owes federal student loans. (ii) That each eligible participant is eligible for the federal public service loan forgiveness program and is under, pursuant to federal law, a payment plan that makes eligible payments toward federal public service loan forgiveness. (iii) That each eligible participant is enrolled in an income-driven repayment plan. Participants may be exempt from this requirement if their loan is not eligible for income-driven repayment. (b) A requirement that each eligible participant shall receive up to $200.00 per month , or, if the eligible participant is employed in a district that is assigned to band 6 in the opportunity index, as described in section 31a, up to $400.00 per month, for the duration of the program or the total amount of the eligible participant's monthly federal student loan payment, as verified under subdivision (a), whichever is less. As used in this subdivision, "band 6" means the district has an opportunity index, as calculated under section 31a, that is greater than or equal to 85. (c) A requirement that payments to eligible participants through the program must be made in equal amounts on a monthly basis. (d) A requirement that an eligible participant must only receive funding through the program if the eligible participant continues to meet the criteria of an eligible participant. (e) A requirement that an eligible participant annually, or, if the participant leaves the program, on the date the participant leaves the program, certifies to the district or intermediate district that the eligible participant made payments toward the eligible participant's federal student loan with the funding received under this section. (f) A requirement that the eligible participant certifies to the district or intermediate district any increases or decreases in the participant's monthly payment toward the eligible participant's federal student loan. (4) By not later than October 1, 2024, the department shall contract with a vendor to implement an online portal that allows eligible participants to apply to participate in a student loan repayment program. The portal described in this subsection must be made available at no cost to each applicant and must require each applicant to submit and verify all of the following information: (a) That the applicant owes federal student loans. (b) The monthly payment amount of the applicant's eligible federal student loan. (c) That the applicant is eligible for the federal public service loan forgiveness program and is under, pursuant to federal law, a payment plan that makes eligible payments toward federal public service loan forgiveness. (d) That the applicant is enrolled in an income-driven repayment plan. Applicants may be exempt from this requirement if their loan is not eligible for income-driven repayment. (e) A certification that the applicant understands that the applicant may receive funding through the student loan repayment program only if the applicant continues to meet the criteria of an eligible participant. (f) An annual certification, or, if an eligible participant leaves the program, a certification on the date the eligible participant leaves the program, to the department that the eligible participant made payments toward the eligible participant's federal student loans with the funding received under this section. (g) A certification to the department of any increases or decreases in the eligible participant's monthly payment toward the eligible participant's federal student loans. The eligible participant must recertify the eligible participant's monthly payment amount annually if the monthly payment amount does not change. (h) A certification that the applicant has not received funding under this section during the fiscal year in which the applicant is applying. (5) For 2024-2025, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the application in subsection (4) must be submitted directly by the individual who is applying to participate in a student loan repayment program or by that individual's bargaining unit. If the individual who is applying to participate in a student loan repayment program is unable to submit the application due to a disability, another individual may submit the application on the applicant's behalf. (6) For 2024-2025, each eligible participant shall receive up to $200.00 per month , or, if the eligible participant is employed in a district that is assigned to band 6 in the opportunity index, as described in section 31a, up to $400.00 per month, for the duration of the program, or the total amount of the eligible participant's monthly federal student loan payment, as verified under subsection (4), whichever is less. As used in this subdivision, "band 6" means the district has an opportunity index, as calculated under section 31a, that is greater than or equal to 85. (7) The department shall make payments to the district or intermediate district that employs each eligible participant. For 2023-2024, the department shall provide to each district or intermediate district the eligible payment amounts for each eligible participant in the district or intermediate district. For 2024-2025, the eligible vendor described in subsection (4) shall provide the department and each district or intermediate district the eligible payment amounts for each eligible participant in the district or intermediate district. The district or intermediate district that receives payments under this section shall certify that the district or intermediate district will make payments to eligible participants in the amounts provided by the department or the eligible vendor described in subsection (4) under this subsection on a monthly basis, in the amounts specified. (8) An eligible participant remains eligible, unless otherwise provided under federal law or other state laws, for student loans even though the eligible participant receives funding from the money allocated under this section. (9) Payments to an eligible participant by districts or intermediate districts under this section must be made for no more than 10 years or until the eligible participant's federal student loan is paid off, whichever occurs earlier. (10) The funds allocated under this section for 2023-2024 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2023-2024 are carried forward into 2024-2025. The purpose of the work project is to continue support for federal student loan repayment programs as described in this section. The estimated completion date of the work project is December 31, 2026. (11) For 2023-2024, if the amount allocated under this section is insufficient to fully make payments to all eligible participants as required under this section, the department shall prorate the amount paid to districts and intermediate districts to distribute to all eligible participants on an equal basis. For 2024-2025, if the amount allocated under this section is insufficient to fully make payments to all eligible participants as required under this section, the department shall do both of the following: (a) Make full payments to eligible participants for as many months as possible given the remaining funds. (b) Prorate the amount paid to all eligible participants on an equal basis. (12) At the close of each fiscal year, unspent funds from state sources allocated under this section must be deposited into the student loan repayment assistance reserve fund created in section 27j. (13) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (14) As used in this section: (a) "At-risk pupil" means that term as defined in section 31a. (b) "Eligible participant" means either of the following, as applicable: (i) For 2023-2024, an individual who is participating in a federal student loan repayment program described in subsection (3) and who is working 32 hours or more per week at a district or intermediate district in a role in which the individual works directly with pre-K to 12 students, including, but not limited to, educators, counselors, social workers, psychologists, reading specialists, librarians, and school administrators who work directly with students. (ii) For 2024-2025, an individual who is participating in a federal student loan repayment program described in subsection (4), who is working 32 hours or more per week at a district or intermediate district, and who works not less than 50% of the individual's weekly scheduled hours in a role in which the individual works directly with pre-K to 12 students, including, but not limited to, educators, counselors, social workers, psychologists, reading specialists, librarians, and school administrators who work directly with students. Sec. 29. (1) The enrollment stabilization fund is created as a separate account in the state school aid fund for the purpose of stabilizing the effects of declining enrollment. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the enrollment stabilization fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the enrollment stabilization fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the enrollment stabilization fund interest and earnings from enrollment stabilization fund investments. (3) Money in the enrollment stabilization fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the enrollment stabilization fund and does not lapse to the state school aid fund or the general fund. (4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the enrollment stabilization fund for auditing purposes. (5) Money available in the enrollment stabilization fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation. (6) From the enrollment stabilization fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $71,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 for districts and intermediate districts for which membership in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as calculated under section 6 in the immediately preceding fiscal year, exceeds membership in the current fiscal year, as calculated under section 6 in the current fiscal year. (7) The allocation under subsection (6) must be an amount equal to the sum of the product of .50 and the district's or intermediate district's membership for the immediately preceding fiscal year, as calculated under section 6 of the immediately preceding fiscal year, and the product of .50 and the district's or intermediate district's membership in the current fiscal year, as calculated under section 6 of the current fiscal year, minus the district's or intermediate district's membership in the current fiscal year, as calculated under section 6 of the current fiscal year, multiplied by the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year. (6) For 2025-2026, the full amount of the enrollment stabilization fund, estimated at $193,550,000.00, shall be deposited into the school aid fund. Sec. 30e. (1) The school meals reserve fund is created as a separate account in the state school aid fund for the purpose of covering the cost of student school meals. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the school meals reserve fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the school meals reserve fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the school meals reserve fund interest and earnings from school meals reserve fund investments. (3) Money in the school meals reserve fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the school meals reserve fund and does not lapse to the state school aid fund or the general fund. (4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the school meals reserve fund for auditing purposes. (5) Money available in the school meals reserve fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation. (6) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2023 only, $245,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund is deposited into the school meals reserve fund. (7) At the close of each fiscal year, unspent funds from state sources allocated in sections 30d, 31d, and 31f must be deposited into the school meals reserve fund. (6) For 2025-2026, the full amount of the school meals reserve fund, estimated at $122,950,000.00, shall be deposited into the school aid fund. Sec. 31a. (1) There is allocated for 2023-2024 an amount not to exceed $1,035,150,000.00 from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 and an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, and there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $1,078,074,000.00 from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 and an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 from the general fund money appropriated in section 11 for payments to eligible districts and eligible public school academies for the purposes of ensuring that pupils are proficient in English language arts by the end of grade 3, that pupils are proficient in mathematics by the end of grade 8, that pupils are attending school regularly, that high school graduates are career and college ready, and for the purposes under subsections (6) and (7). , (8), (23), and (24). (2) For a district or public school academy to be eligible to receive funding under this section, other than funding under subsection (6) or (7), (8), (23), or (24), the district or public school academy, for grades K to 12, must comply with the requirements under section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f, and must use resources to address early literacy and numeracy, and for at least grades K to 12 or, if the district or public school academy does not operate all of grades K to 12, for all of the grades it operates, must implement a multi-tiered system of supports that is an evidence-based framework that uses data driven problem solving to integrate academic and behavioral instruction and that uses intervention delivered to all pupils in varying intensities based on pupil needs. The multi-tiered system of supports described in this subsection must provide at least all of the following essential components: (a) Team-based leadership. (b) A tiered delivery system. (c) Selection and implementation of instruction, interventions, and supports. (d) A comprehensive screening and assessment system. (e) Continuous data-based decision making. (3) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2023-2024 an amount not to exceed $952,000,000.00, and there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $1,034,924,000.00 to continue a weighted foundation per pupil per-pupil payment for districts and public school academies enrolling economically disadvantaged pupils. The department shall pay under this subsection to each eligible district or eligible public school academy an amount per pupil equal to a percentage calculated under subsection (4) multiplied by 11.5% of the target foundation allowance for the following, as applicable: (a) Except as otherwise provided under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) the greater of the following: (i) The number of membership pupils in the district or public school academy who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day of the immediately preceding fiscal year. (ii) If the district or public school academy is in the community eligibility program, the number of pupils determined to be eligible based on the product of the identified student percentage multiplied by the total number of pupils in the district or public school academy, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day of the immediately preceding fiscal year. These calculations must be made at the building level. This subparagraph only applies to an eligible district or eligible public school academy for the fiscal year immediately following the first fiscal year in which it is in the community eligibility program. As used in this subparagraph, "identified student percentage" means the quotient of the number of pupils in an eligible district or eligible public school academy who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in a form and manner prescribed by the center, not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day in the fiscal year preceding the first fiscal year in which the eligible district or eligible public school academy is in the community eligibility program, divided by the total number of pupils counted in an eligible district or eligible public school academy on the pupil membership count day in the fiscal year preceding the first fiscal year in which the eligible district or eligible public school academy is in the community eligibility program. (b) If the district or public school academy began operations as a district or public school academy after the pupil membership count day of the immediately preceding school year, the number of membership pupils in the district or public school academy who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day of the current fiscal year. (c) If the district or public school academy began operations as a district or public school academy after the pupil membership count day of the current fiscal year, the number of membership pupils in the district or public school academy who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the supplemental count day of the current fiscal year. (d) If, for a particular fiscal year, the number of membership pupils in a district or public school academy who are determined under subdivision (a) to be economically disadvantaged or to be eligible based on the identified student percentage varies by more than 20 percentage points from the number of those pupils in the district or public school academy as calculated under subdivision (a) for the immediately preceding fiscal year caused by an egregious reporting error by the district or public school academy, the department may choose to have the calculations under subdivision (a) instead be made using the number of membership pupils in the district or public school academy who are determined to be economically disadvantaged, as reported to the center in the form and manner prescribed by the center not later than the fifth Wednesday after the supplemental count day of the immediately preceding fiscal year. (e) If there are funds remaining under this subsection after the allocations in subdivision (a), the department shall pay the remaining funds to each eligible district or eligible public school academy in an amount proportional to the allocation received in subdivision (a). (4) Each district or public school academy must be assigned an opportunity index score each fiscal year, the value of which is the quotient of the number of economically disadvantaged pupils as determined under subsection (3) for the district or public school academy and the total number of pupils in the district or public school academy in the immediately preceding fiscal year, multiplied by 100 and rounded up to the nearest whole number. Each district or public school academy must be assigned an opportunity index band as follows: (a) A district or public school academy with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 0 but less than 20 must be assigned to band 1 and shall receive reimbursement under subsection (3) at a rate of at least 35.0% and less than 36.0%. The reimbursement rate under this subdivision must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity index score minus 1, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus 35.0%. (b) A district or public school academy with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 20 but less than 44 must be assigned to band 2 and shall receive reimbursement under subsection (3) at a rate of at least 36.0% and less than 37.5%. The reimbursement rate under this subdivision must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity index score minus 20, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus 36.0%. (c) A district or public school academy with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 44 but less than 59 must be assigned to band 3 and shall receive reimbursement under subsection (3) at a rate of at least 37.5% and less than 39.0%. The reimbursement rate under this subdivision must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity index score minus 44, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus 37.5%. (d) A district or public school academy with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 59 but less than 73 must be assigned to band 4 and shall receive reimbursement under subsection (3) at a rate of at least 39.0% and less than 42.0%. The reimbursement rate under this subdivision must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity index score minus 59, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus 39.0%. (e) A district or public school academy with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 73 but less than 85 must be assigned to band 5 and shall receive reimbursement under subsection (3) at a rate of at least 42.0% and less than 47.0%. The reimbursement rate under this subdivision must be an amount equal to the district's opportunity index score minus 73, multiplied by the band adjustment factor applicable to this subdivision, plus 42.0%. (f) A district or public school academy with an opportunity index score greater than or equal to 85 must be assigned to band 6 and shall receive reimbursement under subsection (3) at a rate of 47.0%. (g) As used in this subsection, "band adjustment factor" means an amount equal to the difference between the lowest and highest reimbursement bounds for each band, divided by the number of possible opportunity index scores in that band. (4) (5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a district or public school academy receiving funding under this section shall use that money only to provide instructional programs and direct noninstructional services, including, but not limited to, medical, mental health, or counseling services, for at-risk pupils; for school health clinics; and for the purposes of subsection (5), (6), or (7). , (8), (23), or (24). In addition, a district that is a school district of the first class or a district or public school academy in which at least 50% of the pupils in membership were determined to be economically disadvantaged in the immediately preceding state fiscal year, as determined and reported as described in subsection (3), may use the funds it receives under this section for school security or school parent liaison personnel. The uses of the funds described in the immediately preceding sentence must align to the needs assessment and the multi-tiered system of supports model and, for funds spent on parent liaison personnel, must connect parents to the school community. A district or public school academy shall not use any of the money received under this section for administrative costs. The instruction or direct noninstructional services provided under this section may be conducted before or after regular school hours or by adding extra school days to the school year. (5) (6) A district or public school academy that receives funds under this section and that operates a school breakfast program under section 1272a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1272a, shall use from the funds received under this section an amount, not to exceed $10.00 per pupil for whom the district or public school academy receives funds under this section, necessary to pay for costs associated with the operation of the school breakfast program. (6) (7) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2023-2024 an amount not to exceed $33,000,000.00, and there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $33,000,000.00 to support primary health care services provided to children and adolescents up to age 21. These funds must be expended in a form and manner determined jointly by the department and the department of health and human services. When making funding decisions for new adolescent health centers under this subsection, the department and department of health and human services shall prioritize support for primary health care services in unserved and underserved counties as determined by the department of health and human services. For 2023-2024, an amount not to exceed 4% of the funds allocated for 2023-2024 under this subsection, and for 2024-2025, an An amount equal to 4% of the funds allocated for 2024-2025 under this subsection must be made available for technical support and coordination services from a nonprofit organization exclusively dedicated to serving adolescent health centers in this state and that has a membership that includes federally qualified health centers, local public health departments, hospital systems, and public school districts. As a requirement of being awarded the funds under this subsection as prescribed under this subsection, a nonprofit organization described in this subsection shall make readily available technical support and coordination services to all child and adolescent health centers in this state. Funds appropriated under this subsection for 2023-2024 only are a work project appropriation and any unexpended funds for 2023-2024 are carried forward into 2024-2025. The purpose of the work project is to continue to improve child and adolescent health center program sites and improve delivery of patient care. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2025. (7) (8) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2023-2024 an amount not to exceed $5,150,000.00 and for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $10,150,000.00 for the state portion of the hearing and vision screenings as described in part 93 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9301 to 333.9329, and, from the general fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2023-2024 an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 and for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $1,500,000.00 for the state portion of the dental screenings as described in part 93 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9301 to 333.9329. A local public health department shall pay at least 50% of the total cost of the screenings. The frequency of the vision screenings must be as required under R 325.13091 to R 325.13096 of the Michigan Administrative Code and the frequency of the hearing screenings must be as required under R 325.3271 to R 325.3276 of the Michigan Administrative Code. Funds must be awarded in a form and manner approved jointly by the department and the department of health and human services. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments to eligible entities under this subsection on a schedule determined by the department. (8) (9) Each district or public school academy receiving funds under this section shall submit to the department by July 15 of each fiscal year a report, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, that includes a brief description of each program conducted or services performed by the district or public school academy using funds under this section, the amount of funds under this section allocated to each of those programs or services, the total number of at-risk pupils served by each of those programs or services, and the data necessary for the department and the department of health and human services to verify matching funds for the temporary assistance for needy families program. In prescribing the form and manner of the report, the department shall ensure that districts are allowed to expend funds received under this section on any activities that are permissible under this section. If a district or public school academy does not comply with this subsection, the department shall withhold an amount equal to the August payment due under this section until the district or public school academy complies with this subsection. If the district or public school academy does not comply with this subsection by the end of the fiscal year, the withheld funds are forfeited to the school aid fund. (9) (10) To receive funds under this section, a district or public school academy must allow access for the department or the department's designee to audit all records related to the program for which it receives those funds. The district or public school academy shall reimburse the state for all disallowances found in the audit. (10) (11) Subject to subsections (5), (6), and (7), (8), (23), and (24), for schools in which more than 40% of pupils are identified as at-risk, a district or public school academy may use the funds it receives under this section to implement tier 1, evidence-based practices in schoolwide reforms that are guided by the district's comprehensive needs assessment and are included in the district improvement plan. Schoolwide reforms must include parent and community supports, activities, and services, that may include the pathways to potential program created by the department of health and human services or the communities in schools program. As used in this subsection, "tier 1, evidence-based practices" means research based instruction and classroom interventions that are available to all learners and effectively meet the needs of most pupils. (11) (12) A district or public school academy that receives funds under this section may use those funds to provide research based professional development and to implement a coaching model that supports the multi-tiered system of supports framework. Professional development may be provided to district and school leadership and teachers and must be aligned to professional learning standards; integrated into district, school building, and classroom practices; and solely related to the following: (a) Implementing the multi-tiered system of supports required in subsection (2) with fidelity and utilizing the data from that system to inform curriculum and instruction. (b) Implementing section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f, as required under subsection (2), with fidelity. (12) (13) A district or public school academy that receives funds under subsection (3) may use funds received under subsection (3) for support staff providing services to at-risk pupils. (13) (14) Beginning in 2024-2025, a A district or public school academy may use up to 60% of the funds it receives under this section for the following purposes: (a) Up to 30% to reduce the teacher to pupil ratio in grades K to 3 in schools for which the percentage of pupils in membership who were determined to be economically disadvantaged in the immediately preceding fiscal year is equal to or greater than the minimum percentage for a district or public school academy to be assigned to opportunity index band 5.73%. (b) Up to 30% to support retention and recruitment efforts that help reduce staff turnover and vacancies of instructional and support staff if the district or public school academy is assigned to opportunity index band 5 or 6.has a percentage of pupils in membership who were determined to be economically disadvantaged in the immediately preceding fiscal year equal to or greater than 73%. (14) (15) Funds used as described in subsection (14) (13) must align with the needs assessment and the multi-tiered system of supports model. A district or public school academy shall not use any of the money described in subsection (14) (13) for administrative costs or to supplant existing funding, including, but not limited to, maintaining existing salaries or costs. A district or public school academy shall report its intent to use funds described in subsection (14) (13) to the department by not later than November 1 of the current fiscal year. (15) (16) A district or public school academy determined to be eligible to use a portion of funds received under subsection (3) for the purposes described in subsection (14) (13) retains the ability to use funding for the purposes described in subsection (14) (13) for the fiscal year in which eligibility was determined plus 2 additional fiscal years beyond that fiscal year. (16) (17) By August 1 of each fiscal year, the department must provide a report to districts and public school academies that lists the eligible schools under subsection (14)(a) (13)(a) for the upcoming fiscal year. (17) (18) A district or public school academy that receives funds under this section may use up to 10% of the funds received under this section to provide evidence-based instruction for pre-kindergarten instructional and noninstructional services to children who meet at least 1 of the criteria in subsection (25)(a)(i) to (x).(22)(a)(i) to (ix). (18) (19) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if necessary, the department shall prorate payments under this section, except payments under subsection (6) or (7), (8), (23), or (24), by reducing the amount of the allocation as otherwise calculated under this section by an equal percentage per district. Subject to the availability of funds, if proration is necessary under this subsection, the department must ensure that no district receives an amount less than 11.5% of the target foundation for each economically disadvantaged pupil enrolled in the district. (19) (20) If a district is dissolved pursuant to section 12 of the revised school code, MCL 380.12, the intermediate district to which the dissolved district was constituent shall determine the estimated number of pupils that are economically disadvantaged and that are enrolled in each of the other districts within the intermediate district and provide that estimate to the department for the purposes of distributing funds under this section within 60 days after the district is declared dissolved. (20) (21) A district or public school academy that receives funds under this section may use funds received under this section to provide an anti-bullying or crisis intervention program. (21) (22) The department shall collaborate with the department of health and human services to prioritize assigning Pathways to Potential success coaches to elementary schools that have a high percentage of pupils in grades K to 3 who are not proficient in English language arts, based upon state assessments for pupils in those grades. (23) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2023-2024 only an amount not to exceed $35,000,000.00 to support primary health care services provided to children and adolescents up to age 21 and for the provision of space upgrades in child and adolescent health center programs. All of the following apply to this allocation: (a) The funds must be used for only the following purposes: (i) Modernizing antiquated medical equipment. (ii) Improving security and patient safety measures. (iii) Investing in new patient-centered technologies. (iv) Renovating physical spaces to improve patient privacy and the care setting. (b) The funds must be expended in a form and manner determined jointly by the department and the department of health and human services. (c) To be eligible to receive funding under this subsection, a child and adolescent health center program that serves students in the current fiscal year must submit an application in a form and manner determined by the department and the department of health and human services. (d) An amount equal to 4% of the funds allocated for 2023-2024 under this subsection must be made available for technical support and coordination services from a nonprofit organization exclusively dedicated to serving adolescent health centers in this state and that has a membership that includes federally qualified health centers, local public health departments, hospital systems, and public school districts. As a requirement of being awarded the funds under this subsection as prescribed under this subsection, a nonprofit organization described in this subsection shall make readily available technical support and coordination services to all child and adolescent health centers in this state. (e) Funds appropriated under this subsection are a work project appropriation and any unexpended funds for 2023-2024 are carried forward into 2024-2025. The purpose of the work project is to continue to improve child and adolescent health center program sites and improve delivery of patient care. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2025. (24) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2023-2024 only an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 for an electronic patient data and health care analytic system to be made available to each child and adolescent health center program. The department of health and human services shall collaborate on system implementation with a nonprofit organization exclusively dedicated to serving child and adolescent health center programs in this state and that has a membership that includes federally qualified health centers, local public health departments, hospital systems, and public school districts, including, but not limited to, technology assessment, design, coordination, and system implementation with child and adolescent health center programs. Funds appropriated under this subsection are a work project appropriation and any unexpended funds for 2023-2024 are carried forward into 2024-2025. The purpose of the work project is to continue to implement an electronic patient data and health care analytic system. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2028. (22) (25) As used in this section: (a) "At-risk pupil" means a pupil in grades pre-K to 12 for whom the district has documentation that the pupil meets any of the following criteria: (i) The pupil is economically disadvantaged. (ii) The pupil is an English language learner. (iii) The pupil is chronically absent as defined by and reported to the center. (iii) (iv) The pupil is a victim of child abuse or neglect. (iv) (v) The pupil is a pregnant teenager or teenage parent. (v) (vi) The pupil has a family history of school failure, incarceration, or substance abuse. (vi) (vii) The pupil is an immigrant who has immigrated within the immediately preceding 3 years. (vii) (viii) The pupil did not complete high school in 4 years and is still continuing in school as identified in the Michigan cohort graduation and dropout report. (viii) (ix) For pupils for whom the results of the state summative assessment have been received, is a pupil who did not achieve proficiency on the English language arts, mathematics, science, or social studies content area assessment. (ix) (x) Is a pupil who is at risk of not meeting the district's or public school academy's core academic curricular objectives in English language arts or mathematics, as demonstrated on local assessments. (b) "Economically disadvantaged" means a pupil who has been determined eligible for free or reduced-price meals as determined under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j; who is in a household receiving supplemental nutrition assistance program or temporary assistance for needy families assistance; or who is homeless, migrant, or in foster care, as reported to the center. (c) "English language learner" means limited English proficient pupils who speak a language other than English as their primary language and have difficulty speaking, reading, writing, or understanding English as reported to the center. Sec. 31d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $29,553,400.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purpose of making payments to districts and other eligible entities under this section. (2) The amounts allocated from state sources under this section are used to pay the amount necessary to reimburse districts for 6.0127% of the necessary costs of the state mandated portion of lunch programs provided by those districts. The department shall calculate the amount due to each district under this section using the methods of calculation adopted by the Michigan supreme court in the consolidated cases known as Durant v State of Michigan, 456 Mich 175 (1997). (3) The payments made under this section include all state payments made to districts so that each district receives at least 6.0127% of the necessary costs of operating the state mandated portion of the lunch program in a fiscal year. (4) The payments made under this section to districts and other eligible entities that are not required under section 1272a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1272a, to provide a lunch program must be in an amount not to exceed $10.00 per eligible pupil plus 5 cents for each free lunch and 2 cents for each reduced price lunch provided, as determined by the department. (5) From the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 all available federal funding, estimated at $901,400,000.00 $908,400,000.00 for child nutrition programs and, for 2024-2025, 2025-2026, all available federal funding, estimated at $15,000,000.00, for food distribution programs. (6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments to eligible entities other than districts under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (7) In purchasing food for a lunch program funded under this section, a district or other eligible entity shall give preference to food that is grown or produced by Michigan businesses if it is competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 31f. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $16,900,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purpose of making payments to districts to reimburse for the cost of providing breakfast. (2) The funds allocated under this section for school breakfast programs are made available to all eligible applicant districts that meet all of the following criteria: (a) The district participates in the federal school breakfast program and meets all standards as prescribed by 7 CFR parts 210, 220, 225, 226, and 245. (b) Each breakfast eligible for payment meets the federal standards described in subdivision (a). (3) The payment for a district under this section is at a per meal rate equal to the lesser of the district's actual cost or 100% of the statewide average cost of a meal served, as determined and approved by the department, less federal reimbursement, participant payments, and state breakfast reimbursements received under section 30d. The department shall determine the statewide average cost using costs as reported in a manner approved by the department for the preceding school year. (4) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department may make payments under this section pursuant to an agreement with the department. (5) In purchasing food for a school breakfast program funded under this section, a district shall give preference to food that is grown or produced by Michigan businesses if it is competitively priced and of comparable quality. Sec. 31n. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purposes of this section an amount not to exceed $106,545,000.00 and from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purposes of this section an amount not to exceed $1,300,000.00. The department and the department of health and human services shall continue a program to distribute this funding to add licensed behavioral health providers for general education pupils, and recipients of the funds under subsection (6) shall continue to seek federal Medicaid match funding for all eligible mental health and support services. (2) The department and the department of health and human services shall maintain an advisory council for programs funded under this section and any other funding under this act to improve or maintain the mental health of students, except for programs funded under section 31a(7) and (8). The advisory council shall define goals for implementation of programs, and shall provide feedback on that implementation. At a minimum, the advisory council shall consist of representatives of state associations representing school health, school mental health, school counseling, education, health care, and other organizations, representatives from the department and the department of health and human services, and a representative from the school safety and mental health commission. The department and department of health and human services, working with the advisory council, shall determine an approach to increase capacity for mental health and support services in schools for general education pupils, and shall determine where that increase in capacity qualifies for federal Medicaid match funding. (3) The advisory council shall develop a fiduciary agent checklist for intermediate districts to facilitate development of a plan to submit to the department and to the department of health and human services. The department and department of health and human services shall determine the requirements and format for intermediate districts to submit a plan for possible funding under subsection (6). The department shall make applications for funding for this program available to districts and intermediate districts by not later than December 1 of each fiscal year for which funds are allocated under this section and shall award the funding by not later than February 1 of each fiscal year for which funds are allocated under this section. (4) The department of health and human services shall amend the state Medicaid plan to obtain appropriate Medicaid waivers as necessary for the purpose of generating additional Medicaid match funding for school mental health and support services for general education pupils, and this expansion is called Caring for Students (C4S). (5) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $14,300,000.00 to be distributed to the network of child and adolescent health centers to place a licensed master's level behavioral health provider in schools that do not currently have services available to general education students. Child and adolescent health centers that are part of the network described in this subsection shall provide a commitment to maintain services and implement all available federal Medicaid match methodologies. The department of health and human services shall use all existing or additional federal Medicaid match opportunities to maximize funding allocated under this subsection. The department shall provide funds under this subsection to child and adolescent health centers that are part of the network described in this subsection in the same proportion that funding under section 31a(7) is provided to child and adolescent health centers that are part of the network described in this subsection and that are located and operating in those districts. A payment from funding allocated under this subsection must not be paid to an entity that is not part of the network described in this subsection. (6) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $87,245,000.00 to be distributed to intermediate districts for the provision of mental health and support services to general education students. Recipients of funds under this subsection shall continue to seek federal Medicaid match funding for all eligible mental health and support services. If a district or intermediate district is not able to procure the services of a licensed master's level behavioral health provider, the district or intermediate district shall notify the department and the department of health and human services and, if the department and department of health and human services verify that the district or intermediate district attempted to procure services from a master's level behavioral health provider and was not able to do so, then the district or intermediate district may instead procure services from a provider with less than a master's degree in behavioral health. To be able to use the exemption in the immediately preceding sentence, the district or intermediate district must submit evidence satisfactory to the department and department of health and human services demonstrating that the district or intermediate district took measures to procure the services of a licensed master's level behavioral health provider but was unable to do so, and the department and department of health and human services must be able to verify this evidence. From the first $56,173,600.00 of the funds allocated under this subsection, the department shall distribute up to $1,003,100.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to each intermediate district that submits a plan approved by the department and the department of health and human services by February 1 of each fiscal year for which funds are allocated under this section. The department shall distribute the remaining $31,071,400.00 of the funds allocated under this subsection for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to intermediate districts on an equal per-pupil basis based on the combined total number of pupils in membership in the intermediate district and its constituent districts, including public school academies that are considered to be constituent districts under section 705(7) of the revised school code, MCL 380.705. The department and department of health and human services shall work cooperatively in providing oversight and assistance to intermediate districts and shall monitor the program upon implementation. An intermediate district shall use funds awarded under this subsection to provide funding to its constituent districts, including public school academies that are considered to be constituent districts under section 705(7) of the revised school code, MCL 380.705, for the provision of mental health and support services to general education students. In addition to the criteria identified under subsection (9), an intermediate district shall consider geography, cost, or other challenges when awarding funding to its constituent districts. Districts receiving funding under this subsection are encouraged to provide suicide prevention and awareness education and counseling. (7) If funding awarded to an intermediate district remains after funds are provided by the intermediate district to its constituent districts, the intermediate district shall notify the department and department of health and human services and submit evidence satisfactory to the department and department of health and human services demonstrating how it would like to use funds for purposes other than hiring licensed behavioral health providers for general education pupils. With permission from the department and department of health and human services, the intermediate district may hire or contract for experts to provide mental health and support services to general education students residing within the boundaries of the intermediate district, including, but not limited to, expanding, hiring, or contracting for staff and experts to provide those services directly or to increase access to those services through coordination with outside mental health agencies; the intermediate district may also contract with 1 or more other intermediate districts for coordination and the facilitation of activities related to providing mental health and support services to general education students residing within the boundaries of the intermediate district; the intermediate district may also use the funds under this section to create or strengthen school-based behavioral health assessment teams that focus on providing age-appropriate interventions, identifying behaviors that suggest a pupil may be struggling with mental health challenges, providing treatment and support of the pupil, and using disciplinary interventions and the criminal justice system as methods of last resort; and the intermediate district may also use the funds under this section to provide evidence-based trainings that support student mental health. (8) If funding awarded to an intermediate district under this section remains unspent, or if the intermediate district submits an application requesting a lower allocation than the maximum amount permitted, the department, in conjunction with the intermediate district, may reallocate the funds to another intermediate district or other intermediate districts capable of expending the funds before the funding deadline in accordance with this section as if those funds were originally allocated to the intermediate district or intermediate districts to which the funds are being reallocated. (9) A district requesting funds under this section from the intermediate district in which it is located shall submit an application for funding for the provision of mental health and support services to general education pupils. A district receiving funding from the application process described in this subsection shall provide services to nonpublic students upon request. An intermediate district shall not discriminate against an application submitted by a public school academy simply on the basis of the applicant being a public school academy. The department shall approve grant applications based on the following criteria: (a) The district's commitment to maintain mental health and support services delivered by licensed providers into future fiscal years. (b) The district's commitment to work with its intermediate district to use funding it receives under this section that is spent by the district for general education pupils toward participation in federal Medicaid match methodologies. A district must provide a local match of at least 20% of the funding allocated to the district under section 31n. (c) The district's commitment to adhere to any local funding requirements determined by the department and the department of health and human services. (d) The extent of the district's existing partnerships with community health care providers or the ability of the district to establish such partnerships. (e) The district's documentation of need, including gaps in current mental health and support services for the general education population. (f) The district's submission of a formal plan of action identifying the number of schools and students to be served. (g) Whether the district will participate in ongoing trainings. (h) Whether the district will submit an annual report to the state. (i) Whether the district demonstrates a willingness to work with the state to establish program and service delivery benchmarks. (j) Whether the district has developed a school safety plan or is in the process of developing a school safety plan. (k) Any other requirements determined by the department or the department of health and human services. (10) Funding under this section, including any federal Medicaid funds that are generated, must not be used to supplant existing services. (11) Both of the following are allocated to the department of health and human services from the general fund money allocated under subsection (1): (a) For 2024-2025, 2025-2026, an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for the purpose of upgrading technology and systems infrastructure and other administrative requirements to support the programs funded under this section. (b) For 2024-2025, 2025-2026, an amount not to exceed $300,000.00 for the purpose of administering the programs under this section and working on generating additional Medicaid funds as a result of programs funded under this section. (12) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $5,000,000.00 to intermediate districts on an equal per intermediate district basis for the purpose of administering programs funded under this section. Recipients of the funds under this subsection shall continue to seek federal Medicaid match funding for all eligible mental health and support services and participate in all learning collaboratives about C4S required by the department and department of health and human services. (13) The department and the department of health and human services shall work with the advisory council to develop proposed measurements of outcomes and performance. Those measurements must include, at a minimum, the number of pupils served, the number of schools served, and where those pupils and schools were located. The department and the department of health and human services shall compile data necessary to measure outcomes and performance, and districts and intermediate districts receiving funding under this section shall provide data requested by the department and department of health and human services for the measurement of outcomes and performance. The department and department of health and human services shall provide an annual report by not later than December 1 of each year to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid and health and human services, to the house and senate fiscal agencies, and to the state budget director. At a minimum, the report must include measurements of outcomes and performance, proposals to increase efficacy and usefulness, proposals to increase performance, and proposals to expand coverage. (14) A district or intermediate district that receives funding directly or indirectly under this section may carry over any unexpended funds received under this section for up to 2 fiscal years beyond the fiscal year in which the funds were received. Sec. 31aa. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $150,000,000.00 $250,000,000.00 for 2024-2025, 2025-2026, and from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $1,500,000.00 $28,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 only, 2025-2026, to provide payments to districts, intermediate districts, nonpublic schools, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind that opt in and agree to receive funding under this section, for activities to improve student mental health and improve student safety. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2025-2026, 2026-2027, the allocation from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 for purposes described in this section will be $25,000,000.00, and that, for 2025-2026, the allocation from the state school aid fund money and general fund money appropriated in section 11 for purposes described in this section will not be used to make continued payments related to support staff hired or contracted for using funds received under this section. $125,000,000.00, and the allocation from the general fund money appropriated in section 11 for purposes described in this section will be $14,000,000.00. Recipients of funding under this section must use at least 25% of the funds received for activities to improve student safety. The allowable expenditures of funds under this section are as follows: (a) Hiring or contracting for support staff for student mental health needs, including, but not limited to, school psychologists, social workers, counselors, and school nurses. (b) Purchasing and implementing mental health screening tools. (c) Purchasing a statewide, integrated technology platform, such as bhworks, that streamlines behavioral health documentation and care coordination. (d) Providing school-based mental health personnel access to consultation with behavioral health clinicians to respond to complex student mental health needs. (e) Purchasing and implementing an online behavioral health tool moderated and led by licensed behavioral health professionals. (f) Hiring or contracting a behavioral health coordinator. (g) Evidence-based trainings to support mental health. (h) Costs associated with collaboration between school employees, families, and community partners to address the academic, behavioral, and social needs of all students through collaborative partnerships, resource coordination, data collection, and data sharing. (i) Costs associated with conducting a systematic school mental health needs assessment and resource mapping that identifies programmatic and systemic needs and helps staff determine priorities and create action plans. (j) Coordination with local law enforcement. (k) Training for school staff on threat assessment. (l) Training for school staff and students on threat response. (m) Training for school staff on crisis communication. (n) Safety infrastructure, including, but not limited to, cameras, door blocks, hardened vestibules, window screening, and technology necessary to operate buzzer systems. This may also include firearm detection software that integrates to existing security cameras to detect and alert school personnel and first responders to visible firearms on school property. (o) Age-appropriate training for students and families on responsible firearm ownership, including safe handling and safe storage of firearms. (p) School resource officers. (q) Student Safety Management System, the information technology platform and related services to improve student safety by mitigating cyberbullying, school violence, human trafficking, and self-harm that supports students from grades K to 12. (r) A secure platform, administered by the department of state police, for school officials, emergency responders, and emergency management coordinators to house all school safety-related items, including, but not limited to, EOP templates, EOP guidance, reference documents, and security assessments. The platform should use existing password-protected access control methods schools currently utilize and, to the extent possible, be capable of integrating with existing platforms or technologies used by districts for school safety. Through permissions-based access control, the platform should be able to relay information clearly and in real time to each person or entity necessary to provide a unified response to a safety incident, or to take appropriate action in response to an anticipated disruption to the normal functions of the surrounding community. (s) Emergency infrastructure needs to respond to an immediate threat to the health or safety of students and staff in the district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind. A district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind shall not expend funds for this purpose without first obtaining approval from the department. In making a determination of approval, the department shall, at a minimum, assess whether the district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind is responding to an immediate threat to the health or safety of students and staff, and whether the district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind has other sources of funding that should be utilized first. (t) A contract with a vendor for a comprehensive safety and security assessment or a comprehensive safety and security event assessment in schools operated by the district, intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind. (u) An emergency response system. (2) By not later than December 31 of each fiscal year, from the state school aid fund money allocated in subsection (1), the department shall make payments to districts, intermediate districts, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind that opt in and agree to receive funding in an equal amount per pupil based on the total number of pupils in membership in each district, intermediate district, and the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind that opts in and agrees to receive funding. By December 31 of each fiscal year, from the general fund money allocated in subsection (1), the department shall make payments to nonpublic schools that opt in and agree to receive funding in an equal amount per pupil based on the total number of pupils in membership in each nonpublic school that opts in and agrees to receive funding, using pupil counts determined by the department. The department shall ensure that the amount per pupil paid to nonpublic schools does not exceed the amount per pupil paid to districts and intermediate districts. Districts, intermediate districts, the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind, and nonpublic schools may opt in and agree to receive funding in a form and manner determined by the department. (3) Recipients of funding under this section must provide a final expense report to the department by June 1 of each fiscal year. If the department determines that the eligible recipient has misused the funds allocated under this section, the eligible recipient shall reimburse the department for the amount of state funding misused. (4) The department shall use the information received under subsection (3) to compile a report that includes the number of recipients that have hired school resource officers using funds received under this section and any supporting information provided by the recipients. By not later than August 1, 2025, and each August 1 thereafter, the department shall provide the report compiled under this subsection to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, the state budget office, and the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards. (5) Recipients of funding under this section must implement a cellular telephone policy by December 31, 2025, and submit verification to the department that the recipient implemented the cellular telephone policy. If a recipient's cellular telephone policy allows students to use cellular telephones in a classroom, the recipient must include in its verification the justification for that policy. If a recipient has not implemented a cellular telephone policy by December 31, 2025, the recipient shall reimburse the department for the amount of state funding received under this section. (6) (5) Districts receiving funds under this section must coordinate with intermediate districts to avoid duplication of services and to streamline delivery of services to students. (7) (6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (8) (7) As provided under section 18a, recipients may expend funds under this section until the end of the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in which the funds are received. Sec. 32d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated to eligible intermediate districts and consortia of intermediate districts for great start readiness programs an amount not to exceed $609,720,000.00 $603,000,000.00 for 2024-2025. It is the intent of the legislature that this section will support universal great start readiness programs in a future fiscal year. 2025-2026. An intermediate district or consortium shall use funds allocated under this section for great start readiness programs to provide part-day programs, school-day programs, GSRP extended programs, GSRP/Head Start school-day blended programs, or GSRP/Head Start extended blended programs that are comprehensive, free, compensatory classroom programs designed to improve the readiness and subsequent achievement of children who meet the participant eligibility and prioritization guidelines as defined by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. For a child to be eligible to participate in a program under this section, the child must be at least 4, but less than 5, years of age as of September 1 of the school year in which the program is offered and must meet those eligibility and prioritization guidelines. After eligible children who will be 4 years of age as of September 1 are enrolled, a child who is not 4 years of age as of September 1, but who will be 4 years of age by not later than December 1, is eligible to participate if both of the following are met: (a) The child's parent or legal guardian seeks a waiver from the September 1 eligibility date by submitting a request for enrollment in a program to the responsible intermediate district. (b) The child meets eligibility and prioritization guidelines. (2) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), an amount not to exceed $607,720,000.00 $601,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 is allocated to intermediate districts or consortia of intermediate districts based on the formula in section 39. An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving funding under this section shall act as the fiduciary for the great start readiness programs. An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving funding under this section may collaborate with local governments to identify children eligible for programs funded under this section and may contract with local governments to provide services. To be eligible to receive funds allocated under this subsection from an intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts, a district, a consortium of districts, a local government, or a public or private for-profit or nonprofit legal entity or agency must comply with this section and section 39. If, due to the number of GSRP extended program or GSRP/Head Start extended blended program slots awarded, the amount allocated in this subsection is insufficient to award at least the same number of part-day program and school-day program slots as awarded in the immediately preceding fiscal year, there is appropriated from the great start readiness program reserve fund the amount necessary to fully award the same number of part-day program and full-day program slots as awarded in the immediately preceding fiscal year. (3) In addition to the allocation under subsection (1), from the general fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $600,000.00 $350,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for a competitive grant to continue a longitudinal evaluation of children who have participated in great start readiness programs. It is the intent of the legislature that the allocation under this subsection will be $350,000.00 for 2025-2026. (4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), to be eligible for funding under this section, a program must prepare children for success in school through comprehensive part-day programs, school-day programs, GSRP extended programs, GSRP/Head Start school-day blended programs, or GSRP/Head Start extended blended programs that contain all of the following program components, as determined by the department: of lifelong education, advancement, and potential: (a) Participation in a collaborative recruitment and enrollment process to ensure that each child is enrolled in the program most appropriate to the child's needs and to maximize the use of federal, state, and local funds. (b) An age-appropriate educational curriculum that is in compliance with the early childhood standards of quality for prekindergarten children adopted by the state board, including, at least, the Connect4Learning curriculum. (c) Nutritional services for all program participants supported by federal, state, and local resources as applicable. (d) Physical and dental health and developmental screening services for all program participants. (e) Referral services for families of program participants to community social service agencies, including mental health services, as appropriate. (f) Active and continuous involvement of the parents or guardians of the program participants. (g) A plan to conduct and report annual great start readiness program evaluations and continuous improvement plans using criteria approved by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (h) Participation in a school readiness advisory committee convened as a workgroup of the great start collaborative that provides for the involvement of classroom teachers, parents or guardians of program participants, and community, volunteer, and social service agencies and organizations, as appropriate. The advisory committee shall annually review and make recommendations regarding the program components listed in this subsection. The advisory committee also shall make recommendations to the great start collaborative regarding other community services designed to improve all children's school readiness. (i) The ongoing articulation of the kindergarten and first grade programs offered by the program provider. (j) Participation in this state's great start to quality process with a rating of at least enhancing quality level. (5) To help expand access to great start readiness programs, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may waive the requirements under subsection (4) and a program may be eligible for funding under this section for new or expanding programs if the program demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential that the program meets all of the following: (a) Is a licensed child care center or is a licensed program. (b) Provides the minimum instructional time as required by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (c) Participates in this state's quality rating improvement system at a level determined by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (d) Implements a professional educator preparation plan, as defined by the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, for educators not meeting teacher credentialing standards described in subsection (8). (e) Uses a developmentally appropriate curriculum, as determined by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (f) Conducts a developmental screening and referral process, as determined by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (g) Commits to participating in program financial review and monitoring, as determined by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (h) Provides a plan to implement an approved great start readiness program curriculum and meet additional great start readiness program standards, as determined by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (6) A waiver under subsection (5) may be granted for up to 3 years for requirements related to program credentialing and may be granted for up to 2 years for all other requirements, as determined by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (7) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall provide a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, and the house and senate fiscal agencies that summarizes the number and types of exemptions granted under subsection (5) and progress made by programs granted waivers under subsection (5) by September 30 of each fiscal year. It is the intent of the legislature to review the waiver allowability under subsection (5) before the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. (8) An application for funding under this section must provide for the following, in a form and manner determined by the department: of lifelong education, advancement, and potential: (a) Ensure either of the following: (i) That the applicant complies with all program components described in subsection (4). (ii) That the applicant meets the requirements of a waiver under subsection (5). (b) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, ensure that children participating in an eligible great start readiness program for whom the intermediate district is receiving funds under this section are children who live with families with a household income that is equal to or less than 400% 250% of the federal poverty guidelines. If the intermediate district determines that all eligible children are being served and that there are no children on the waiting list who live with families with a household income that is equal to or less than 400% 250% of the federal poverty guidelines, the intermediate district may then enroll children who live with families with a household income that is greater than 400% equal to or less than 300% of the federal poverty guidelines. The enrollment process must consider income and risk factors, such that children determined with higher need are enrolled before children with lesser need. For purposes of this subdivision, all age-eligible children served in foster care or who are experiencing homelessness or who have individualized education programs recommending placement in an inclusive preschool setting are considered to live with families with household income equal to or less than 400% 250% of the federal poverty guidelines regardless of actual family income and are prioritized for enrollment within the lowest quintile. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall publish the household income thresholds under this subdivision in a clear manner on its website and the great start to quality website. (c) Ensure that the applicant only uses qualified personnel for this program, as follows: (i) Teachers possessing proper training. A lead teacher must have a valid Michigan teaching certificate with an early childhood or lower elementary endorsement or a bachelor's or higher degree in child development or early childhood education with specialization in preschool teaching. However, except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, if an applicant demonstrates to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential that it is unable to fully comply with this subparagraph after making reasonable efforts to comply, teachers or paraprofessionals with at least 5 years of experience as a paraprofessional in a great start readiness program, Head Start, or licensed child care center classroom who have significant but incomplete training in early childhood education or child development may be used if the applicant provides to the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential approves, a plan for each teacher to come into compliance with the standards in this subparagraph. Individuals may qualify with at least 3 years of experience and significant training in early childhood education or child development, based on the recommendation of the intermediate district after a classroom observation. A teacher's compliance plan must be completed within 3 years of the date of employment. Progress toward completion of the compliance plan consists of at least 2 courses per calendar year. (ii) Paraprofessionals possessing proper training in early childhood education, including an associate degree in early childhood education or child development or the equivalent, or a child development associate (CDA) credential. However, if an applicant demonstrates to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential that it is unable to fully comply with this subparagraph after making reasonable efforts to comply, the applicant may use paraprofessionals who have completed at least 1 course that earns college credit in early childhood education or child development or enroll in a child development associate credential with at least 6 months of verified experience in early education and care, if the applicant provides to the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential approves, a plan for each paraprofessional to come into compliance with the standards in this subparagraph. A paraprofessional's compliance plan must be completed within 3 years of the date of employment. Progress toward completion of the compliance plan consists of at least 2 courses, 60 clock hours, or an equivalent of training per calendar year. (d) Include a program budget that contains only those costs that are not reimbursed or reimbursable by federal funding, that are clearly and directly attributable to the great start readiness program, and that would not be incurred if the program were not being offered. Eligible costs include transportation costs. The program budget must indicate the extent to which these funds will supplement other federal, state, local, or private funds. An applicant shall not use funds received under this section to supplant any federal funds received by the applicant to serve children eligible for a federally funded preschool program that has the capacity to serve those children. (9) For a grant recipient that enrolls pupils in a school-day program or GSRP extended program funded under this section, each child enrolled in the school-day program or GSRP extended program is counted as described in section 39 for purposes of determining the amount of the grant award. (10) For a grant recipient that enrolls pupils in a GSRP/Head Start school-day blended program or GSRP/Head Start extended blended program, the grant recipient shall ensure that all Head Start and GSRP policies and regulations are applied to the blended slots, with adherence to the highest standard from either program, to the extent allowable under federal law. A grant recipient may request a waiver from the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to align GSRP policies and regulations with Head Start national standards for quality, including ratios, and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may approve the waiver. Not later than March 1 of each year, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential will report to the legislature and post on a publicly available website a list by intermediate district or consortium with the number and type of each waiver requested and approved. (11) To help expand access to great start readiness programs, the department may allow great start readiness programs to implement Head Start national performance standards for quality as an alternative to great start readiness program policies and regulations if the great start readiness program demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the great start readiness program is meeting the requirements of the Head Start national performance standards. (12) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section shall designate an early childhood coordinator, and may provide services directly or may contract with 1 or more districts or public or private for-profit or nonprofit providers that meet all requirements of subsections (4) and (8). (13) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts may retain for administrative services provided by the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts an amount not to exceed 4% of the grant amount. Expenses incurred by subrecipients engaged by the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts for directly running portions of the program are considered program costs or a contracted program fee for service. Subrecipients operating with a federally approved indirect rate for other early childhood programs may include indirect costs, not to exceed the federal 10% de minimis. (14) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts may expend not more than 2% of the total grant amount for outreach, recruiting, and public awareness of the program, if the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts also participates in related statewide marketing and outreach efforts. (15) Each grant recipient shall enroll children identified under subsection (8)(b) according to how far the child's household income is below 400% 250% of the federal poverty guidelines by ranking each applicant child's household income from lowest to highest and dividing the applicant children into quintiles based on how far the child's household income is below 400% 250% of the federal poverty guidelines, and then enrolling children in the quintile with the lowest household income before enrolling children in the quintile with the next lowest household income until slots are completely filled. If the grant recipient determines that all eligible children are being served and that there are no children on the waiting list who live with families with a household income that is equal to or less than 400% 250% of the federal poverty guidelines, the grant recipient may then enroll children who live with families with a household income that is greater than 400% equal to or less than 300% of the federal poverty guidelines. The enrollment process must consider income and risk factors, such that children determined with higher need are enrolled before children with lesser need. For purposes of this subsection, all age-eligible children served in foster care or who are experiencing homelessness or who have individualized education programs recommending placement in an inclusive preschool setting are considered to live with families with household income equal to or less than 400% 250% of the federal poverty guidelines regardless of actual family income and are prioritized for enrollment within the lowest quintile. (16) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section shall allow parents of eligible children who are residents of the intermediate district or within the consortium to choose a program operated by or contracted with another intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts and shall enter into a written agreement regarding payment, in a manner prescribed by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (17) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section shall conduct a local process to contract with interested and eligible public and private for-profit and nonprofit community-based providers that meet all requirements of subsection (4) for at least 30% of its total allocation. For the purposes of this 30% allocation, an intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts may count children served by a Head Start grantee or delegate in a GSRP/Head Start school-day blended program, GSRP/Head Start extended blended program, GSRP extended program, and great start readiness school-day program. Children served in a program funded only through Head Start are not counted toward this 30% allocation. An intermediate district or consortium shall report to the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, in a manner prescribed by the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, a detailed list of community-based providers by provider type, including private for-profit, private nonprofit, community college or university, Head Start grantee or delegate, and district or intermediate district, and the number and proportion of its total allocation allocated to each provider as subrecipient. If the intermediate district or consortium is not able to contract for at least 30% of its total allocation, the intermediate district or consortium shall notify the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential and, if the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential verifies that the intermediate district or consortium attempted to contract for at least 30% of its total allocation and was not able to do so, the intermediate district or consortium may retain and use all of its allocation as provided under this section. To be able to use this exemption, the intermediate district or consortium shall demonstrate to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential that the intermediate district or consortium increased the percentage of its total allocation for which it contracts with a community-based provider and the intermediate district or consortium shall submit evidence satisfactory to the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential must be able to verify this evidence, demonstrating that the intermediate district or consortium took measures to contract for at least 30% of its total allocation as required under this subsection, including, but not limited to, at least all of the following measures: (a) The intermediate district or consortium notified each nonparticipating licensed child care center located in the service area of the intermediate district or consortium regarding the center's eligibility to participate, in a manner prescribed by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) The intermediate district or consortium provided to each nonparticipating licensed child care center located in the service area of the intermediate district or consortium information regarding great start readiness program requirements and a description of the application and selection process for community-based providers. (c) The intermediate district or consortium provided to the public and to participating families a list of community-based great start readiness program subrecipients with a great start to quality rating level of at least enhancing quality level. (18) If an intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts receiving a grant under this section fails to submit satisfactory evidence to demonstrate its effort to contract for at least 30% of its total allocation, as required under subsection (17), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall reduce the allocation to the intermediate district or consortium by a percentage equal to the difference between the percentage of an intermediate district's or consortium's total allocation awarded to community-based providers and 30% of its total allocation. (19) To assist intermediate districts and consortia in complying with the requirement to contract with community-based providers, for at least 30% of their total allocation, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall do all of the following: (a) Ensure that a great start resource center or the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential provides each intermediate district or consortium receiving a grant under this section with the contact information for each licensed child care center located in the service area of the intermediate district or consortium by March 1 of each year. (b) Provide, or ensure that an organization with which the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential contracts provides, a community-based provider with a validated great start to quality rating within 90 days of the provider's having submitted a request and self-assessment. (c) Ensure that all intermediate district, district, community college or university, Head Start grantee or delegate, private for-profit, and private nonprofit providers are subject to a single great start to quality rating continuous quality improvement system. The rating continuous quality improvement system must ensure that regulators process all prospective providers at the same pace on a first-come, first-served basis and must not allow 1 type of provider to receive a great start to quality rating level ahead of any other type of provider. (d) By not later than March 1 of each year, compile the results of the information reported by each intermediate district or consortium under subsection (17) and report to the legislature and post on a publicly available website a list by intermediate district or consortium with the number and percentage of each intermediate district's or consortium's total allocation allocated to community-based providers by provider type, including private for-profit, private nonprofit, community college or university, Head Start grantee or delegate, and district or intermediate district. (e) Allow intermediate districts and consortia and eligible community-based providers to utilize materials and supplies purchased for great start readiness programs within their facilities for other early care and education activities, in the following order of priority: (i) Early care and education activities under a federal award. (ii) Early care and education activities under other state awards. (iii) Early care and education activities under local or regional awards. (20) A recipient of funds under this section shall report to the center in a form and manner prescribed by the center the information necessary to derive the number of children participating in the program who meet the program eligibility criteria under subsection (8)(b), the number of eligible children not participating in the program and on a waitlist, and the total number of children participating in the program by various demographic groups and eligibility factors necessary to analyze equitable and priority access to services for the purposes of subsection (3). (21) As used in this section: (a) "Child care center" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (b) (a) "Federal poverty guidelines" means the guidelines published annually in the Federal Register by the United States Department of Health and Human Services under its authority to revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902. (c) (b) "GSRP extended program" means a program that operates for at least the same length of day as a district's first grade program for a minimum of 5 days per week, 36 weeks per year. (d) (c) "GSRP/Head Start extended blended program" means a program funded under this section and a Head Start program that are combined for an extended program. (e) (d) "GSRP/Head Start school-day blended program" means a part-day program funded under this section and a Head Start program, which are combined for a school-day program. (f) "Licensed child care center" means a child care center that has been issued a license under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, to operate a child care center. (g) (e) "Part-day program" means a program that operates at least 4 days per week, 30 weeks per year, for at least 3 hours of teacher-child contact time per day but for fewer hours of teacher-child contact time per day than a school-day program. (h) (f) "School-day program" means a program that operates for at least the same length of day as a district's first grade program for a minimum of 4 days per week, 30 weeks per year. A classroom that offers a school-day program must enroll all children for the school day to be considered a school-day program. (22) From the amount allocated in subsection (2), there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 and, from the great start readiness program reserve state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 only an amount not to exceed $18,000,000.00 for reimbursement of transportation costs for children attending great start readiness programs funded under this section. To receive reimbursement under this subsection, by not later than November 1 of each year, a program funded under this section that provides transportation shall submit to the intermediate district that is the fiscal agent for the program a projected transportation budget. The amount of the reimbursement for transportation under this subsection is no more than the projected transportation budget or $500.00 multiplied by the number of children funded for the program under this section. If the amount allocated under this subsection is insufficient to fully reimburse the transportation costs for all programs that provide transportation and submit the required information, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall prorate the reimbursement in an equal amount per child funded. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments to the intermediate district that is the fiscal agent for each program, and the intermediate district shall then reimburse the program provider for transportation costs as prescribed under this subsection. (23) Subject to, and from the funds allocated under, subsection (22), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall reimburse a program for transportation costs related to parent- or guardian-accompanied transportation provided by transportation service companies, buses, or other public transportation services. To be eligible for reimbursement under this subsection, a program must submit to the intermediate district or consortia of intermediate districts all of the following: (a) The names of families provided with transportation support along with a documented reason for the need for transportation support and the type of transportation provided. (b) Financial documentation of actual transportation costs incurred by the program, including, but not limited to, receipts and mileage reports, as determined by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (c) Any other documentation or information determined necessary by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (24) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall implement a process to review and approve age-appropriate comprehensive classroom level quality assessments for GSRP grantees that support the early childhood standards of quality for prekindergarten children adopted by the state board. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make available to intermediate districts at least 2 classroom level quality assessments that were approved in 2018. (25) An intermediate district that is a GSRP grantee may approve the use of a supplemental curriculum that aligns with and enhances the age-appropriate educational curriculum in the classroom. If the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential objects to the use of a supplemental curriculum approved by an intermediate district, the director of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential superintendent of public instruction shall establish a review committee independent of the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The review committee shall meet within 60 days of the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential registering its objection in writing and provide a final determination on the validity of the objection within 60 days of the review committee's first meeting. (26) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall implement a process to evaluate and approve age-appropriate educational curricula that are in compliance with the early childhood standards of quality for prekindergarten children adopted by the state board. (27) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for payments to intermediate districts or consortia of intermediate districts for professional development and training materials for educators in programs implementing new curricula or child assessment tools approved for use in the great start readiness program. (28) A great start readiness program, a GSRP extended program, a GSRP/Head Start school-day blended program, or a GSRP/Head Start extended blended program funded under this section is permitted to utilize AmeriCorps Pre-K Reading Corps members in classrooms implementing research-based early literacy intervention strategies. (29) In addition to the allocation under subsection (1), from the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $25,000,000.00 $30,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 only for classroom start up grants to intermediate districts and consortia of intermediate districts for new or expanding great start readiness classrooms. All of the following apply to funding allocated under this subsection: (a) To receive funding under this subsection, intermediate districts and consortia of intermediate districts must apply for the funding in a form and manner prescribed by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (b) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall pay an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 for each new or expanded classroom. If funding is insufficient to fully fund all eligible applicants, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential must prorate the per-classroom amount on an equal basis. If the allocation is not fully paid in the current fiscal year, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential may award any remaining funding during fiscal year 2025-2026 2026-2027 for each new or expanded classroom at an equal amount per classroom, based on remaining available funds, not to exceed $50,000.00 per classroom. (c) Funds received under this subsection by intermediate districts and consortia of intermediate districts must be paid in full to the entity operating the classroom and may be used for 1 or more of the following purposes: (i) Costs associated with attracting, recruiting, retaining, and licensing required classroom education personnel to staff new or expanded classrooms. (ii) Supporting facility improvements or purchasing facility space necessary to provide a safe, high-quality learning environment for children in each new or expanded classroom. (iii) Outreach material necessary for public awareness that the great start readiness program has openings in the area and for costs associated with enrolling eligible children in new or expanded classrooms. (iv) Supporting costs in each new or expanded classroom associated with improving a provider's great start to quality rating.level. (d) The funds allocated under this subsection for 2022-2023 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2022-2023 do not lapse to the state school aid fund and are carried forward into 2023-2024. The purpose of the work project is to continue support for new or expanded great start readiness classrooms. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2024.The department shall establish a process to ensure that at least 50% of the funding distributed under this subsection for 2025-2026 is used to establish new programs by community-based organizations. (e) The funds allocated under this subsection for 2024-2025 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2024-2025 do not lapse to the state school aid fund and are carried forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the work project is to continue support for new or expanded great start readiness classrooms. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2026. (f) The funds allocated under this subsection for 2025-2026 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2025-2026 do not lapse to the state school aid fund and are carried forward into 2026-2027. The purpose of the work project is to continue support for new or expanded great start readiness classrooms. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2027. (g) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this subsection on a schedule determined by the department. (30) In addition to the funds allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated from the general fund money appropriated under section 11 for 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed $1,950,000.00 for an intermediate district or a consortium of intermediate districts to partner with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential and community-based organizations to continue implementing statewide outreach and enrollment campaign activities to raise awareness about the availability of services through the great start readiness program and to promote enrollment. (31) The funds allocated under subsection (30) for 2024-2025 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2024-2025 are carried forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the work project is to raise awareness of and participation in great start readiness programming. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2027. (32) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under subsection (30) on a schedule determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (33) As used in this section: (a) "Child care center" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (b) "Licensed child care center" means a child care center that has been issued a license under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, to operate a child care center. Sec. 32n. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $75,000,000.00 $50,000,000.00 to Clinton County RESA to collaborate with the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, for the purposes of this section. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2025-2026, the allocation from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 for the purposes described in this section will be $50,000,000.00. (2) From the state school aid fund money allocated in subsection (1), an amount not to exceed $57,000,000.00 Funding under this section is allocated for a grant program for eligible applicants to expand access to quality, affordable programming before and after the school day or during the summer for young people. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall establish competitive grant criteria for the program described in this subsection. section. To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, section, the applicant must meet, at a minimum, all of the following criteria: (a) Serve children in any of grades K to 12. (b) Be a community-based organization that is exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, 26 USC 501, an institution of higher education, a public library, a local government, or an intermediate district. (c) Provide before-school, after-school, before-and-after-school, or summer school programming to children described in subdivision (a). These programs must be used to support expanded learning opportunities, including, but not limited to, mentoring, leadership, community engagement, agriculture, visual and performing arts, literacy, science, technology, engineering, mathematics, health and wellness, recreation, financial literacy, physical fitness, career and college exploration, youth voice, 21st century skills, conflict resolution, and social engagement programming. (d) Address measurable goals, including, but not limited to, improved school attendance, academic outcomes, improved attitudes toward school, improved positive behaviors, skill development and retention, higher education aspirations, and improved family engagement and include activities linked to research or quality practices. (e) Be 1 of the following: (i) A licensed child care organization. (ii) An entity that has an active application to be a licensed child care organization. (iii) An exempt entity. (3) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall establish a competitive grant process for awarding funding under subsection (2). this section. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall develop the form and manner for applying for the grants. The application must include a request for information on the applicant's outreach to children, youth, and families who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j. The application must be open for not less than 30 calendar days. At least 30 days before the application is opened, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential must publish on its public website the criteria that will be used in evaluating the application that must include, but are not limited to, priorities under subsection (5). (4) Subject to subsection (8), in determining award amounts under subsection (2), this section, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall, to the extent practicable, ensure that eligible entities in all geographic regions of this state are represented in the distribution of grant funding under subsection (2).this section. (5) Subject to subsection (8), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall prioritize the distribution of grant funding under subsection (2) this section based on, at a minimum, the following: (a) An applicant's demonstrated need. (b) The percentage of low-income families in the geographic area being served. Prioritization must be determined by the average percentage of pupils in the district who are eligible for free and reduced-priced meals as determined under the Richard B. Russell national school lunch act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, where eligible entities will provide before-and-after-school or summer school programs. (c) Whether the application provides services for the full school year. (d) The applicant's track record for providing quality, affordable before-and-after-school or summer school services. (e) Whether an applicant serving children in any of grades K to 8 is a licensed child care organization, is an entity that has an active application to be a licensed child care organization, or has implemented the Michigan Out-of-School Time Standards of Quality if the applicant is an exempt entity. (6) Subject to subsection (7), an eligible entity that receives grant funding under subsection (2) this section shall use the funding only to provide before-school, after-school, before-and-after-school, or summer school programming to children described in subsection (2)(a). The programming offered under subsection (2) must meet all of the following: (a) For programing that is offered by a licensed child care organization, be provided to children in a manner in which the children are physically present at the building or location for which the licensed child care organization received its license under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, or, for programing that is offered by an exempt entity, be provided to children in a manner in which the children are physically present at a building or location designated by the exempt entity. (b) Provide educational programming in core subject areas, including, but not limited to, mathematics, reading, and science. (c) Provide data to evaluate the program in a form and manner as prescribed by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (7) Subject to subsections (4) and (5), up to 2% of funding allocated under subsection (2) this section must be allocated to a nonprofit entity with experience serving youth-serving organizations to provide start-up grants and capacity building, professional development, and technical assistance for implementation of high-quality, evidence-based out-of-school time learning opportunities. (8) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall award no less than 60% of the funding under subsection (2) this section to community-based organizations. (9) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under this section in full upon grant award. Grantees that do not comply with reporting requirements, fail to provide the services proposed in their grant application, or close during the grant period may be required to repay the funding they received under this section to the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (10) The department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, in collaboration with the Michigan Afterschool Partnership, shall convene an advisory committee to review the program components listed within this section and make recommendations to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential for changes on the program described in this section. The advisory committee shall meet at a schedule set by the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, or at least quarterly. The advisory committee shall provide for the involvement of, but not limited to, community-based organizations, regional intermediaries, district administrators, youth, parents, and representatives from the business and philanthropic communities, as appropriate. (11) From the state school aid fund money allocated in subsection (1), Clinton County RESA shall allocate $18,000,000.00 to recipients under this subsection as follows: (a) $4,000,000.00 to support the efforts of FFA. (b) $3,000,000.00 to the Boys and Girls Club of Southeast Michigan to expand programming. Programming expansion includes, but is not limited to, construction or remodeling of facilities to allow for new or extended programs. (c) $3,000,000.00 to the HYPE Athletics Center to provide programming that may include, but is not limited to, science, technology, engineering, arts, and mathematics (STEAM) programs; literacy and reading programs; after-school programs; youth fitness and athletic programs; and mental health and behavioral health services. (d) $1,500,000.00 to Brilliant Detroit to support delivery of high-dosage neighborhood-based tutoring and direct noninstructional services for at-risk pupils who are 3 to 12 years of age. Funding under this subdivision is intended to ensure that pupils are proficient in English language arts by the end of grade 3 and proficient in mathematics by the end of grade 8, that all participants are kindergarten ready, and that pupils are prepared to attend school regularly. As used in this subdivision, "at-risk pupil" means that term as defined in section 31a. (e) $1,200,000.00 to the State Alliance of Michigan YMCAs to provide students in grades 6 to 12 with hands-on civics and model-government programs that offer statewide engagement with peers across this state for the purpose of expanding those students' opportunities to improve their social studies knowledge, thinking skills, and intellectual processes and dispositions required for active engagement in fulfilling responsibilities of civic participation. (f) $1,000,000.00 to the Downtown Boxing Gym in Detroit to expand programming. Programming expansion includes, but is not limited to, construction or remodeling of facilities to allow for new or extended programs. (g) $1,000,000.00 to support the operations of the Flint Center for Educational Excellence. (h) $800,000.00 to the Detroit Opera for educational programming for grades pre-K to 12, including field trips, summer camps, and other learning opportunities. The funds allocated under this subdivision are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2024-2025 are carried forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the work project is to support the Detroit Opera educational programming as described in this subdivision. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2028. (i) $500,000.00 to Special Olympics Michigan, a nonprofit organization organized under the laws of this state that is exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, that has a mission statement to provide year-round sports training and athletic competition for children and adults with intellectual disabilities. Funding under this subdivision must be used by the organization to expand the organization's programming. (j) $500,000.00 to the Horatio Williams Foundation to support efforts to provide college preparation services, math leagues, sports programming, and literacy services in Detroit. (k) $500,000.00 to Friends of the Children, a nonprofit organization that employs salaried professional mentors who support youth and their families from grades K to 12. The salaried professional mentorship program in this subdivision must employ a 2-generational approach to supporting youth in and outside of the classroom, particularly in reading and math comprehension; support students and their families by connecting them to concrete supports like education and employment pathways, housing, utility assistance, and food security; and be located in a city with a population greater than 600,000 in a county with a population greater than 1,500,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census. (l) $500,000.00 to the Detroit Police Athletic League to support operations and programming including, but not limited to, athletic programs and youth enrichment programs. (m) $500,000.00 to the Detroit Science Center, a nonprofit organization that is tax-exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, and located in a city with a population greater than 600,000 in a county with a population greater than 1,700,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census. Funds under this subdivision must be used by the nonprofit organization to expand the nonprofit organization's mission of providing opportunities for students to discover, explore, and appreciate science, technology, engineering, and mathematics in a creative, dynamic learning environment. (12) Recipients of grants under subsection (11) may not apply for funding under subsection (2). (11) (13) As used in this section: (a) "An entity that has an active application to be a licensed child care organization" means an entity that has an active application to be a licensed child care organization under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, and will be a licensed child care organization before the entity provides services for which a child care organization is required to be licensed under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128. (b) "Child care organization" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (c) "Exempt entity" means an entity described in section 1(1)(i)(i) to (v) of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111. (d) "Licensed child care organization" means a child care organization that has been issued a license under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128, to operate a child care organization. Sec. 32p. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $19,400,000.00 to intermediate districts for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purpose of providing early childhood funding to intermediate districts to support the goals and outcomes under subsections (2) and (4), and to provide supports for early childhood programs for children from birth through age 8. The funding provided to each intermediate district under this section is determined by the distribution formula established by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential's department's office of great start to provide equitable funding statewide. To receive funding under this section, each intermediate district must provide an application to the office of great start by not later than September 15 of the immediately preceding fiscal year indicating the strategies planned to be provided. (2) Each intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts that receives funding under this section shall convene a local great start collaborative and a family coalition that includes an active partnership with at least 1 community-based organization. The goal of each great start collaborative and family coalition is to ensure the coordination and expansion of local early childhood systems and programs that achieve the following outcomes: (a) Children born healthy. (b) Children healthy, thriving, and developmentally on track from birth to grade 3. (c) Children developmentally ready to succeed in school at the time of school entry. (d) Children prepared to succeed in fourth grade and beyond by reading proficiently by the end of third grade. (3) Each local great start collaborative and family coalition shall convene workgroups to make recommendations about community services designed to achieve the outcomes described in subsection (2) and to ensure that its local great start system includes the following supports for children from birth through age 8: (a) Physical and social-emotional health. (b) Family supports, including, but not limited to, the provision of basic needs and economic self-sufficiency. (c) Parent leadership and family engagement. (d) Early education, including the child's development of skills linked to success in foundational literacy, and care. (e) Community infrastructure. (4) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), at least $3,500,000.00 must be used for the purpose of providing home visits to at-risk children and their families. The home visits must be conducted as part of a locally coordinated, family-centered, evidence-based, data-driven home visit strategic plan that is approved by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. The goals of the home visits funded under this subsection are to improve school readiness using evidence-based methods, including a focus on developmentally appropriate outcomes for early literacy, to improve positive parenting practices, and to improve family economic self-sufficiency while reducing the impact of high-risk factors through community resources and referrals. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall coordinate the goals of the home visit strategic plans approved under this subsection with other state agency home visit programs in a way that strengthens Michigan's home visiting infrastructure and maximizes federal funds available for the purposes of at-risk family home visits. The coordination among departments and agencies is intended to avoid duplication of state services and spending, and should emphasize efficient service delivery of home visiting programs. (5) By not later than December 1 of each year, each intermediate district shall provide a report to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential detailing the strategies actually implemented during the immediately preceding school year and the families and children actually served. At a minimum, the report must include an evaluation of the services provided with additional funding under subsection (4) for home visits, using the goals identified in subsection (4) as the basis for the evaluation, including the degree to which school readiness was improved, the degree to which positive parenting practices were improved, the degree to which there was improved family economic self-sufficiency, and the degree to which community resources and referrals were utilized. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall compile and summarize these reports and submit its summary to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid and to the house and senate fiscal agencies by not later than February 15 of each year. (6) In addition to the funds allocated in subsection (1), from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 only for the purpose of improving access to books and other literacy materials for children from birth to age 5. The formula described in subsection (1) must be used to allocate funds to intermediate districts under this subsection. An intermediate district may use the funding to support programs, including, but not limited to, the Dolly Parton Imagination Library, Reach Out and Read Michigan, or any other program that provides books and literacy materials to children from birth to age 5. If funding under this subsection is insufficient to enroll all interested families in the service, each intermediate district must prioritize enrollment to those families with the highest levels of economic need. If an intermediate district will not fully utilize funding under this subsection, those funds must be returned to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential for redistribution for the purposes under this subsection. (6) (7) An intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts that receives funding under this section may carry over any unexpended funds received under this section into the next fiscal year and may expend those unused funds through June 30 of the next fiscal year. However, an intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts that receives funding for the purposes described in subsection (2) in the current fiscal year shall not carry over into the next fiscal year any amount exceeding 15% of the amount awarded to the intermediate district or consortium in the current fiscal year. A recipient of a grant shall return any unexpended grant funds to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential in the manner prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential not later than September 30 of the next fiscal year after the fiscal year in which the funds are received. Sec. 35a. (1) From the appropriations in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purposes of this section an amount not to exceed $82,900,000.00 $116,050,000.00 from the state school aid fund. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2025-2026, 2026-2027, the allocation from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 for the purposes described in this section will be $67,900,000.00. $82,900,000.00. Excluding staff or contracted employees funded under subsection (8), the superintendent shall designate staff or contracted employees funded under this section as critical shortage. By not later than December 31 of each fiscal year in which funding is allocated under this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall do both of the following: (a) Report in person to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid regarding progress on early literacy and be available for questioning as prescribed through a process developed by the chairs of the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid. (b) Submit a written report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid regarding progress on early literacy. (2) A district that receives funds under subsection (5) may spend up to 5% of those funds for professional development for educators in a department-approved research-based training program related to current state literacy standards for pupils in grades pre-K to 5. The professional development must also include training in the use of screening and diagnostic tools, progress monitoring, and intervention methods used to address barriers to learning and delays in learning that are diagnosed through the use of these tools. (3) A district that receives funds under subsection (5) may use up to 5% of those funds to administer department-approved screening and diagnostic tools to monitor the development of early literacy and early reading skills, and risk factors for word-level reading difficulties of pupils in grades pre-K to 5 and to support evidence-based professional learning described in subsection (11) for educators in administering and using screening, progress monitoring, and diagnostic assessment data to inform instruction through prevention and intervention in a multi-tiered system of supports framework. A department-approved screening and diagnostic tool administered by a district using funding under this section must include all of the following components: phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, rapid automatized naming (RAN), and comprehension. Further, all of the following sub-skills must be assessed within each of these components: (a) Phonemic awareness - segmentation, blending, and sound manipulation (deletion and substitution). (b) Phonics - decoding (reading) and encoding (spelling). (c) Fluency. (d) Comprehension - making meaning of text. (4) From the allocation under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $42,000,000.00 $45,250,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purpose of providing early literacy coaches at intermediate districts to assist teachers in developing and implementing instructional strategies for pupils in grades pre-K to 5 so that pupils are reading at grade level by the end of grade 3. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2026-2027, the allocation from subsection (1) for purposes described in this subsection will be $42,000,000.00. All of the following apply to funding under this subsection: (a) The department shall develop an application process consistent with the provisions of this subsection. An application must provide assurances that literacy coaches funded under this subsection are knowledgeable about at least the following: (i) Current state literacy standards for pupils in grades pre-K to 3. (ii) Implementing an instructional delivery model based on frequent use of formative, screening, and diagnostic tools, known as a multi-tiered system of supports, to determine individual progress for pupils in grades pre-K to 5 so that pupils are reading at grade level by the end of grade 3. (iii) The use of data from diagnostic tools to determine the necessary additional supports and interventions needed by individual pupils in grades pre-K to 5 to read at grade level. (b) From the allocation under this subsection, the department shall award grants to intermediate districts for the support of early literacy coaches. The department shall provide this funding in the following manner: (i) The department shall award each intermediate district grant funding to support the cost of 2 early literacy coaches in an equal amount per early literacy coach, not to exceed $125,000.00. (ii) After distribution of the grant funding under subparagraph (i), the department shall distribute the remainder of grant funding for additional early literacy coaches in an amount not to exceed $125,000.00 per early literacy coach. The number of funded early literacy coaches for each intermediate district is based on the percentage of the total statewide number of pupils in grades K to 3 who meet the income eligibility standards for the federal free and reduced-price lunch programs who are enrolled in districts in the intermediate district. (c) If an intermediate district that receives funding under this subsection uses an assessment tool that screens for characteristics of dyslexia, the intermediate district shall use the assessment results from that assessment tool to identify pupils who demonstrate characteristics of dyslexia. (d) All literacy coaches funded under this subsection must have already received, or be making progress toward receiving, professional learning by the approved provider described in subsection (11). (e) To be eligible to receive funding under this subsection, an intermediate district must provide the department with a list by September 1 of the immediately preceding fiscal year containing contact information for all literacy coaches funded under this subsection, in a form and manner determined by the department. An intermediate district shall communicate any personnel changes and changes to contact information for literacy coaches funded under this subsection to the department within 30 days of the personnel change or change in contact information. (5) From the allocation under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $19,900,000.00 $39,800,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to districts that provide additional instructional time to those pupils in grades pre-K to 5 who have been identified by using department-approved screening and diagnostic tools as needing additional supports and interventions to read at grade level by the end of grade 3. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2026-2027, the allocation from subsection (1) for purposes described in this subsection will be $19,900,000.00. Additional instructional time may be provided before, during, and after regular school hours or as part of a year-round balanced school calendar. All of the following apply to funding under this subsection: (a) To be eligible to receive funding, a district must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the district has done all of the following: (i) Implemented a multi-tiered system of supports instructional delivery model that is an evidence-based model that uses data-driven problem solving to integrate academic and behavioral instruction and that uses intervention delivered to all pupils in varying intensities based on pupil needs. The multi-tiered system of supports must provide at least all of the following essential components: (A) Team-based leadership. (B) A tiered delivery system. (C) Selection and implementation of instruction, interventions, and supports. (D) A comprehensive screening and assessment system. (E) Continuous data-based decision making. (ii) Used department-approved research-based diagnostic tools to identify individual pupils in need of additional instructional time. (iii) Used a reading instruction method that focuses on the 5 fundamental building blocks of reading: phonics, phonemic awareness, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension and content knowledge. (iv) Provided teachers of pupils in grades pre-K to 5 with research-based professional development in diagnostic data interpretation. (v) Complied with the requirements under section 1280f of the revised school code, MCL 380.1280f. (b) The department shall distribute funding allocated under this subsection to eligible districts on an equal per-first-grade-pupil basis. (c) If the funds allocated under this subsection are insufficient to fully fund the payments under this subsection, payments under this subsection are prorated on an equal per-pupil basis based on grade 1 pupils. (6) By not later than September 1 of each year, a district that receives funding under subsection (5) in conjunction with the Michigan student data system, if possible, shall provide to the department a report that includes at least both of the following, in a form and manner prescribed by the department: (a) For pupils in grades pre-K to 5, the teachers, pupils, schools, and grades served with funds under this section and the categories of services provided. (b) For pupils in grades pre-K to 5, pupil proficiency and growth data that allows analysis both in the aggregate and by each of the following subgroups, as applicable: (i) School. (ii) Grade level. (iii) Gender. (iv) Race. (v) Ethnicity. (vi) Economically disadvantaged status. (vii) Disability. (viii) Pupils identified as having reading deficiencies. (7) From the allocation under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $6,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2026-2027 to an intermediate district in which the combined total number of pupils in membership of all of its constituent districts is the fewest among all intermediate districts. All of the following apply to the funding under this subsection: (a) Funding under this subsection must be used by the intermediate district, in partnership with an association that represents intermediate district administrators in this state, to implement all of the following: (i) Literacy essentials teacher and principal training modules. (ii) Face-to-face and online professional learning of literacy essentials teacher and principal training modules for literacy coaches, principals, and teachers. (iii) The placement of regional lead literacy coaches to facilitate professional learning for early literacy coaches. These regional lead literacy coaches shall provide support for new literacy coaches, building teachers, and administrators and shall facilitate regional data collection to evaluate the effectiveness of statewide literacy coaches funded under this section. (iv) Provide $500,000.00 from this subsection for literacy training, modeling, coaching, and feedback for district principals or chief administrators, as applicable. The training described in this subparagraph must use the pre-K and K to 3 essential instructional practices in literacy created by the general education leadership network as the framework for all training provided under this subparagraph. (v) Job-embedded professional learning opportunities for mathematics teachers through mathematics instructional coaching. Funding must be used for professional learning for coaches, professional developers, administrators, and teachers; coaching for early mathematics educators; the development of statewide and regional professional learning networks in mathematics instructions; and the development and support of digital professional learning modules. (b) By not later than September 1 of each year, the intermediate district described in this subsection, in consultation with grant recipients, shall submit a report to the chairs of the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the chairs of the senate and house standing committees responsible for education legislation, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director. The report described under this subdivision must include student achievement results in English language arts and mathematics and survey results with feedback from parents and teachers regarding the initiatives implemented under this subsection. (c) Up to 2% of funds allocated under this subsection may be used by the association representing intermediate district administrators that is in partnership with the intermediate district specified in this subsection to administer this subsection. (8) From the allocation under subsection (1), the department shall allocate the amount of $5,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 only 2025-2026 to an intermediate district or a consortium of intermediate districts to partner with the Michigan Education Corps for the PreK Reading Corps, the K3 Reading Corps, and the Math Corps. An intermediate district or a consortium of intermediate districts receiving funding under this subsection must forward the amount received under this subsection to the Michigan Education Corps for statewide services. As conditions of receiving funding from an intermediate district or a consortium of intermediate districts, all of the following apply to funding received by the Michigan Education Corps under this subsection: (a) By September 1 of the current fiscal year, the Michigan Education Corps shall provide a report concerning its use of the funding to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the senate and house caucus policy offices on outcomes and performance measures of the Michigan Education Corps, including, but not limited to, the degree to which the Michigan Education Corps' replication of the PreK Reading Corps, the K3 Reading Corps, and the Math Corps programs is demonstrating sufficient efficacy and impact. The report must include data pertaining to at least all of the following: (i) The current impact of the programs on this state in terms of numbers of children and schools receiving support. This portion of the report must specify the number of children tutored, including dosage and completion, and the demographics of those children. (ii) Whether the assessments and interventions are implemented with fidelity. This portion of the report must include details on the total number of assessments and interventions completed and the range, mean, and standard deviation. (iii) Whether the literacy or math improvement of children participating in the programs is consistent with expectations. This portion of the report must detail at least all of the following: (A) Growth rate by grade or age level, in comparison to targeted growth rate. (B) Average linear growth rates. (C) Exit rates. (D) Percentage of children who exit who also meet or exceed spring benchmarks. (iv) The impact of the programs on organizations and stakeholders, including, but not limited to, school administrators, internal coaches, and AmeriCorps members. (b) If the department determines that the Michigan Education Corps has misused the funds allocated under this subsection, the Michigan Education Corps shall reimburse this state for the amount of state funding misused. (c) An intermediate district or a consortium of intermediate districts may not reserve any portion of the allocation provided under this subsection for an evaluation of the Michigan Education Corps, the Michigan Education Corps' funding, or the Michigan Education Corps' programming unless agreed to in writing by the Michigan Education Corps. An intermediate district or a consortium of intermediate districts shall award the entire amount allocated under this subsection to the Michigan Education Corps and shall not condition the forwarding of this funding on the implementation of an independent evaluation. (9) If a district or intermediate district expends any funding received under subsection (4) or (5) for professional development in research-based effective reading instruction, the district or intermediate district shall select a professional development program from the list described under subdivision (a). All of the following apply to the requirement under this subsection: (a) The department shall issue a request for proposals for professional development programs in research-based effective reading instruction to develop an initial approved list of professional development programs in research-based effective reading instruction. The department shall make the initial approved list public and shall determine if it will, on a rolling basis, approve any new proposals submitted for addition to its initial approved list. (b) To be included as an approved professional development program in research-based effective reading instruction under subdivision (a), an applicant must demonstrate to the department in writing the program's competency in all of the following topics: (i) Understanding of phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension. (ii) Appropriate use of assessments and differentiated instruction. (iii) Selection of appropriate instructional materials. (iv) Application of research-based instructional practices. (c) As used in this subsection, "effective reading instruction" means reading instruction scientifically proven to result in improvement in pupil reading skills. (10) From the allocation under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $10,000,000.00 $20,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 only 2025-2026 for the provision of professional learning by the approved provider described in subsection (11), first to educators in pre-K, kindergarten, and grade 1 next to educators in grade 2 and grade 3; and then to additional elementary school educators and pre-K to grade 12 certificated special education personnel with endorsements in learning disabilities, emotional impairments, or speech and language impairments. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2026-2027, the allocation from subsection (1) for purposes described in this subsection will be $10,000,000.00. For purposes of this subsection, the department must establish and manage professional learning opportunities that are open to all school personnel described in this subsection as follows: (a) The department must first open voluntary enrollment for any pre-K through grade 3 teacher on a first-come, first-served basis, with voluntary enrollment prioritized for pre-K, kindergarten, and grade 1 teachers. The department shall then open voluntary enrollment for the remaining school personnel described in this subsection. (b) The department must maintain open enrollment until all funds are expended. (11) For the provision of professional learning to the school personnel described in subsection (10), the department shall approve LETRS as the approved provider of professional learning, if LETRS continues to meet all of the following: (a) Be offered through a system of training that provides educators with the knowledge base to effectively implement any class-wide, supplemental, or intervention reading approach and to determine why some students struggle with reading, writing, spelling, and language. (b) Provide training activities that direct educators to implement effective reading and spelling instruction supported by scientifically based research and foster a direct explicit instructional sequence that uses techniques to support teachers' independence in using their newly-learned skills with students in the classroom. (c) Include integrated components for educators and administrators in pre-K to grade 3 with embedded evaluation or assessment of knowledge. Evaluation or assessment of knowledge under this subdivision must incorporate evaluations of learning throughout each unit and include a summative assessment that must be completed to demonstrate successful course completion. (d) Build teacher content knowledge and pedagogical knowledge of the critical components of literacy including how the brain learns to read, phonological and phonemic awareness; letter knowledge; phonics; advanced phonics; vocabulary and oral language; fluency; comprehension; spelling and writing; and the organization of language. (e) Support educators in understanding how to effectively use screening, progress monitoring, and diagnostic assessment data to improve literacy outcomes through prevention and intervention for reading difficulties in a multi-tiered system of supports. The multi-tiered system of supports must include at least all of the following essential components: (i) Team-based leadership. (ii) A tiered delivery system. (iii) Selection and implementation of instruction, interventions, and supports. (iv) A comprehensive screening and assessment system. (v) Continuous data-based decision making. (12) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments made under subsections (7) and (8) on a schedule determined by the department. (13) As used in this section: (a) "Dyslexia" means both of the following: (i) A specific learning disorder that is neurobiological in origin and characterized by difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and by poor spelling and decoding abilities that typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of language that is often unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities and the provision of effective classroom instruction. (ii) A specific learning disorder that may include secondary consequences, such as problems in reading comprehension and a reduced reading experience that can impede the growth of vocabulary and background knowledge and lead to social, emotional, and behavioral difficulties. (b) "Evidence-based" means an activity, program, process, service, strategy, or intervention that demonstrates statistically significant effects on improving pupil outcomes or other relevant outcomes and that meets at least both of the following: (i) At least 1 of the following: (A) Is based on strong evidence from at least 1 well-designed and well-implemented experimental study. (B) Is based on moderate evidence from at least 1 well-designed and well-implemented quasi-experimental study. (C) Is based on promising evidence from at least 1 well-designed and well-implemented correlational study with statistical controls for selection bias. (D) Demonstrates a rationale based on high-quality research findings or positive evaluation that the activity, program, process, service, strategy, or intervention is likely to improve pupil outcomes or other relevant outcomes. (ii) Includes ongoing efforts to examine the effects of the activity, program, process, service, strategy, or intervention. (c) "Explicit" means direct and deliberate instruction through continuous pupil-teacher interaction that includes teacher modeling, guided practice, and independent practice. (d) "Fluency" means the ability to read with speed, accuracy, and proper expression. (e) "Multi-tiered system of supports" means a comprehensive framework that includes 3 distinct tiers of instructional support and is composed of a collection of evidence-based strategies designed to meet the individual needs and assets of a whole pupil at all achievement levels. (f) "Phonemic awareness" means the conscious awareness of all of the following: (i) Individual speech sounds, including, but not limited to, consonants and vowels, in spoken syllables. (ii) The ability to consciously manipulate through, including, but not limited to, matching, blending, segmenting, deleting, or substituting, individual speech sounds described in subparagraph (i). (iii) All levels of the speech sound system, including, but not limited to, word boundaries, rhyme recognition, stress patterns, syllables, onset-rime units, and phonemes. (g) "Phonological" means relating to the system of contrastive relationships among the speech sounds that constitute the fundamental components of a language. (h) "Progress monitoring" means the assessing of students' academic performance, quantifying students' rates of improvement or progress toward goals, and determining how students are responding to instruction. (i) "Rapid automatized naming (RAN)" means a task that measures how quickly individuals can name objects; pictures; colors; or symbols, including letters and digits, aloud, which can predict later reading abilities for preliterate children. Sec. 35d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, for 2024-2025 only, 2025-2026, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for the department to provide grants to districts and intermediate districts for the purchase of 1 or more components or trainings through an eligible teacher training program for children with dyslexia from a provider of an eligible teacher training program for children with dyslexia as provided under this section. (2) A provider that provides programming that meets all of the following is considered to be a provider of an eligible teacher training program for purposes of this section: (a) Allows teachers to incorporate the 5 components essential to an effective reading program into their daily lessons. The 5 components described in this subdivision are phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, and comprehension. (b) Trains educators to teach reading using a proven, multisensory approach. (c) Educates teachers on how to explicitly and effectively teach reading to beginning readers. (d) Breaks reading and spelling down into smaller skills involving letters and sounds, and then builds on these skills over time. (e) Uses multisensory teaching strategies to teach reading by using sight, hearing, touch, and movement to help students connect and learn the concepts being taught. (3) Districts and intermediate districts may apply to the department for grants to purchase components or training through an eligible teacher training program from a provider of an eligible teacher training program, and, upon receiving an application but except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the department shall make payments to districts and intermediate districts for those purchases. The department shall make payments under this section on a first-come, first-served basis until funds are depleted. Sec. 39. (1) An eligible applicant receiving funds under section 32d shall submit an application, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, by a date specified by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential in the immediately preceding fiscal year. An eligible applicant is not required to amend the applicant's current accounting cycle or adopt this state's fiscal year accounting cycle in accounting for financial transactions under this section. The application must include all of the following: (a) The estimated total number of children in the community who meet the criteria of section 32d and the total number of age-eligible children in the community, as provided to the applicant by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential utilizing the most recent population data available from the American Community Survey conducted by the United States Census Bureau. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall ensure that it provides updated American Community Survey population data at least once every 3 years. (b) The estimated number of children in the community who meet the criteria of section 32d and are being served exclusively by Head Start programs operating in the community. (c) The number of children whom the applicant has the capacity to serve who meet the criteria of section 32d including a verification of physical facility and staff resources capacity. (2) After notification of funding allocations, an applicant receiving funds under section 32d shall also submit an implementation plan for approval, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, by a date specified by the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, that details how the applicant complies with the program components established by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential under section 32d. (3) The initial allocation to each eligible applicant under section 32d is the lesser of the following: (a) The sum of the number of children served in a school-day program in the preceding school year multiplied by $10,185.00, $14,000.00, the number of children served in a GSRP extended program in the preceding school year multiplied by $12,222.00, $16,800.00, the number of children served in a GSRP/Head Start school-day blended program or a part-day program in the preceding school year multiplied by $5,093.00, $7,000.00, and the number of children served in a GSRP/Head Start extended blended program in the preceding school year multiplied by $6,111.00.$8,400.00. (b) The sum of the number of children the applicant has the capacity to serve in the current school year in a school-day program multiplied by $10,185.00, $14,000.00, the number of children served in a GSRP extended program the applicant has the capacity to serve in the current school year multiplied by $12,222.00, $16,800.00, the number of children served in a GSRP/Head Start school-day blended program or a part-day program the applicant has the capacity to serve in the current school year multiplied by $5,093.00, $7,000.00, and the number of children served in a GSRP/Head Start extended blended program the applicant has the capacity to serve in the current school year multiplied by $6,111.00.$8,400.00. (4) If funds remain after the allocations under subsection (3), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall distribute the remaining funds to each intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts that serves less than the state percentage benchmark determined under subsection (5). The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall distribute these remaining funds to each eligible applicant based upon each applicant's proportionate share of the remaining unserved children necessary to meet the statewide percentage benchmark in intermediate districts or consortia of intermediate districts serving less than the statewide percentage benchmark. When all applicants have been given the opportunity to reach the statewide percentage benchmark, the statewide percentage benchmark may be reset, as determined by the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, until greater equity of opportunity to serve eligible children across all intermediate school districts has been achieved. (5) For the purposes of subsection (4), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall calculate a percentage of children served by each intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts by adding the number of children served in the immediately preceding year by that intermediate district or consortium with the number of eligible children under section 32d served exclusively by Head Start, as reported in a form and manner prescribed by the department, of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, within the intermediate district or consortia service area and dividing that total by the total number of children within the intermediate district or consortium of intermediate districts who meet the criteria of section 32d as determined by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential utilizing the most recent population data available from the American Community Survey conducted by the United States Census Bureau. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall compare the resulting percentage of eligible children served to a statewide percentage benchmark to determine if the intermediate district or consortium is eligible for additional funds under subsection (4). The statewide percentage benchmark is 100%. (6) If, taking into account the total amount to be allocated to the applicant as calculated under this section, an applicant determines that it is able to include additional eligible children in the great start readiness program without additional funds under section 32d, the applicant may include additional eligible children but does not receive additional funding under section 32d for those children. (7) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall review the program components under section 32d and under this section at least biennially. The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential also shall convene a committee of internal and external stakeholders at least once every 5 years to ensure that the funding structure under this section reflects current system needs under section 32d. (8) As used in this section, "GSRP/Head Start blended program", "GSRP extended program", "part-day program", and "school-day program" mean those terms as defined in section 32d. Sec. 39a. (1) From the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities all available federal funding, estimated at $754,700,000.00, $824,700,000.00, for the federal programs under the no child left behind act of 2001, Public Law 107-110, or the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95. These funds are allocated as follows: (a) An amount estimated at $1,200,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026, to provide students with drug- and violence-prevention programs and to implement strategies to improve school safety, funded from DED-OESE, drug-free schools and communities funds. (b) An amount estimated at $100,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purpose of preparing, training, and recruiting high-quality teachers and class size reduction, funded from DED-OESE, improving teacher quality funds. (c) An amount estimated at $13,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for programs to teach English to limited English proficient (LEP) children, funded from DED-OESE, language acquisition state grant funds. (d) An amount estimated at $2,800,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for rural and low-income schools, funded from DED-OESE, rural and low income school funds. (e) An amount estimated at $535,000,000.00 $585,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to provide supplemental programs to enable educationally disadvantaged children to meet challenging academic standards, funded from DED-OESE, title I, disadvantaged children funds. (f) An amount estimated at $9,200,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purpose of identifying and serving migrant children, funded from DED-OESE, title I, migrant education funds. (g) An amount estimated at $40,400,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purpose of providing high-quality extended learning opportunities, after school and during the summer, for children in low-performing schools, funded from DED-OESE, twenty-first century community learning center funds. (h) An amount estimated at $14,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to help support local school improvement efforts, funded from DED-OESE, title I, local school improvement grants. (i) An amount estimated at $35,000,000.00 $55,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to improve the academic achievement of students, funded from DED-OESE, title IV, student support and academic enrichment grants. (j) An amount estimated at $3,100,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for literacy programs that advance literacy skills for students from birth through grade 12, including, but not limited to, English-proficient students and students with disabilities, funded from DED-OESE, striving readers comprehensive literacy program. (k) An amount estimated at $1,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for grants to support and demonstrate innovative partnerships to train school-based mental health service providers, funded from DED-OESE, mental health service professional demonstration grant program. (2) From the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated to districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities all available federal funding, estimated at $60,500,000.00 $66,415,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the following programs that are funded by federal grants: (a) An amount estimated at $3,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to provide services to homeless children and youth, funded from DED-OVAE, homeless children and youth funds. (b) An amount estimated at $24,000,000.00 $30,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for providing career and technical education services to pupils, funded from DED-OVAE, basic grants to states. (c) An amount estimated at $14,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the Michigan charter school subgrant program, funded from DEDï¿½OII, public charter schools program funds. (d) An amount estimated at $18,000,000.00 $17,700,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purpose of promoting and expanding high-quality preschool services, funded from HHSï¿½OCC, preschool development funds. (e) An amount estimated at $1,500,000.00 $1,715,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purpose of addressing priority substance abuse treatment, prevention, and mental health needs, funded from HHS-SAMHSA. (3) The department, or, for subsections (1)(g) and (2)(d), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, shall distribute all federal funds allocated under this section in accordance with federal law and with flexibility provisions outlined in Public Law 107-116, and in the education flexibility partnership act of 1999, Public Law 106-25. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department or the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, as applicable, shall make payments of federal funds to districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (4) For the purposes of applying for federal grants appropriated under this article, the department, or, for subsections (1)(g) and (2)(d), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, shall allow an intermediate district to submit a consortium application on behalf of 2 or more districts with the agreement of those districts as appropriate according to federal rules and guidelines. (5) For the purposes of funding federal title I grants under this article, in addition to any other federal grants for which the strict discipline academy is eligible, the department, or, for subsections (1)(g) and (2)(d), the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential, shall allocate to a strict discipline academy out of title I, part A an amount equal to what the strict discipline academy would have received if included and calculated under title I, part D, or what it would receive under the formula allocation under title I, part A, whichever is greater. (6) As used in this section: (a) "DED" means the United States Department of Education. (b) "DED-OESE" means the DED Office of Elementary and Secondary Education. (c) "DED-OII" means the DED Office of Innovation and Improvement. (d) "DED-OVAE" means the DED Office of Vocational and Adult Education. (e) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (f) "HHS-OCC" means the HHS Office of Child Care. (g) "HHS-SAMHSA" means the HHS Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Project. Sec. 41. (1) For a district to be eligible to receive funding under this section, the district must administer to English language learners the English language proficiency assessment known as the "WIDA ACCESS for English language learners" or the "WIDA Alternate ACCESS". From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $50,186,100.00 $53,548,600.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for payments to eligible districts for services for English language learners who have been administered the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners. (2) The department shall distribute funding allocated under subsection (1) to eligible districts based on the number of full-time equivalent English language learners as follows: (a) $1,863.00 $1,988.00 per full-time equivalent English language learner who has been assessed under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 1.0 and 1.9, or less, as applicable to each assessment. It is the intent of the legislature to increase this amount until it reaches 75% of the target foundation allowance. (b) $1,286.00 $1,372.00 per full-time equivalent English language learner who has been assessed under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 2.0 and 2.9, or less, as applicable to each assessment. It is the intent of the legislature to increase this amount until it reaches 50% of the target foundation allowance. (c) $210.00 $224.00 per full-time equivalent English language learner who has been assessed under the WIDA ACCESS for English language learners or the WIDA Alternate ACCESS with a WIDA ACCESS or WIDA Alternate ACCESS composite score between 3.0 and 3.9, or less, as applicable to each assessment. It is the intent of the legislature to increase this amount until it reaches 35% of the target foundation allowance. (3) If funds allocated under subsection (1) are insufficient to fully fund the payments as prescribed under subsection (2), the department shall prorate payments on an equal percentage basis, with the same percentage proration applied to all funding categories. (4) By October 15 of the fiscal year following the receipt of funding under subsection (1), each district receiving funds under subsection (1) shall submit to the department a report, not to exceed 10 pages, on the usage by the district of funds under subsection (1) in a form and manner determined by the department, including a brief description of each program conducted or services performed by the district using funds under subsection (1) and the amount of funds under subsection (1) allocated to each of those programs or services. If a district does not comply with this subsection, the department shall withhold an amount equal to the December payment due under this section until the district complies with this subsection. If the district does not comply with this subsection by the end of the fiscal year, the withheld funds are forfeited to the state school aid fund. (5) To receive funds under subsection (1), a district must allow access for the department or the department's designee to audit all records related to the program for which it receives those funds. The district shall reimburse this state for all disallowances found in the audit. (6) Beginning July 1, 2020, and every 3 years thereafter, the department shall review the per-pupil distribution under subsection (2), to ensure that funding levels are appropriate and make recommendations for adjustments to the members of the senate and house subcommittees on K to 12 school aid appropriations. (7) By not later than March 1, 2025, the The department shall establish English language learner program models that establish a minimum number of minutes per week that districts must provide direct English language development instruction for students according to the student's proficiency levels. These models must be compliant with federal requirements related to English language learner program services. It is the intent of the legislature that, beginning in 2025-2026, to To be considered an eligible recipient of funding under this section, a district must agree to meet or exceed the minimum number of minutes per week, as determined by the department, that the district provides direct English language development instruction. Sec. 51a. (1) From the state school aid fund money in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,822,546,100.00 $2,028,196,100.00 for 2023-2024 2024-2025 and there is allocated an amount not to exceed $2,064,096,100.00 $2,245,796,100.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 from state sources and all available federal funding under sections 1411 to 1419 of part B of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1411 to 1419, estimated at $390,000,000.00 for 2023-2024 and $450,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 and $500,000,000.00 for 2025-2026, plus any carryover federal funds from previous year appropriations. In addition, from the state school aid fund money in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $76,150,000.00 for 2023-2024 only to supplement the allocations in this section. The allocations under this subsection are for the purpose of reimbursing districts and intermediate districts for special education programs, services, and special education personnel as prescribed in article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761; net tuition payments made by intermediate districts to the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind; and special education programs and services for pupils who are eligible for special education programs and services according to statute or rule. For meeting the costs of special education programs and services not reimbursed under this article, a district or intermediate district may use money in general funds or special education funds, not otherwise restricted, or contributions from districts to intermediate districts, tuition payments, gifts and contributions from individuals or other entities, or federal funds that may be available for this purpose, as determined by the intermediate district plan prepared under article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments of federal funds to districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (2) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated the amount necessary, estimated at $404,200,000.00 $440,800,000.00 for 2023-2024 2024-2025 and estimated at $456,800,000.00 $491,700,000.00 for 2024-2025, 2025-2026, for payments toward reimbursing districts and intermediate districts for 28.6138% of total approved costs of special education, excluding costs reimbursed under section 53a, and 70.4165% of total approved costs of special education transportation. (3) If the department determines that the amount allocated for a fiscal year to a district or intermediate district under subsection (2) is insufficient to fulfill the specified percentages in subsection (2), the department shall pay the shortfall to the district or intermediate district during the fiscal year beginning on the October 1 following the determination. If the department determines that the amount allocated for a fiscal year to a district or intermediate district under subsection (2) exceeds the sum of the amount necessary to fulfill the specified percentages in subsection (2), the department shall deduct the amount of the excess from the district's or intermediate district's payments under this article for the fiscal year beginning on the October 1 following the determination. (4) State funds are allocated on a total approved cost basis. Federal funds are allocated under applicable federal requirements. (5) From the amount allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,200,000.00 for 2023-2024 and there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,200,000.00 for 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 to reimburse 100% of the net increase in necessary costs incurred by a district or intermediate district in implementing the revisions in the administrative rules for special education that became effective on July 1, 1987. As used in this subsection, "net increase in necessary costs" means the necessary additional costs incurred solely because of new or revised requirements in the administrative rules minus cost savings permitted in implementing the revised rules. The department shall determine net increase in necessary costs in a manner specified by the department. (6) For purposes of this section and sections 51b to 58, all of the following apply: (a) "Total approved costs of special education" are determined in a manner specified by the department and may include indirect costs, but must not exceed 115% of approved direct costs for section 52 and section 53a programs. The total approved costs include salary and other compensation for all approved special education personnel for the program, including payments for Social Security and Medicare and public school employee retirement system contributions. The total approved costs do not include salaries or other compensation paid to administrative personnel who are not special education personnel as that term is defined in section 6 of the revised school code, MCL 380.6. Costs reimbursed by federal funds, other than those federal funds included in the allocation made under this article, are not included. Special education approved personnel not utilized full time in the evaluation of students or in the delivery of special education programs, ancillary, and other related services are reimbursed under this section only for that portion of time actually spent providing these programs and services, with the exception of special education programs and services provided to youth placed in child caring institutions or juvenile detention programs approved by the department to provide an on-grounds education program. (b) Reimbursement for ancillary and other related services, as that term is defined by R 340.1701c of the Michigan Administrative Code, is not provided when those services are covered by and available through private group health insurance carriers or federal reimbursed program sources unless the department and district or intermediate district agree otherwise and that agreement is approved by the state budget director. Expenses, other than the incidental expense of filing, must not be borne by the parent. In addition, the filing of claims must not delay the education of a pupil. A district or intermediate district is responsible for payment of a deductible amount and for an advance payment required until the time a claim is paid. (c) If an intermediate district purchases a special education pupil transportation service from a constituent district that was previously purchased from a private entity; if the purchase from the constituent district is at a lower cost, adjusted for changes in fuel costs; and if the cost shift from the intermediate district to the constituent does not result in any net change in the revenue the constituent district receives from payments under sections 22b and 51c, then upon application by the intermediate district, the department shall direct the intermediate district to continue to report the cost associated with the specific identified special education pupil transportation service and shall adjust the costs reported by the constituent district to remove the cost associated with that specific service. (7) A pupil who is enrolled in a full-time special education program conducted or administered by an intermediate district or a pupil who is enrolled in the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind is not included in the membership count of a district, but is counted in membership in the intermediate district of residence. (8) Special education personnel transferred from 1 district to another to implement the revised school code are entitled to the rights, benefits, and tenure to which the individual would otherwise be entitled had that individual been employed by the receiving district originally. (9) If a district or intermediate district uses money received under this section for a purpose other than the purpose or purposes for which the money is allocated, the department may require the district or intermediate district to refund the amount of money received. The department shall deposit money that is refunded in the state treasury to the credit of the state school aid fund. (10) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated the amount necessary, estimated at $1,700,000.00 for 2023-2024 and estimated at $1,700,000.00 $1,500,000.00 for 2024-2025 and 2025-2026, to pay the foundation allowances for pupils described in this subsection. The department shall calculate the allocation to a district under this subsection by multiplying the number of pupils described in this subsection who are counted in membership in the district times the sum of the foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupil's district of residence, plus the amount of the district's per-pupil allocation under section 20m, not to exceed the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, or, for a pupil described in this subsection who is counted in membership in a district that is a public school academy, times an amount equal to the amount per membership pupil under section 20(6). The department shall calculate the allocation to an intermediate district under this subsection in the same manner as for a district, using the foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupil's district of residence not to exceed the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year and that district's per-pupil allocation under section 20m. This subsection applies to all of the following pupils: (a) Pupils described in section 53a. (b) Pupils counted in membership in an intermediate district who are not special education pupils and are served by the intermediate district in a juvenile detention or child caring facility. (c) Pupils with an emotional impairment counted in membership by an intermediate district and provided educational services by the department of health and human services. (11) If it is determined that funds allocated under subsection (2) or (10) or under section 51c will not be expended, funds up to the amount necessary and available may be used to supplement the allocations under subsection (2) or (10) or under section 51c to fully fund those allocations. After payments under subsections (2) and (10) and section 51c, the department shall expend the remaining funds from the allocation in subsection (1) in the following order: (a) One hundred percent of the reimbursement required under section 53a. (b) One hundred percent of the reimbursement required under subsection (5). (c) One hundred percent of the payment required under section 54. (d) One hundred percent of the payments under section 56. (12) The allocations under subsections (2) and (10) are allocations to intermediate districts only and are not allocations to districts, but instead are calculations used only to determine the state payments under section 22b. (13) If a public school academy that is not a cyber school, as that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, enrolls under this section a pupil who resides outside of the intermediate district in which the public school academy is located and who is eligible for special education programs and services according to statute or rule, or who is a child with a disability, as that term is defined under the individuals with disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446, the intermediate district in which the public school academy is located and the public school academy shall enter into a written agreement with the intermediate district in which the pupil resides for the purpose of providing the pupil with a free appropriate public education, and the written agreement must include at least an agreement on the responsibility for the payment of the added costs of special education programs and services for the pupil. If the public school academy that enrolls the pupil does not enter into an agreement under this subsection, the public school academy shall not charge the pupil's resident intermediate district or the intermediate district in which the public school academy is located the added costs of special education programs and services for the pupil, and the public school academy is not eligible for any payouts based on the funding formula outlined in the resident or nonresident intermediate district's plan. If a pupil is not enrolled in a public school academy under this subsection, the provision of special education programs and services and the payment of the added costs of special education programs and services for a pupil described in this subsection are the responsibility of the district and intermediate district in which the pupil resides. (14) For the purpose of receiving its federal allocation under part B of the individuals with disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446, a public school academy that is a cyber school, as that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, and is in compliance with section 553a of the revised school code, MCL 380.553a, directly receives the federal allocation under part B of the individuals with disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446, from the intermediate district in which the cyber school is located, as the subrecipient. If the intermediate district does not distribute the funds described in this subsection to the cyber school by the part B application due date of July 1, the department may distribute the funds described in this subsection directly to the cyber school according to the formula prescribed in 34 CFR 300.705 and 34 CFR 300.816. Beginning July 1, 2021, this subsection is subject to section 8c. It is the intent of the legislature that the immediately preceding sentence apply retroactively and is effective July 1, 2021. (15) For a public school academy that is a cyber school, as that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, and is in compliance with section 553a of the revised school code, MCL 380.553a, that enrolls a pupil under this section, the intermediate district in which the cyber school is located shall ensure that the cyber school complies with sections 1701a, 1703, 1704, 1751, 1752, 1756, and 1757 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701a, 380.1703, 380.1704, 380.1751, 380.1752, 380.1756, and 380.1757; applicable rules; and the individuals with disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446. Beginning July 1, 2021, this subsection is subject to section 8c. It is the intent of the legislature that the immediately preceding sentence apply retroactively and is effective July 1, 2021. (16) For the purposes of this section, the department or the center shall only require a district or intermediate district to report information that is not already available from the financial information database maintained by the center. Sec. 51c. As required by the court in the consolidated cases known as Durant v State of Michigan, 456 Mich 175 (1997), from the allocation under section 51a(1), there is allocated for 2023-2024 and for 2024-2025 and for 2025-2026, the amount necessary, estimated at $903,300,000.00 $994,200,000.00 for 2023-2024 2024-2025 and $1,016,400,000.00 $1,108,900,000.00 for 2024-2025, 2025-2026, for payments to reimburse districts for 28.6138% of total approved costs of special education excluding costs reimbursed under section 53a, and 70.4165% of total approved costs of special education transportation. Funds allocated under this section that are not expended in the fiscal year for which they were allocated, as determined by the department, may be used to supplement the allocations under sections 22a and 22b to fully fund those allocations for the same fiscal year. Sec. 51d. (1) From the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2023-2024 2024-2025 all available federal funding, estimated at $72,000,000.00, $83,000,000.00, and there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 all available federal funding, estimated at $83,000,000.00, for special education programs and services that are funded by federal grants. The department shall distribute all federal funds allocated under this section in accordance with federal law. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments of federal funds to districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (2) From the federal funds allocated under subsection (1), the following amounts are allocated: (a) For 2023-2024, 2024-2025, an amount estimated at $15,000,000.00 $14,000,000.00 and for 2024-2025, 2025-2026, an amount estimated at $14,000,000.00 for handicapped infants and toddlers, funded from DED-OSERS, handicapped infants and toddlers funds. (b) For 2023-2024, 2024-2025, an amount estimated at $14,000,000.00 and for 2024-2025, 2025-2026, an amount estimated at $14,000,000.00 for preschool grants under Public Law 94-142, funded from DED-OSERS, handicapped preschool incentive funds. (c) For 2023-2024, 2024-2025, an amount estimated at $43,000,000.00 $55,000,000.00 and for 2024-2025, 2025-2026, an amount estimated at $55,000,000.00 for special education programs funded by DED-OSERS, handicapped program, individuals with disabilities act funds. (3) As used in this section, "DED-OSERS" means the United States Department of Education Office of Special Education and Rehabilitative Services. Sec. 51e. (1) From the allocation under section 51a(1), there is allocated for the amount necessary, estimated at $499,900,000.00 $502,100,000.00 for 2023-2024 2024-2025 and $499,600,000.00 $535,600,000.00 for 2024-2025, 2025-2026, for payments to districts and intermediate districts for 100% of foundation allowance costs associated with special education pupils. (2) The department shall calculate the amount allocated to a district under this section by multiplying the district's special education pupil membership, excluding pupils described in section 51a(11), times 100% of the foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupil's district of residence, plus 100% of the amount of the district's per-pupil allocation under section 20m, not to exceed 100% of the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, or, for a special education pupil in membership in a district that is a public school academy, times an amount equal to 100% of the amount per membership pupil calculated under section 20(6). For an intermediate district, the amount allocated under this subsection is an amount per special education membership pupil, excluding pupils described in section 51a(11), and is calculated in the same manner as for a district, using 100% of the foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupil's district of residence, not to exceed 100% of the target foundation allowance for the current fiscal year, and 100% of that district's per-pupil allocation under section 20m. Sec. 51g. From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, $3,000,000.00 is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to an association for administrators of special education services to develop content for use by special education students, teachers, and others. Any content that is developed as described in this section must be accessible throughout this state. Funds received by an association under this section may be used to support the development of assessment tools to measure the needs of students with special education needs in remote learning environments and the effectiveness of various educational methods and tools, in collaboration with the department. Funds under this section may also be utilized to identify any available federal funds for research related to special education in remote learning. Sec. 51h. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only $500,000.00 to Clinton County RESA to partner with an independent entity that has extensive experience in school finance , including the opportunity index, to conduct research, interviews, data collection, analysis, and financial modeling to develop an implementation framework that outlines the cost of fully providing special education services and supports to students with disabilities through the application of an equity-driven model. (2) The study described in subsection (1) must include key areas of school finance related to the education costs of students with disabilities. The study must provide objective guidance to the legislature regarding both of the following: (a) Modeling analysis of a weighted funding formula related to students with disabilities to determine accurate cost estimates to fully fund special education according to consensus-built weighted multipliers. (b) Policy and implementation recommendations based on an equitable framework that considers the intersection with the opportunity index and that will improve how this state funds students with disabilities. (3) Within 30 days after the completion of the study, the independent entity shall issue a report with its findings to the department, the house and senate fiscal agencies, the state budget director, the senate appropriations subcommittee on pre-K to 12, the house appropriations subcommittee on school aid and education, and the house and senate standing committees responsible for education legislation. (4) Within 60 days after the completion of the study, the independent entity shall make its findings available on a publicly available website. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 53a. (1) For districts, reimbursement for pupils described in subsection (2) is 100% of the total approved costs of operating special education programs and services approved by the department and included in the intermediate district plan adopted under article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761, minus the district's foundation allowance calculated under section 20 and minus the district's per-pupil allocation under section 20m. For intermediate districts, the department shall calculate reimbursement for pupils described in subsection (2) in the same manner as for a district, using the foundation allowance under section 20 of the pupil's district of residence, not to exceed the target foundation allowance under section 20 for the current fiscal year plus the amount of the district's per-pupil allocation under section 20m. (2) Reimbursement under subsection (1) is for the following special education pupils: (a) Pupils assigned to a district or intermediate district through the community placement program of the courts or a state agency, if the pupil was a resident of another intermediate district at the time the pupil came under the jurisdiction of the court or a state agency. (b) Pupils who are residents of institutions operated by the department of health and human services. (c) Pupils who are former residents of department of community health institutions for the developmentally disabled who are placed in community settings other than the pupil's home. (d) Pupils enrolled in a department-approved on-grounds educational program longer than 180 days, but not longer than 233 days, at a residential child care institution, if the child care institution offered in 1991-92 an on-grounds educational program longer than 180 days but not longer than 233 days. (e) Pupils placed in a district by a parent for the purpose of seeking a suitable home, if the parent does not reside in the same intermediate district as the district in which the pupil is placed. (3) Only those costs that are clearly and directly attributable to educational programs for pupils described in subsection (2), and that would not have been incurred if the pupils were not being educated in a district or intermediate district, are reimbursable under this section. (4) The costs of transportation are funded under this section and are not reimbursed under section 58. (5) The department shall not allocate more than $10,500,000.00 of the allocation for 2024-2025 2025-2026 in section 51a(1) under this section. Sec. 54. Each intermediate district receives an amount per pupil for each pupil in attendance at the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind. The amount is proportionate to the total instructional cost at each school. The department shall not allocate more than $1,688,000.00 of the allocation for 2024-2025 2025-2026 in section 51a(1) under this section. Sec. 54b. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,600,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to expand the implementation of the literacy and social, emotional, and behavioral components of a multi-tiered system of supports, including positive behavioral interventions and supports, using the MiMTSS Technical Assistance Center. (2) The department shall use funds allocated under this section for the purpose of expanding the statewide expertise, technical assistance, and implementation of the multi-tiered system of supports, dyslexia expertise, and evidence-based instructional practices grounded in the science of reading using the MiMTSS Technical Assistance Center, a nationally recognized program. In addition, the department shall identify an intermediate district to act as a fiscal agent for these funds. (3) As used in this section, "MiMTSS Technical Assistance Center" means the Michigan Multi-Tiered System of Supports Technical Assistance Center. Sec. 54d. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $23,670,700.00 $25,256,600.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to intermediate districts for the purpose of providing state early on services programs for children from birth to 3 years of age with a developmental delay or a disability, or both, and their families, as described in the early on Michigan state plan, as approved by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (2) To be eligible to receive grant funding under this section, each intermediate district must apply in a form and manner determined by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (3) The grant funding allocated under this section must be used to increase early on services and resources available to children that demonstrate developmental delays to help prepare them for success as they enter school. State early on services include evaluating and providing early intervention services for eligible infants and toddlers and their families to address developmental delays, including those affecting physical, cognitive, communication, adaptive, social, or emotional development. Grant funds must not be used to supplant existing services that are currently being provided. (4) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall distribute the funds allocated under subsection (1) to intermediate districts according to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential's department's early on funding formula utilized to distribute the federal award to Michigan under part C of the individuals with disabilities education act, Public Law 108-446. Funds received under this section must not supplant existing funds or resources allocated for early on early intervention services. An intermediate district receiving funds under this section shall maximize the capture of Medicaid funds to support early on early intervention services to the extent possible. (5) Each intermediate district that receives funds under this section shall report data and other information to the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential in a form, manner, and frequency prescribed by the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential to allow for monitoring and evaluation of the program and to ensure that the children described in subsection (1) received appropriate levels and types of services delivered by qualified personnel, based on the individual needs of the children and their families. (6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (7) Grant funds awarded and allocated to an intermediate district under this section must be expended by the grant recipient before June 30 of the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in which the funds were received. Sec. 55. (1) From the state school aid general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 only to Grand Valley State University to collaborate with the Conductive Learning Center operating in conjunction with Grand Valley State University. This funding must be used to support the operational costs of the conductive education model taught at the Conductive Learning Center to maximize the independence and mobility of children and adults with neuromotor disabilities. The conductive education model funded under this section must be based on the concept of neuroplasticity and the ability of people to learn and improve when they are motivated, regardless of the severity of their disability. (2) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall distribute the funding allocated under this section to Grand Valley State University the Conductive Learning Center by not later than December 1, 2024. Sec. 56. (1) For the purposes of this section: (a) "Membership" means for a particular fiscal year the total membership of the intermediate district and the districts constituent to the intermediate district, except that if a district has elected not to come under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741, membership of the district is not included in the membership of the intermediate district."Capped local special education property tax revenue" means the amount of revenue that would be received if an intermediate district levied the maximum millage rate permitted for that intermediate district under section 1724a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1724a, capped at the statewide average special education millage rate. (b) "Millage levied" means the millage levied in the immediately preceding fiscal year for special education under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741, including a levy for debt service obligations. (c) "Special education head count" means, for a particular fiscal year, the total special education head count of an intermediate district and the districts constituent to the intermediate district from the fall pupil membership count day of the immediately preceding year, except that if a district has elected not to come under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741, special education head count of the district is not included in the special education head count of the intermediate district. (d) "Statewide average special education millage rate" means the statewide levy amount divided by the statewide taxable value. (e) "Statewide average taxable value per unreimbursed costs" means the statewide taxable value divided by the statewide unreimbursed costs. (f) (c) "Taxable value" means the total taxable value of the districts constituent to an intermediate district in the immediately preceding fiscal year, except that if a district has elected not to come under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741, taxable value of the district is not included in the taxable value of the intermediate district. Taxable value also includes both of the following: (i) The value of personal property exempt under the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362, and reimbursed to the intermediate district under section 17 of the local community stabilization authority act, 2024 PA 86, MCL 123.1357. (ii) Tax increment property captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, and reimbursed to the intermediate district under section 15b of the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2665b. (g) "Unreimbursed costs" means the sum of costs reported on the SE-4094 and SE-4096 reports for all districts in the intermediate district, less the amount of reimbursement received under section 51c, and less the capped local special education property tax revenue. (2) From the allocation under section 51a(1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $40,008,100.00 for 2023-2024 and $40,008,100.00 $92,708,100.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to reimburse intermediate districts levying millages for special education under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741. The purpose, use, and expenditure of the reimbursement are limited as if the funds were generated by these millages and governed by the intermediate district plan adopted under article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761. As a condition of receiving funds under this section, an intermediate district distributing any portion of special education millage funds to its constituent districts must submit for departmental approval and implement a distribution plan. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, reimbursement for those millages levied in 2022-2023 is made in 2023-2024 at an amount per 2022-2023 membership pupil computed by subtracting from $241,300.00 the 2022-2023 taxable value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting difference by the 2022-2023 millage levied, and then subtracting from that amount the 2022-2023 local community stabilization share revenue for special education purposes and 2022-2023 tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for reimbursement of personal property exemption loss under the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described in the previous sentence only, for an intermediate district receiving funds under this section and section 62, reimbursements paid under section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of special education millage levied, as defined in this section, and the sum of special education millage levied and vocational-technical education millage levied, as defined in section 62. Reimbursement in 2023-2024 for an intermediate district whose 2017-2018 allocation was affected by the operation of subsection (5) is an amount equal to 102.5% of the 2017-2018 allocation to that intermediate district. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, reimbursement for those millages levied in 2023-2024 is made in 2024-2025 at an amount per 2023-2024 membership pupil computed by subtracting from $260,200.00 the 2023-2024 taxable value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting difference by the 2023-2024 millage levied, and then subtracting from that amount the 2023-2024 local community stabilization share revenue for special education purposes and 2023-2024 tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for reimbursement of personal property exemption loss under the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described in the previous sentence only, for an intermediate district receiving funds under this section and section 62, reimbursements paid under section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of special education millage levied, as defined in this section, and the sum of special education millage levied and vocational-technical education millage levied, as defined in section 62. Reimbursement in 2024-2025 for an intermediate district whose 2017-2018 allocation was affected by the operation of subsection (5) is an amount equal to 102.5% of the 2017-2018 allocation to that intermediate district. (5) The department shall ensure that the amount paid to a single intermediate district under subsection (2) does not exceed 62.9% of the total amount allocated under subsection (2). (6) The department shall ensure that the amount paid to a single intermediate district under subsection (2) is not less than 75% of the amount allocated to the intermediate district under subsection (2) for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (7) From the allocation under section 51a(1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $34,200,000.00 for 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 to provide payments to intermediate districts levying millages for special education under part 30 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1711 to 380.1741. The purpose, use, and expenditure of the payments under this subsection are limited as if the funds were generated by these millages and governed by the intermediate district plan adopted under article 3 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1701 to 380.1761. The department shall provide a payment under this subsection to each intermediate district described in this subsection as follows: (a) For 2023-2024 and 2024-2025, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for an intermediate district with a 3-year average special education millage revenue per pupil in the immediately preceding fiscal year that is less than $251.00 and that is levying at least 46.2% but less than 60.0% of its maximum millage rate allowed under section 1724a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1724a, an amount computed by subtracting from $251.00 the 3-year average special education millage revenue per pupil in the immediately preceding fiscal year and, only if the millage levied by the intermediate district is less than 1, multiplying that amount by the number of mills levied divided by 1, and then multiplying that amount by the 3-year average membership in the immediately preceding fiscal year, and then subtracting from that amount the amount allocated under subsection (2) for the current fiscal year. If the calculation under this subdivision results in an amount below zero, there is no payment under this subdivision. (b) For 2023-2024 and 2024-2025, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for an intermediate district with a 3-year average special education millage revenue per pupil in the immediately preceding fiscal year that is less than $296.00 and that is levying at least 60.0% of its maximum millage rate allowed under section 1724a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1724a, an amount computed by subtracting from $296.00 the 3-year average special education millage revenue per pupil in the immediately preceding fiscal year, and, only if the millage levied by the intermediate district is less than 1, multiplying that amount by the number of mills levied divided by 1, and then multiplying that amount by the 3-year average membership in the immediately preceding fiscal year, and then subtracting from that amount the amount allocated under subsection (2) for the current fiscal year. If the calculation under this subdivision results in an amount below zero, there is no payment under this subdivision. (8) After making allocations to eligible intermediate districts under subsections (3), (4), and (7), if funds remain unallocated from the allocations under subsections (2) and (7), the department must allocate remaining funds to intermediate districts proportional to the amounts allocated to intermediate districts under subsections (3) and (4). (9) As used in subsection (7): (a) "3-year average membership" means the 3-year average pupil membership for each of the 3 most recent fiscal years. (b) "3-year average special education millage revenue per pupil" means the 3-year average taxable value per mill levied behind each membership pupil for each of the 3 most recent fiscal years multiplied by the millage levied in the most recent fiscal year. (3) The department shall provide payments under subsection (2) to each intermediate district described in this subsection as follows: (a) The department shall first calculate a reimbursement for those millages levied in the immediately preceding fiscal year at an amount per special education head count, by subtracting the intermediate district's taxable value per special education head count from the statewide average taxable value per special education head count, and multiplying the resulting difference by the immediately preceding fiscal year millage rate levied, capped at the statewide average special education millage rate. (b) The department shall then calculate a reimbursement for unreimbursed costs by subtracting the quotient of the intermediate district's taxable value and the statewide average taxable value per unreimbursed costs from the intermediate district's unreimbursed costs. (c) The calculation under subdivision (a) must be greater than $0.00 for an intermediate district to receive reimbursement under this subsection. For those intermediate districts whose calculation under subdivision (a) is less than or equal to $0.00, the amount in subdivision (b) is $0.00 for purposes of the calculation in subdivision (d). (d) The department shall then calculate the average of the amounts calculated under subdivisions (a) and (b) for each intermediate district. For the purpose of this calculation, calculations in subdivision (a) or (b) that result in negative totals are treated as $0.00. (e) The amount reimbursed under subsection (2) is the 3-year average of the amount calculated under subdivision (d) for the 3 most recent fiscal years. (4) If total payments calculated under subsection (3) exceed the amount allocated in subsection (2), the department must prorate the payments on an equal percentage basis. Sec. 61a. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $39,899,800.00 $41,599,800.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to reimburse on an added cost basis districts, except for a district that served as the fiscal agent for a vocational education consortium in the 1993-94 school year and that has a foundation allowance as calculated under section 20 greater than the target foundation allowance under that section, and secondary area vocational-technical education centers for secondary-level career and technical education programs according to rules approved by the superintendent. Applications for participation in the programs must be submitted in the form prescribed by the department. The department shall determine the added cost for each career and technical education program area. The department shall prioritize the allocation of added cost funds based on the capital and program expenditures needed to operate the career and technical education programs provided; the number of pupils enrolled; the advancement of pupils through the instructional program; the existence of an articulation agreement with at least 1 postsecondary institution that provides pupils with opportunities to earn postsecondary credit during the pupil's participation in the career and technical education program and transfers those credits to the postsecondary institution upon completion of the career and technical education program; and the program rank in student placement, job openings, and wages, and shall ensure that the allocation does not exceed 75% of the added cost of any program. Notwithstanding any rule or department determination to the contrary, when determining a district's allocation or the formula for making allocations under this section, the department shall include the participation of pupils in grade 9 in all of those determinations and in all portions of the formula. With the approval of the department, the board of a district maintaining a secondary career and technical education program may offer the program for the period from the close of the school year until September 1. The program shall use existing facilities and must be operated as prescribed by rules promulgated by the superintendent. (2) Except for a district that served as the fiscal agent for a vocational education consortium in the 1993-94 school year, the department shall reimburse districts and intermediate districts for local career and technical education administration, shared time career and technical education administration, and career education planning district career and technical education administration. The superintendent shall adopt guidelines for the definition of what constitutes administration and shall make reimbursement pursuant to those guidelines. The department shall not distribute more than $800,000.00 of the allocation in subsection (1) under this subsection. (3) A career and technical education program funded under this section may provide an opportunity for participants who are eligible to be funded under section 107 to enroll in the career and technical education program funded under this section if the participation does not occur during regular school hours. Sec. 61b. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $8,000,000.00 $8,400,000.00 for CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs authorized under this section and for planning grants for the development or expansion of CTE early middle college programs. The purpose of these programs is to increase the number of Michigan residents with high-quality degrees or credentials, and to increase the number of students who are college and career ready upon high school graduation. (2) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), the department shall allocate an amount as determined under this subsection to each intermediate district serving as a fiscal agent for state-approved CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs in each of the career education planning districts identified by the department. An intermediate district shall not use more than 5% of the funds allocated under this subsection for administrative costs for serving as the fiscal agent. (3) To be an eligible fiscal agent, an intermediate district must agree to do all of the following in a form and manner determined by the department: (a) Distribute funds to eligible CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs in a career education planning district as described in this section. (b) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory council in the workforce development board service delivery area to develop 1 regional strategic plan under subsection (4) that aligns CTE programs and services into an efficient and effective delivery system for high school students. The department will align career education planning districts, workforce development board service delivery areas, and intermediate districts for the purpose of creating 1 regional strategic plan for each workforce development board service delivery area. (c) Implement a regional process to rank career clusters in the workforce development board service delivery area as described under subsection (4). Regional processes must be approved by the department before the ranking of career clusters. (d) Report CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment program and student data and information as prescribed by the department and the center. (e) The local education agency responsible for student reporting in the Michigan student data system (MSDS) will report the total number of college credits the student earned, at the time of high school graduation, as determined by the department and the center. (f) The local education agency will report each award outcome in the Michigan student data system (MSDS) that the CTE early middle college student attained. For purposes of this subsection, an on-track CTE early middle college graduate is a graduate who obtained their high school diploma and at least 1 of the following: (i) An associate degree. (ii) 60 transferable college credits. (iii) Professional certification. (iv) A Michigan Early Middle College Association certificate. (v) Participation in a registered apprenticeship. (4) A regional strategic plan must be approved by the career and educational advisory council before submission to the department. A regional strategic plan must include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) An identification of regional employer need based on a ranking of all career clusters in the workforce development board service delivery area ranked by 10-year projections of annual job openings and median wage for each standard occupational code in each career cluster as obtained from the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. Standard occupational codes within high-ranking clusters also may be further ranked by median wage and annual job openings. The career and educational advisory council located in the workforce development board service delivery area shall review the rankings and modify them if necessary to accurately reflect employer demand for talent in the workforce development board service delivery area. A career and educational advisory council shall document that it has conducted this review and certify that it is accurate. These career cluster rankings must be determined and updated once every 4 years. (b) An identification of educational entities in the workforce development board service delivery area that will provide eligible CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs including districts, intermediate districts, postsecondary institutions, and noncredit occupational training programs leading to an industry-recognized credential. (c) A strategy to inform parents and students of CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs in the workforce development board service delivery area. (d) Any other requirements as defined by the department. (5) An eligible CTE program is a program that meets all of the following: (a) Has been identified in the highest 5 career cluster rankings in any of the 16 workforce development board service delivery area strategic plans jointly approved by the department of labor and economic opportunity and the department. (b) Has a coherent sequence of courses in a specific career cluster that will allow a student to earn a high school diploma and achieve at least 1 of the following: (i) For CTE early middle college, outcomes as defined in subsection (3)(f). (ii) For CTE dual enrollment, 1 of the following: (A) An associate degree. (B) An industry-recognized technical certification approved by the department of labor and economic opportunity. (C) Up to 60 transferable college credits. (D) Participation in a registered apprenticeship, pre-apprenticeship, or apprentice readiness program. (c) Is aligned with the Michigan merit curriculum. (d) Has an articulation or a college credit agreement with at least 1 postsecondary institution that provides students with opportunities to receive postsecondary credits during the student's participation in the CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program and transfers those credits to the postsecondary institution upon completion of the CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program. (e) Provides instruction that is supervised, directed, or coordinated by an appropriately certificated CTE teacher or, for concurrent enrollment courses, a postsecondary faculty member. (f) Provides for highly integrated student support services that include at least the following: (i) Teachers as academic advisors. (ii) Supervised course selection. (iii) Monitoring of student progress and completion. (iv) Career planning services provided by a local one-stop service center as described in the Michigan works one-stop service center system act, 2006 PA 491, MCL 408.111 to 408.135, or by a high school counselor or advisor. (g) Has courses that are taught on a college campus, are college courses offered at the high school and taught by college faculty, or are courses taught in combination with online instruction. (6) The department shall distribute funds to eligible CTE early middle college and CTE dual enrollment programs as follows: (a) The department shall determine statewide average CTE costs per pupil for each CIP code program by calculating statewide average costs for each CIP code program for the 3 most recent fiscal years. (b) The distribution to each eligible CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program is the product of 50% of CTE costs per pupil times the pupil enrollment of each eligible CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program in the immediately preceding school year. (7) To receive funds under this section, a CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program shall furnish to the intermediate district that is the fiscal agent identified in subsection (2), in a form and manner determined by the department, all information needed to administer this program and meet federal reporting requirements; shall allow the department or the department's designee to review all records related to the program for which it receives funds; and shall reimburse the state for all disallowances found in the review, as determined by the department. (8) There is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 from the funds under subsection (1) an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 from the state school aid fund allocation for grants to intermediate districts or consortia of intermediate districts for the purpose of planning for new or expanded early middle college programs. Applications for grants must be submitted in a form and manner determined by the department. The amount of a grant under this subsection must not exceed $50,000.00. To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, an intermediate district or consortia of intermediate districts must provide matching funds equal to the grant received under this subsection. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this subsection in the manner determined by the department. (9) Funds distributed under this section may be used to fund program expenditures that would otherwise be paid from foundation allowances. A program receiving funding under section 61a may receive funding under this section for allowable costs that exceed the reimbursement the program received under section 61a. The combined payments received by a program under section 61a and this section must not exceed the total allowable costs of the program. A program provider shall not use more than 5% of the funds allocated under this section to the program for administrative costs. (10) If the allocation under subsection (1) is insufficient to fully fund payments as otherwise calculated under this section, the department shall prorate payments under this section on an equal percentage basis. (11) If pupils enrolled in a career cluster in an eligible CTE early middle college or CTE dual enrollment program qualify to be reimbursed under this section, those pupils continue to qualify for reimbursement until graduation, even if the career cluster is no longer identified as being in the highest 5 career cluster rankings. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Allowable costs" means those costs directly attributable to the program as jointly determined by the department of labor and economic opportunity and the department. (b) "Career and educational advisory council" means an advisory council to the local workforce development boards located in a workforce development board service delivery area consisting of educational, employer, labor, and parent representatives. (c) "CIP" means classification of instructional programs. (d) "CTE" means career and technical education programs. (e) "CTE dual enrollment program" means a 4-year high school program of postsecondary courses offered by eligible postsecondary educational institutions that leads to an industry-recognized certification or degree. (f) "Early middle college program" means a 5-year high school program. (g) "Eligible postsecondary educational institution" means that term as defined in section 3 of the career and technical preparation act, 2000 PA 258, MCL 388.1903. Sec. 61c. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 only an amount not to exceed $150,000,000.00 to districts and eligible CEPDs for the purposes described in this section. (2) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $75,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 to eligible CEPDs for a grant program described in this subsection to be distributed in rounds as follows: (a) To be eligible to receive funding in the first round of grants under this subsection, at least 50% of the area served by a CEPD must be located in an intermediate district that did not levy a vocational education millage in 2025. Each eligible CEPD described in this subdivision must apply in a form and manner prescribed by the department. An application must include the funding amount requested by the CEPD. Funding to an eligible CEPD under this subdivision must be equal to the quotient of the allocation under this subsection and the number of eligible CEPDs applying for funding in the first round of grants, or the individual CEPD's requested funding amount, whichever is less. (b) If funding remains after the first round of grants under subdivision (a), the department may administer a second round of grants under this subsection. To be eligible to receive funding in the second round of grants, a CEPD must not have been eligible for funding in the first round of grants. Each eligible CEPD described in this subdivision must apply in a form and manner prescribed by the department. An application must include the funding amount requested by the CEPD. Funding to each eligible CEPD described in this subdivision must be equal to the quotient of the funds remaining after the first round of grants and the number of CEPDs applying for funding in the second round of grants. (c) At least 50% of the funding allocated to each eligible CEPD must be used to update equipment in current state-approved CTE programs that have been identified in the highest 5 career cluster rankings in any of the prosperity regions in the most recent CEPD regional strategic plans approved by the department, for training on new equipment, for professional development relating to computer science or coding or new equipment purchases, for the replacement of old or outdated equipment or new equipment in existing state-approved CTE programs that align with new technology used in industries, or for new and emerging certified state-approved CTE programs to allow CEPD administrators to provide programming in communities that will enhance economic development. The funding for equipment should be used to support and enhance community areas that have sustained job growth, and act as a commitment to build a more qualified and skilled workforce. In addition, each CEPD is encouraged to explore the option of leasing equipment from local private industry to encourage the use of the most advanced equipment. (d) The allocation of funds under this subsection at the local level must be determined by CEPD administrators using data from the state, region, and local sources to make well-informed decisions on program equipment improvements. Grants awarded by CEPD administrators for capital infrastructure costs related to the purchase of new equipment must be used to ensure that state-approved CTE programs can deliver educational programs in high-wage, high-skill, and high-demand occupations. Each CEPD shall continue to ensure that program advisory boards make recommendations on needed improvements for equipment that support job growth and job skill development and retention for both the present and the future. (3) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $75,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 to districts for grants to support new CTE programs. Funding in this subsection is intended to be allocated by the department over a 5-year period as follows: (a) An award under this subsection may be used by a district for capital, labor, and program development costs associated with starting a new CTE program in a CTE desert or in a district that has a career and technical education opportunity gap. As used in this subsection, "CTE desert" means a geographic area with limited or inequitable access to career and technical education programs, as determined by the department. (b) Eligible districts shall apply on a competitive basis for funding in a form and manner determined by the department. (c) Awards must be received by the district over a 5-year period, as follows: (i) In the first award year, the district shall receive reimbursement for 90% of the added costs of each new CTE program, as determined by the department. (ii) In the second award year, the district shall receive reimbursement for 80% of the added costs of each new CTE program, as determined by the department. (iii) In the third award year, the district shall receive reimbursement for 70% of the added costs of each new CTE program, as determined by the department. (iv) In the fourth award year, the district shall receive reimbursement for 60% of the added costs of each new CTE program, as determined by the department. (v) In the fifth award year, the district shall receive reimbursement for 50% of the added costs of each new CTE program, as determined by the department. (d) A district that receives an award under this subsection may also apply for and receive an award under section 61a. However, the department must subtract from the added costs calculated in that section any reimbursement the district receives under this subsection. (4) Not later than December 15 of each fiscal year, each CEPD and district that receives funding under this section shall annually report to the department, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the legislature on equipment purchased under this section. In addition, the report must identify growth data on program involvement, retention, and development of student skills. (5) The funds allocated under this section for 2025-2026 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2025-2026 do not lapse to the state school aid fund and are carried forward into 2026-2027. The purpose of the work project is to continue support for CTE equipment and new CTE programs. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2030. (6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (7) As used in this section: (a) "CEPD" means a career education planning district described in this section. (b) "CTE" means career and technical education. Sec. 61d. (1) From the appropriation in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $5,304,300.00 $5,554,300.00 from the state school aid fund for additional payments to districts for career and technical education programs for the purpose of increasing the number of Michigan residents with high-quality degrees or credentials, and to increase the number of pupils who are college- and career-ready upon high school graduation. (2) The department shall calculate payments to districts under this section in the following manner: (a) A payment of $35.00 $37.00 multiplied by the number of pupils in grades 9 to 12 who are counted in membership in the district and are enrolled in at least 1 career and technical education program. (b) An additional payment of $35.00 $37.00 multiplied by the number of pupils in grades 9 to 12 who are counted in membership in the district and are enrolled in at least 1 career and technical education program that provides instruction in critical skills and high-demand career fields. (3) If the allocation under subsection (1) is insufficient to fully fund payments under subsection (2), the department shall prorate payments under this section on an equal per-pupil basis. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Career and technical education program" means a state-approved career and technical education program, as determined by the department. (b) "Career and technical education program that provides instruction in critical skills and high-demand career field" means a career and technical education program classified under any of the following 2-digit classification of instructional programs (CIP) codes: (i) 01, which refers to "agriculture, agriculture operations, and related sciences". (ii) 03, which refers to "natural resources and conservation". (iii) 10 through 11, which refers to "communications technologies/technicians and support services" and "computer and information sciences and support services". (iv) 14 through 15, which refers to "engineering" and "engineering technologies and engineering-related fields". (v) 26, which refers to "biological and biomedical sciences". (vi) 46 through 48, which refers to "construction trades", "mechanic and repair technologies/technicians", and "precision production". (vii) 51, which refers to "health professions and related programs". Sec. 62. (1) For the purposes of this section: (a) "Membership" means for a particular fiscal year the total membership of the intermediate district and the districts constituent to the intermediate district or the total membership of the area vocational-technical program, except that if a district has elected not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, the membership of that district are not included in the membership of the intermediate district. However, the membership of a district that has elected not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, is included in the membership of the intermediate district if the district meets both of the following: (i) The district operates the area vocational-technical education program pursuant to a contract with the intermediate district. (ii) The district contributes an annual amount to the operation of the program that is commensurate with the revenue that would have been raised for operation of the program if millage were levied in the district for the program under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690. (b) "Millage levied" means the millage levied for area vocational-technical education under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, including a levy for debt service obligations incurred as the result of borrowing for capital outlay projects and in meeting capital projects fund requirements of area vocational-technical education. (c) "Taxable value" means the total taxable value of the districts constituent to an intermediate district or area vocational-technical education program, except that if a district has elected not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, the taxable value of that district is not included in the taxable value of the intermediate district. However, the taxable value of a district that has elected not to come under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690, is included in the taxable value of the intermediate district if the district meets both of the following: (i) The district operates the area vocational-technical education program pursuant to a contract with the intermediate district. (ii) The district contributes an annual amount to the operation of the program that is commensurate with the revenue that would have been raised for operation of the program if millage were levied in the district for the program under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690. (2) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $9,190,000.00 each fiscal year for 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 to reimburse intermediate districts and area vocational-technical education programs established under section 690(3) of the revised school code, MCL 380.690, levying millages for area vocational-technical education under sections 681 to 690 of the revised school code, MCL 380.681 to 380.690. The purpose, use, and expenditure of the reimbursement are limited as if the funds were generated by those millages. (3) Reimbursement for those millages levied in 2022-2023 2023-2024 is made in 2023-2024 2024-2025 at an amount per 2022-2023 2023-2024 membership pupil computed by subtracting from $251,400.00 $270,100.00 the 2022-2023 2024-2025 taxable value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting difference by the 2022-2023 2023-2024 millage levied, and then subtracting from that amount the 2022-2023 2023-2024 local community stabilization share revenue for area vocational technical education and 2022-2023 2023-2024 tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for reimbursement of personal property exemption loss under the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described in the previous sentence only, for an intermediate district receiving funds under this section and section 56, reimbursements paid under section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of vocational-technical education millage levied, as defined in this section, and the sum of vocational-technical education millage levied and special education millage levied, as defined in section 56. (4) Reimbursement for those millages levied in 2023-2024 2024-2025 is made in 2024-2025 2025-2026 at an amount per 2023-2024 2024-2025 membership pupil computed by subtracting from $269,800.00 $287,400.00 the 2023-2024 2024-2025 taxable value behind each membership pupil and multiplying the resulting difference by the 2023-2024 2024-2025 millage levied, and then subtracting from that amount the 2023-2024 2024-2025 local community stabilization share revenue for area vocational technical education and 2023-2024 2024-2025 tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, behind each membership pupil for reimbursement of personal property exemption loss under the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1341 to 123.1362, and reimbursements paid under section 26d for tax increment revenues captured by a brownfield redevelopment authority under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. For the purposes of the calculation described in the previous sentence only, for an intermediate district receiving funds under this section and section 56, reimbursements paid under section 26d must be multiplied by the ratio of vocational-technical education millage levied, as defined in this section, and the sum of vocational-technical education millage levied and special education millage levied, as defined in section 56. (5) The department shall ensure that the amount paid to a single intermediate district under this section does not exceed 38.4% of the total amount allocated under subsection (2). (6) The department shall ensure that the amount paid to a single intermediate district under this section is not less than 75% of the amount allocated to the intermediate district under this section for the immediately preceding fiscal year. Sec. 67. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 $3,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for college access programs. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2025-2026, the allocation from the general fund money appropriated in section 11 for purposes described in this section will be $3,000,000.00. The programs funded under this section are intended to inform students of college and career options, to provide resources intended to increase the number of pupils who are adequately prepared with the information needed to make informed decisions on college and career, support adult learners, support college completion, and support workforce and employer engagement. The funds appropriated under this section are intended to be used to increase the number of Michigan residents with high-quality degrees or credentials. Funds appropriated under this section must not be used to supplant funding for counselors already funded by districts. (2) The department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall administer funds allocated under this section in collaboration with the Michigan college access network. These funds may be used for any of the following purposes: (a) Michigan college access network operations, programming, and services to local college access networks. (b) Local college access networks, which are community-based college access/success partnerships committed to increasing the college participation and completion rates within geographically defined communities through a coordinated strategy. (c) The Michigan college advising program, a program intended to place trained, recently graduated college advisors in high schools that serve significant numbers of low-income and first-generation college-going pupils. State funds used for this purpose may not exceed 33% of the total funds available under this subsection. (d) Subgrants of up to $5,000.00 to districts with comprehensive high schools that establish a college access team and implement specific strategies to create a college-going culture in a high school in a form and manner approved by the Michigan college access network and the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (e) The Michigan college access portal, an online one-stop portal to help pupils and families plan and apply for college. (f) Public awareness and outreach campaigns to encourage low-income and first-generation college-going pupils to take necessary steps toward college and to assist pupils and families in completing a timely and accurate free application for federal student aid. (g) Subgrants to postsecondary institutions to recruit, hire, and train college student mentors and college advisors to assist high school pupils in navigating the postsecondary planning and enrollment process. (3) For the purposes of this section, "college" means any postsecondary educational opportunity that leads to a career, including, but not limited to, a postsecondary degree, industry-recognized technical certification, or registered apprenticeship. Sec. 74. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,842,700.00 for 2023-2024 and $3,913,500.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purposes of this section. (2) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated for 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 2025-2026 the amount necessary for payments to state supported colleges or universities and intermediate districts providing school bus driver safety instruction under section 51 of the pupil transportation act, 1990 PA 187, MCL 257.1851. The department shall make payments in an amount determined by the department not to exceed the actual cost of instruction and driver compensation for each public or nonpublic school bus driver attending a course of instruction. For the purpose of computing compensation, the hourly rate allowed each school bus driver must not exceed the hourly rate received for driving a school bus. The department shall make reimbursement compensating the driver during the course of instruction to the college or university or intermediate district providing the course of instruction. (3) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated for 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 2025-2026 the amount necessary to pay the reasonable costs of nonspecial education auxiliary services transportation provided under section 1323 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1323. Districts funded under this subsection do not receive funding under any other section of this article for nonspecial education auxiliary services transportation. (4) From the funds allocated in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,817,700.00 for 2023-2024 and an amount not to exceed $1,888,500.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the inspection of school buses and pupil transportation vehicles by the department of state police as required under section 715a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.715a, and section 39 of the pupil transportation act, 1990 PA 187, MCL 257.1839. The department of state police shall prepare a statement of costs and submit it to the department and to an intermediate district serving as fiduciary in a time and manner determined jointly by the department and the department of state police. Upon review and approval of the statement of cost, the department shall forward to the designated intermediate district serving as fiduciary the amount detailed on the statement within 45 days after receipt of the statement. The designated intermediate district fiduciary shall make payment in the amount specified on the statement to the department of state police within 45 days after receipt of the statement. The total reimbursement of costs under this subsection must not exceed the amount allocated under this subsection. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments to eligible entities under this subsection on a schedule prescribed by the department. Sec. 81. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to the intermediate districts the sum necessary, but not to exceed $79,424,700.00 to provide state aid to intermediate districts under this section. (2) The amount allocated under this section for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to each intermediate district is an amount equal to 100% of the amount allocated to the intermediate district under this section for 2023-2024. 2024-2025. An intermediate district shall use funding provided under this section to comply with requirements of this article and the revised school code that are applicable to intermediate districts, and for which funding is not provided elsewhere in this article, and to provide technical assistance to districts as authorized by the intermediate school board. (3) Intermediate districts receiving funds under this section shall collaborate with the department to develop expanded professional development opportunities for teachers to update and expand their knowledge and skills needed to support the Michigan merit curriculum. (4) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated to an intermediate district, formed by the consolidation or annexation of 2 or more intermediate districts or the attachment of a total intermediate district to another intermediate district or the annexation of all of the constituent K to 12 districts of a previously existing intermediate district which has disorganized, an additional allotment of $3,500.00 each fiscal year for each intermediate district included in the new intermediate district for 3 years following consolidation, annexation, or attachment. (5) To receive funding under this section, an intermediate district shall do all of the following: (a) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the intermediate district employs at least 1 person who is trained in pupil accounting and auditing procedures, rules, and regulations. (b) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the intermediate district employs at least 1 person who is trained in rules, regulations, and district reporting procedures for the individual-level student data that serves as the basis for the calculation of the district and high school graduation and dropout rates. (c) Comply with sections 1278a and 1278b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1278a and 380.1278b. (d) Furnish data and other information required by state and federal law to the center and the department in the form and manner specified by the center or the department, as applicable. (e) Comply with section 1230g of the revised school code, MCL 380.1230g. Sec. 94. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated to the department for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $1,200,000.00 for efforts to increase the number of pupils who participate and succeed in advanced placement and international baccalaureate programs, and to support the college-level examination program (CLEP). (2) From the funds allocated under this section, subsection (1), the department shall award funds to cover all or part of the costs of advanced placement test fees or international baccalaureate test fees and international baccalaureate registration fees for low-income pupils who take an advanced placement or an international baccalaureate test and CLEP fees for low-income pupils who take a CLEP test. (3) The department shall only award funds under this section subsection (1) if the department determines that all of the following criteria are met: (a) Each pupil for whom payment is made meets eligibility requirements of the federal advanced placement test fee program under the no child left behind act of 2001, Public Law 107-110, or the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95, as applicable. (b) The tests are administered by the college board, the international baccalaureate organization, or another test provider approved by the department. (c) The pupil for whom payment is made pays at least $5.00 toward the cost of each test for which payment is made. (4) If funds under subsection (1) remain after the awards granted in subsection (2), the department shall award funds to reimburse a portion of the costs associated with the provision of advanced placement (AP), international baccalaureate (IB), or college-level examination program (CLEP) exams for students whose family income exceeds low-income status as determined by the department. (5) In addition to the funds allocated in subsection (1), from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $98,800,000.00 for 2025-2026 for an incentive program described in this subsection. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2026-2027, the allocation from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 for the purposes described in this subsection will be $33,800,000.00. The funds described in this subsection are distributed as follows: (a) A district shall receive an award amount of $600.00 for each advanced placement exam taken by a student in the district where the student receives a score of 3 or above. The district may use these funds to pay for the cost of implementing an advanced placement program, including, but not limited to, advanced placement exams, advanced placement and pre-advanced placement professional development, and advanced placement instructional materials. (b) In addition to the awards in subdivision (a), each advanced placement teacher shall receive a bonus of $50.00 for each advanced placement exam taken by a student in the advanced placement teacher's class that receives a score of 3 or above. (c) From the allocation in this subsection, for 2025-2026, $65,000,000.00 must be deposited into the advanced placement and international baccalaureate program reserve fund in section 94f. (6) (5) The department shall establish procedures for awarding funds under this section. (7) (6) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. Sec. 94a. (1) There is created within the state budget office in the department of technology, management, and budget the center for educational performance and information. The center shall do all of the following: (a) Coordinate the collection of all data required by state and federal law from districts, intermediate districts, and postsecondary institutions. (b) Create, maintain, and enhance this state's P-20 longitudinal data system and ensure that it meets the requirements of subsection (4). (c) Collect data in the most efficient manner possible to reduce the administrative burden on reporting entities, including, but not limited to, electronic transcript services. (d) Create, maintain, and enhance this state's web-based educational portal to provide information to school leaders, teachers, researchers, and the public in compliance with all federal and state privacy laws. Data must include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (i) Data sets that link teachers to student information, allowing districts to assess individual teacher impact on student performance and consider student growth factors in teacher and principal evaluation systems. (ii) Data access or, if practical, data sets, provided for regional data hubs that, in combination with local data, can improve teaching and learning in the classroom. (iii) Research-ready data sets for researchers to perform research that advances this state's educational performance. (e) Provide data in a useful manner to allow state and local policymakers to make informed policy decisions. (f) Provide public reports to the residents of this state to allow them to assess allocation of resources and the return on their investment in the education system of this state. (g) Other functions as assigned by the state budget director. (2) Each state department, officer, or agency that collects information from districts, intermediate districts, or postsecondary institutions as required under state or federal law shall make arrangements with the center to ensure that the state department, officer, or agency is in compliance with subsection (1). This subsection does not apply to information collected by the department of treasury under the uniform budgeting and accounting act, 1968 PA 2, MCL 141.421 to 141.440a; the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821; the school bond qualification, approval, and loan act, 2005 PA 92, MCL 388.1921 to 388.1939; or section 1351a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1351a. (3) The center may enter into any interlocal agreements necessary to fulfill its functions. (4) The center shall ensure that the P-20 longitudinal data system required under subsection (1)(b) meets all of the following: (a) Includes data at the individual student level from preschool through postsecondary education and into the workforce. (b) Supports interoperability by using standard data structures, data formats, and data definitions to ensure linkage and connectivity in a manner that facilitates the exchange of data among agencies and institutions within the state and between states. (c) Enables the matching of individual teacher and student records so that an individual student may be matched with those teachers providing instruction to that student. (d) Enables the matching of individual teachers with information about their certification and the institutions that prepared and recommended those teachers for state certification. (e) Enables data to be easily generated for continuous improvement and decision-making, including timely reporting to parents, teachers, and school leaders on student achievement. (f) Ensures the reasonable quality, validity, and reliability of data contained in the system. (g) Provides this state with the ability to meet federal and state reporting requirements. (h) For data elements related to preschool through grade 12 and postsecondary, meets all of the following: (i) Contains a unique statewide student identifier that does not permit a student to be individually identified by users of the system, except as allowed by federal and state law. (ii) Contains student-level enrollment, demographic, and program participation information, including data associated with students who have been identified as having an affiliation to 1 or more federally recognized Indian tribes and student participation in federal programs funded under 20 USC 7401 to 7546 and participation in federal programs funded under the Johnson-O'Malley Supplemental Indian Education Program Modernization Act, Public Law 115-404. (iii) Contains student-level information about the points at which students exit, transfer in, transfer out, drop out, or complete education programs. (iv) Has the capacity to communicate with higher education data systems. (i) For data elements related to preschool through grade 12 only, meets all of the following: (i) Contains yearly test records of individual students for assessments approved by DED-OESE for accountability purposes under section 1111(b) of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, 20 USC 6311, including information on individual students not tested, by grade and subject. (ii) Contains student-level transcript information, including information on courses completed and grades earned. (iii) Contains student-level college readiness test scores. (j) For data elements related to postsecondary education only: (i) Contains data that provide information regarding the extent to which individual students transition successfully from secondary school to postsecondary education, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (A) Enrollment in remedial coursework. (B) Completion of 1 year's worth of college credit applicable to a degree within 2 years of enrollment. (ii) Contains data that provide other information determined necessary to address alignment and adequate preparation for success in postsecondary education. (5) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $19,219,200.00 $20,614,700.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to the department of technology, management, and budget to support the operations of the center. In addition, from the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 the amount necessary, estimated at $193,500.00, $2,193,500.00.00, to support the operations of the center and to establish a P-20 longitudinal data system necessary for state and federal reporting purposes. The center shall cooperate with the department to ensure that this state is in compliance with federal law and is maximizing opportunities for increased federal funding to improve education in this state. (6) From the funds allocated in subsection (5), the center may use an amount determined by the center for competitive grants for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to support collaborative efforts on the P-20 longitudinal data system. All of the following apply to grants awarded under this subsection: (a) The center shall award competitive grants to eligible intermediate districts or a consortium of intermediate districts based on criteria established by the center. (b) Activities funded under the grant must support the P-20 longitudinal data system portal and may include portal hosting, hardware and software acquisition, maintenance, enhancements, user support and related materials, and professional learning tools and activities aimed at improving the utility of the P-20 longitudinal data system. (c) An applicant that received a grant under this subsection for the immediately preceding fiscal year has priority for funding under this section. However, after 3 fiscal years of continuous funding, an applicant is required to compete openly with new applicants. (7) Funds allocated under this section that are not expended in the fiscal year in which they were allocated may be carried forward to a subsequent fiscal year and are appropriated for the purposes for which the funds were originally allocated. (8) The center may bill departments as necessary to fulfill reporting requirements of state and federal law. The center may also enter into agreements to supply custom data, analysis, and reporting to other principal executive departments, state agencies, local units of government, and other individuals and organizations. The center may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in subsection (5) to cover the costs associated with salaries, benefits, supplies, materials, and equipment necessary to provide such data, analysis, and reporting services. (9) From the funds allocated in subsection (5), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,250,000.00 for the support of strategic planning efforts to streamline and modernize required data collections across all platforms for the state's pre-K through postsecondary data. This includes, but is not limited to, advanced analytic capabilities and implementation of customer relationship management tools. (10) (9) As used in this section, "DED-OESE" means the United States Department of Education Office of Elementary and Secondary Education. Sec. 94f. (1) The advanced placement and international baccalaureate program reserve fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid fund to provide supplemental funding for the advanced placement and international baccalaureate programs described in section 94. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the advanced placement and international baccalaureate program reserve fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the advanced placement and international baccalaureate program reserve fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the advanced placement and international baccalaureate program reserve fund interest and earnings from advanced placement and international baccalaureate program reserve fund investments. (3) Money in the advanced placement and international baccalaureate program reserve fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the advanced placement and international baccalaureate program reserve fund and does not lapse to the state school aid fund. (4) The department of treasury is the administrator of the advanced placement and international baccalaureate program reserve fund for auditing purposes. (5) Money available in the advanced placement and international baccalaureate program reserve fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation. (6) At the close of each fiscal year, unspent funds from state sources allocated in section 94 must be deposited into the advanced placement and international baccalaureate program reserve fund created in this section. Sec. 95b. (1) From the general fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for 2025-2026 only for the model value-added growth and projection analytics system. The department shall continue the model value-added growth and projection analytics system and incorporate that model into its reporting requirements under the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95. The model described in this subsection must do at least all of the following: (a) Utilize existing assessments and any future assessments that are suitable for measuring student growth. (b) Report student growth measures at the district, school, teacher, and subgroup levels. (c) Recognize the growth of tested students, including those who may have missing assessment data. (d) Include all available prior standardized assessment data that meet inclusion criteria across grades, subjects, and state and local assessments. (e) Allow student growth results to be disaggregated. (f) Provide individual student projections showing the probability of a student reaching specific performance levels on future assessments. Given school closures and extended cancellations related to COVID-19, the data under this subdivision may be used to inform decisions about student placement or students that could benefit from additional supports or interventions. (g) Demonstrate any prior success with this state's assessments through the Michigan Council of Educator Effectiveness teacher evaluation pilot. (h) Demonstrate prior statewide implementation in at least 2 other states for at least 10 years. (i) Have a native roster verification system built into the value-added reporting platform that has been implemented statewide in at least 2 other states. (j) Have a "help/contact us" ticketing system built into the value-added reporting platform. (k) Given school closures that have occurred pursuant to an executive order issued by the governor, the value-added reporting platform must provide continued hosting and delivery of reporting and offer the department additional supports in the areas of research, analysis, web reporting, and training. (l) The department and the platform vendor shall provide statewide training for educators to understand the reporting that details the impact to student learning and growth. (2) The department shall provide internet-based electronic student growth and projection reporting based on the model under subsection (1) to educators at the school, district, and state levels. The model must include role-based permissions that allow educators to access information about the performance of the students within their immediate responsibility in accordance with applicable privacy laws. (3) The model under subsection (1) must not be a mandatory part of teacher evaluation or educator pay-for-performance systems. (4) The model under subsection (1) must be a model that received funding under this section in 2018-2019. (5) By March 31 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the department shall work with the center to make data publicly available on an external website that provides student growth metrics provided by the value-added reporting platform at the district and school level by grade and subject. (6) The platform vendor must complete a system security plan, as determined by the department in collaboration with the department of technology, management, and budget. Sec. 97b. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $50,000,000.00 to public schools, districts, and intermediate districts as prescribed in this section. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2026-2027, the allocation from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11 for purposes described in this section will be $25,000,000.00. (2) To receive funding under this section, a public school, district, or intermediate district must apply for the funding to the department of state police, grants and community services division, in a form and manner prescribed by the department of state police. (3) The department of state police shall not award funding under subsection (1) to a public school, district, or intermediate district in relation to the same school building more than once in a single grant application period. If a district submits an application under subsection (2) relating to a school building and a public school within that district also submits an application for funding in relation to that same school building, the department of state police shall not allocate funding under subsection (1) twice for that school building. If a public school, district, or intermediate district submits more than 1 application, the department of state police shall first consider the most recent application submitted in considering funding under subsection (1). (4) A public school, district, or intermediate district that receives funding under this section shall use the funding only to ensure that the public school, district, or intermediate district has at least 1 school resource officer employed by the school, district, or intermediate district that performs 1 or more of the following duties as part of the school resource officer's service at the school, district, or intermediate district: (a) Assists school administration in ensuring the physical safety of school buildings of the school, district, or intermediate district and the individuals inside the school buildings. (b) Works with school administration to develop safety procedures for potential threats in school buildings of the school, district, or intermediate district. (c) Welcomes, counsels, and mentors students. (d) Educates students about law-related topics, as appropriate. (e) De-escalates aggression that occurs between students or between students and school, district, or intermediate district staff. (f) Mentors students as an advisor and role model. (5) Funds allocated under this section may be used to hire new school resource officers or to increase the hours for current school resource officers. This funding may be used whether the school resource officers are hired from public employers or from private security companies. (6) Funds allocated under this section for 2025-2026 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2025-2026 are carried forward into 2026-2027. The purpose of the work project is to continue providing funding to support public schools, districts, and intermediate districts in having school resource officers at schools, districts, or intermediate districts. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2030. (7) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (8) As used in this section, "public school" means that term as defined in section 5 of the revised school code, MCL 380.5. Sec. 98. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $9,800,000.00 $8,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the purposes described in this section. It is the intent of the legislature that, for 2025-2026, the allocation from the general fund money appropriated in section 11 for purposes described in this section will be $8,000,000.00. The Michigan Virtual University shall provide a report to the legislature not later than November 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section that includes its mission, its plans, and proposed benchmarks it must meet, including a plan to achieve the organizational priorities identified in this section, to receive full funding for the next fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section. By not later than March 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual University shall provide an update to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid to show the progress being made to meet the benchmarks identified. (2) The Michigan Virtual University shall operate the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall do all of the following: (a) Support and accelerate innovation in education through the following activities: (i) Test, evaluate, and recommend as appropriate new technology-based instructional tools and resources. (ii) Research, design, and recommend virtual education delivery models for use by pupils and teachers that include age-appropriate multimedia instructional content. (iii) Research, develop, and recommend annually to the department criteria by which cyber schools and virtual course providers should be monitored and evaluated to ensure a quality education for their pupils. (iv) Based on pupil completion and performance data reported to the department or the center from cyber schools and other virtual course providers operating in this state, analyze the effectiveness of virtual learning delivery models in preparing pupils to be college- and career-ready and publish a report that highlights enrollment totals, completion rates, and the overall impact on pupils. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall submit the report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, the house and senate fiscal agencies, the department, districts, and intermediate districts by not later than March 31 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section. (v) Provide an extensive professional development program to at least 30,000 educational personnel, including teachers, school administrators, and school board members, that focuses on the effective integration of virtual learning into curricula and instruction. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute is encouraged to work with the MiSTEM council described in section 99s to coordinate professional development of teachers in applicable fields. In addition, the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute and external stakeholders are encouraged to coordinate with the department for professional development in this state, including professional development for employees in child care facilities, early childhood facilities, and after-school programs. By not later than December 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall submit a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the department on the number of teachers, school administrators, and school board members who have received professional development services from the Michigan Virtual University. The report must also include both of the following: (A) The identification of barriers and other opportunities to encourage the adoption of virtual learning in the public education system. (B) A link to, and explanation of, the Michigan Virtual University's online course standards for professional development programming. The standards described in this sub-subparagraph must inform learners how to file a complaint about course content and detail the steps that will be taken for the review and resolution of complaints. (vi) Identify and share best practices for planning, implementing, and evaluating virtual and blended education delivery models with intermediate districts, districts, and public school academies to accelerate the adoption of innovative education delivery models statewide. (b) Provide leadership for this state's system of virtual learning education by doing the following activities: (i) Develop and report policy recommendations to the governor and the legislature that accelerate the expansion of effective virtual learning in this state's schools. (ii) Provide a clearinghouse for research reports, academic studies, evaluations, and other information related to virtual learning. (iii) Promote and distribute the most current instructional design standards and guidelines for virtual teaching. (iv) In collaboration with the department and interested colleges and universities in this state, support implementation and improvements related to effective virtual learning instruction. (v) Pursue public/private partnerships that include districts to study and implement competency-based technology-rich virtual learning models. (vi) Create a statewide network of school-based mentors serving as liaisons between pupils, virtual instructors, parents, and school staff, as provided by the department or the center, and provide mentors with research-based training and technical assistance designed to help more pupils be successful virtual learners. (vii) Convene focus groups and conduct annual surveys of teachers, administrators, pupils, parents, and others to identify barriers and opportunities related to virtual learning. (viii) Produce an annual consumer awareness report for schools and parents about effective virtual education providers and education delivery models, performance data, cost structures, and research trends. (ix) Provide an internet-based platform that educators can use to create student-centric learning tools and resources for sharing in the state's open educational resource repository and facilitate a user network that assists educators in using the content creation platform and state repository for open educational resources. As part of this initiative, the Michigan Virtual University shall work collaboratively with districts and intermediate districts to establish a plan to make available virtual resources that align to Michigan's K to 12 curriculum standards for use by students, educators, and parents. (x) Create and maintain a public statewide catalog of virtual learning courses being offered by all public schools and community colleges in this state. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall identify and develop a list of nationally recognized best practices for virtual learning and use this list to support reviews of virtual course vendors, courses, and instructional practices. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall also provide a mechanism for intermediate districts to use the identified best practices to review content offered by constituent districts. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall review the virtual course offerings of the Michigan Virtual University, and make the results from these reviews available to the public as part of the statewide catalog. The Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute shall ensure that the statewide catalog is made available to the public on the Michigan Virtual University website and shall allow the ability to link it to each district's website as provided for in section 21f. The statewide catalog must also contain all of the following: (A) The number of enrollments in each virtual course in the immediately preceding school year. (B) The number of enrollments that earned 60% or more of the total course points for each virtual course in the immediately preceding school year. (C) The pass rate for each virtual course. (xi) Support registration, payment services, and transcript functionality for the statewide catalog and train key stakeholders on how to use new features. (xii) Collaborate with key stakeholders to examine district level accountability and teacher effectiveness issues related to virtual learning under section 21f and make findings and recommendations publicly available. (xiii) Provide a report on the activities of the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute. (3) To further enhance its expertise and leadership in virtual learning, the Michigan Virtual University shall continue to operate the Michigan Virtual School as a statewide laboratory and quality model of instruction by implementing virtual and blended learning solutions for Michigan schools in accordance with the following parameters: (a) The Michigan Virtual School must maintain its accreditation status from recognized national and international accrediting entities. (b) The Michigan Virtual University shall use no more than $1,000,000.00 of the amount allocated under this section to subsidize the cost paid by districts for virtual courses. (c) In providing educators responsible for the teaching of virtual courses as provided for in this section, the Michigan Virtual School shall follow the requirements to request and assess, and the department of state police shall provide, a criminal history check and criminal records check under sections 1230 and 1230a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1230 and 380.1230a, in the same manner as if the Michigan Virtual School were a school district under those sections. (4) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), the Michigan Virtual University shall allocate up to $500,000.00 to support the expansion of new online and blended educator professional development programs. (5) From the funds allocated under subsection (1), the Michigan Virtual University shall allocate up to $500,000.00 to operate a comprehensive statewide laboratory designed to function as a hub for cutting-edge research, the identification and dissemination of best practices, rigorous experimentation, policy formulation, and proactive efforts to enhance awareness about the responsible utilization of artificial intelligence in schools. (6) If the course offerings are included in the statewide catalog of virtual courses under subsection (2)(b)(x), the Michigan Virtual School operated by the Michigan Virtual University may offer virtual course offerings, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Information technology courses. (b) College level equivalent courses, as that term is defined in section 1471 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1471. (c) Courses and dual enrollment opportunities. (d) Programs and services for at-risk pupils. (e) High school equivalency test preparation courses for adjudicated youth. (f) Special interest courses. (g) Professional development programs for teachers, school administrators, other school employees, and school board members. (7) If a home-schooled or nonpublic school student is a resident of a district that subscribes to services provided by the Michigan Virtual School, the student may use the services provided by the Michigan Virtual School to the district without charge to the student beyond what is charged to a district pupil using the same services. (8) By not later than December 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual University shall provide a report to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, the house and senate fiscal agencies, and the department that includes at least all of the following information related to the Michigan Virtual School for the preceding fiscal year: (a) A list of the districts served by the Michigan Virtual School. (b) A list of virtual course titles available to districts. (c) The total number of virtual course enrollments and information on registrations and completions by course. (d) The overall course completion rate percentage. (9) In addition to the information listed in subsection (8), the report under subsection (8) must also include a plan to serve at least 600 schools with courses from the Michigan Virtual School or with content available through the internet-based platform identified in subsection (2)(b)(ix). (10) The governor may appoint an advisory group for the Michigan Virtual Learning Research Institute established under subsection (2). The members of the advisory group serve at the pleasure of the governor and without compensation. The purpose of the advisory group is to make recommendations to the governor, the legislature, and the president and board of the Michigan Virtual University that will accelerate innovation in this state's education system in a manner that will prepare elementary and secondary students to be career and college ready and that will promote the goal of increasing the percentage of residents of this state with high-quality degrees and credentials to at least 60% by 2025. (11) By not later than November 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual University shall submit to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, and the house and senate fiscal agencies a detailed budget for that fiscal year that includes a breakdown on its projected costs to deliver virtual educational services to districts and a summary of the anticipated fees to be paid by districts for those services. By not later than March 1 each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the Michigan Virtual University shall submit to the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, the state budget director, and the house and senate fiscal agencies a breakdown on its actual costs to deliver virtual educational services to districts and a summary of the actual fees paid by districts for those services based on audited financial statements for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Blended learning" means a hybrid instructional delivery model where pupils are provided content, instruction, and assessment, in part at a supervised educational facility away from home where the pupil and a teacher with a valid Michigan teaching certificate are in the same physical location and in part through internet-connected learning environments with some degree of pupil control over time, location, and pace of instruction. (b) "Cyber school" means a full-time instructional program of virtual courses for pupils that may or may not require attendance at a physical school location. (c) "Virtual course" means a course of study that is capable of generating a credit or a grade and that is provided in an interactive learning environment in which the majority of the curriculum is delivered using the internet and in which pupils are separated from their instructor or teacher of record by time or location, or both. Sec. 99h. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $4,723,200.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for competitive grants to districts and intermediate districts, and from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated $600,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for competitive grants to nonpublic schools, that provide pupils in grades pre-K to 12 with expanded opportunities to improve mathematics, science, computer science, and technology skills by participating in robotics competition programs hosted by program providers including, but not limited to, FIRST (for inspiration and recognition of science and technology) Robotics, including FIRST Lego League - Discover, Explore, and Challenge, FIRST Tech challenge, and FIRST Robotics competition, LTU Robofest, MATE (Marine Advanced Technical Education), REC (Robotics Education Competition) Foundation, Square One Education Network, VEX, and other providers approved by the department. All approved providers shall make all programs available to students in this state regardless of geographical location. Programs funded under this section are intended to increase the number of pupils demonstrating proficiency in science and mathematics on the state assessments and to increase the number of pupils who are college- and career-ready upon high school graduation. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make grant payments to districts, nonpublic schools, and intermediate districts under this section on a schedule determined by the department. The department shall set maximum grant awards for each different level of programming and competition in a manner that both maximizes the number of teams that will be able to receive funds and expands the geographical distribution of teams. Districts and intermediate districts that receive funds under this section must provide relevant student participation information, as determined by the department, to program and competition providers described in this section. For a district or intermediate district to count a program competition provider for purposes of payments under this section, the program and competition providers must agree to aggregate data received by districts and intermediate districts and provide this information to the department in a form and manner determined by the department. (2) The department shall do all of the following for purposes of this section: (a) Both of the following by not later than 60 days after the state school aid appropriations bill for the current fiscal year is enacted into law or October 1 of the current fiscal year, whichever is later: (i) Open applications for funding under this section to all districts, nonpublic schools, and intermediate districts. (ii) Publish a list of approved programs and vendors for purposes of this section in a manner that is accessible to all applicants. To obtain approval under this subparagraph, a program or vendor must submit to the department registration information, including any fees; pledge that it will post this information on its website; and, by not later than January 1 of the current fiscal year, submit this information to the department for publication on the department's website. (b) By not later than 60 days after applications are opened as described in subdivision (a), close applications under this section. (c) By not later than 60 days after applications are closed as described in subdivision (b), make all determinations concerning funding under this section. (d) By not later than July 1 of the current fiscal year, publish a document listing the requirements for becoming an approved program or vendor under subdivision (a). (3) Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, if funding under this section is insufficient to fulfill all funding requests by qualified applicants under this section, the department shall prorate the total funding allocated under this section equally among all qualified applicants. However, for funding under this section toward grants under subsection (5)(b), in its proration under this subsection, the department shall ensure that each district is paid in an amount equal to the percentage the department would have paid the district in grant funding under subsection (5)(b), but for proration under this subsection, with no district receiving a grant under subsection (5)(b) in an amount that is greater than the district's total accrued costs under subsection (5)(b). (4) A district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district applying for a grant under this section must submit an application in a form and manner prescribed by the department. To be eligible for a grant, a district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district must demonstrate in its application that the district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district has established a partnership for the purposes of the robotics program with at least 1 sponsor, business entity, higher education institution, technical school, or individual, must submit a budget, and must provide a local in-kind or cash match from other private or local funds of at least 25% of the cost of the robotics program award. (5) The department shall distribute the grant funding under this section for the following purposes: (a) Grants to districts, nonpublic schools, or intermediate districts to pay for stipends not to exceed $1,500.00 per building for coaching. (b) Grants to districts, nonpublic schools, or intermediate districts for event registrations, materials, travel costs, and other expenses associated with the preparation for and attendance at robotics events and competitions. (c) Grants to districts, nonpublic schools, or intermediate districts for awards to teams that advance to the next levels of competition as determined by the department. The department shall determine an equal amount per team for those teams that advance. (6) A nonpublic school that receives a grant under this section may use the funds for either robotics or Science Olympiad programs. (7) To be eligible to receive funds under this section, a nonpublic school must be a nonpublic school registered with the department and must meet all applicable state reporting requirements for nonpublic schools. (8) To be eligible to receive a grant under this section, a district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district must do all of the following: (a) If the district, nonpublic school, or intermediate district is requesting funding for more than 1 team for a building, meet the minimum requirements for team size as determined by the approved program provider. (b) Participate in at least the minimum number of competitions as determined by the approved program provider. (c) Participate in at least 1 in-person competition. (9) For purposes of this section, an approved program or vendor under this section that provides a program under this section shall not work with the department to set prices or policies for the program. (10) As used in this section, "current fiscal year" means the fiscal year for which an allocation is made under this section. Sec. 99l. (1) The state budget director is directed to lapse the remaining balances of the work projects described in subsection (2) by October 30, 2025. (2) The following work project remaining balances shall be lapsed into the school aid fund: (a) Section 12a, healthy school grant program, estimated at $50,000,000.00. (b) Section 30c, troops to teachers, estimated at $15,000,000.00. (c) Section 31j, 10 cents a meal, estimated at $6,965,600.00. (d) Section 67f, FAFSA completion, estimated at $5,500,000.00. (e) Section 99(1), plant-based meals pilot, estimated at $500,000.00. (f) Section 99z, first year teacher incentive payments, estimated at $4,741,000.00. Sec. 99s. (1) From state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $7,634,300.00 for Michigan science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (MiSTEM) programs. The MiSTEM network may receive funds from private sources. If the MiSTEM network receives funds from private sources, the MiSTEM network shall expend those funds in alignment with the statewide STEM strategy. Programs funded under this section are intended to increase the number of pupils demonstrating proficiency in science and mathematics on the state assessments, to increase the number of pupils who are college- and career-ready upon high school graduation, and to promote certificate and degree attainment in STEM fields. Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (2) The MiSTEM council annually shall review and make recommendations to the governor, the legislature, and the department concerning changes to the statewide strategy adopted by the council for delivering STEM education-related opportunities to pupils. The MiSTEM council shall use funds received under this subsection to ensure that its members or their designees are trained in the Change the Equation STEMworks rating system program for the purpose of rating STEM programs. (3) The MiSTEM council shall make specific funding recommendations for the funds allocated under subsection (4) by December 15 of each fiscal year. Each specific funding recommendation must be for a program approved by the MiSTEM council. All of the following apply: (a) To be eligible for MiSTEM council approval as described in this subsection, a program must satisfy all of the following: (i) Align with this state's academic standards. (ii) Have STEMworks certification. (iii) Provide project-based experiential learning, student programming, or educator professional learning experiences. (iv) Focus predominantly on classroom-based STEM experiences or professional learning experiences. (b) The MiSTEM council shall approve programs that represent all network regions and include a diverse array of options for students and educators and at least 1 program in each of the following areas: (i) Robotics. (ii) Computer science or coding. (iii) Engineering or bioscience. (c) The MiSTEM council is encouraged to work with the MiSTEM network to develop locally and regionally developed programs and professional learning experiences for the programs on the list of approved programs. (d) If the MiSTEM council is unable to make specific funding recommendations by December 15 of a fiscal year, the department shall award and distribute the funds allocated under subsection (4) on a competitive grant basis that at least follows the statewide STEM strategy plan and rating system recommended by the MiSTEM council. Each grant must provide STEM education-related opportunities for pupils. (e) The MiSTEM council shall work with the department of labor and economic opportunity to implement the statewide STEM strategy adopted by the MiSTEM council. (4) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $3,050,000.00 for the purpose of funding programs under this section for 2024-2025 2025-2026 as recommended by the MiSTEM council. (5) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $3,834,300.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to support the activities and programs of the MiSTEM network regions. From the money allocated under this subsection, the department shall award the fiscal agent for each MiSTEM network region $200,000.00 for the base operations of each region. The department shall distribute the remaining funds to each fiscal agent in an equal amount per pupil, based on the number of K to 12 pupils enrolled in districts within each region in the immediately preceding fiscal year. (6) A MiSTEM network region shall do all of the following: (a) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory council that is located in the MiSTEM region to develop a regional strategic plan for STEM education that creates a robust regional STEM culture, that empowers STEM teachers, that integrates business and education into the STEM network, and that ensures high-quality STEM experiences for pupils. At a minimum, a regional STEM strategic plan should do all of the following: (i) Identify regional employer need for STEM. (ii) Identify processes for regional employers and educators to create guided pathways for STEM careers that include internships or externships, apprenticeships, and other experiential engagements for pupils. (iii) Identify educator professional learning opportunities, including internships or externships and apprenticeships, that integrate this state's science standards into high-quality STEM experiences that engage pupils. (b) Facilitate regional STEM events such as educator and employer networking and STEM career fairs to raise STEM awareness. (c) Contribute to the MiSTEM website and engage in other MiSTEM network functions to further the mission of STEM in this state in coordination with the MiSTEM council and the department of labor and economic opportunity. (d) Facilitate application and implementation of state and federal funds under this subsection and any other grants or funds for the MiSTEM network region. (e) Work with districts to provide STEM programming and professional learning. (f) Coordinate recurring discussions and work with the career and educational advisory council to ensure that feedback and best practices are being shared, including funding, program, professional learning opportunities, and regional strategic plans. (7) From the state school aid fund money allocated under subsection (1), the department shall distribute for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $750,000.00, in a form and manner determined by the department, to those network regions able to further the statewide STEM strategy recommended by the MiSTEM council. (8) To receive state or federal funds under subsection (5) or (7), or to receive funds from private sources as authorized under subsection (1), a grant recipient must allow access for the department or the department's designee to audit all records related to the program for which it receives those funds. The grant recipient shall reimburse the state for all disallowances found in the audit. (9) To receive state funds under subsection (5) or (7), a grant recipient must provide at least a 10% local match from local public or private resources for the funds received under this subsection. (10) By not later than July 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, a MiSTEM network region that receives funds under subsection (5) shall report to the executive director of the MiSTEM network in a form and manner prescribed by the executive director on performance measures developed by the MiSTEM network regions and approved by the executive director. The performance measures must be designed to ensure that the activities of the MiSTEM network are improving student academic outcomes. (11) Not more than 5% of a MiSTEM network region grant under subsection (5) or (7) may be retained by a fiscal agent for serving as the fiscal agent of a MiSTEM network region. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Career and educational advisory council" means an advisory council to the local workforce development boards located in a prosperity region consisting of educational, employer, labor, and parent representatives. (b) "DED" means the United States Department of Education. (c) "DED-OESE" means the DED Office of Elementary and Secondary Education. (d) "MiSTEM Council" means the Michigan Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics Education Advisory Council created as an advisory body within the department of labor and economic opportunity by Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-3, MCL 125.1998. (e) "STEM" means science, technology, engineering, and mathematics delivered in an integrated fashion using cross-disciplinary learning experiences that can include language arts, performing and fine arts, and career and technical education. Sec. 101. (1) To be eligible to receive state aid under this article, not later than the fifth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day and not later than the fifth Wednesday after the supplemental count day, each district superintendent shall submit and certify to the center and the intermediate superintendent, in the form and manner prescribed by the center, the number of pupils enrolled and in regular daily attendance, including identification of tuition-paying pupils, in the district as of the pupil membership count day and as of the supplemental count day, as applicable, for the current school year. In addition, a district maintaining school during the entire year shall submit and certify to the center and the intermediate superintendent, in the form and manner prescribed by the center, the number of pupils enrolled and in regular daily attendance in the district for the current school year pursuant to rules promulgated by the superintendent. Not later than the sixth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day and not later than the sixth Wednesday after the supplemental count day, the district shall resolve any pupil membership conflicts with another district, correct any data issues, and recertify the data in a form and manner prescribed by the center and file the certified data with the intermediate superintendent. If a district fails to submit and certify the attendance data, as required under this subsection, the center shall notify the department and the department shall withhold state aid due to be distributed under this article from the defaulting district immediately, beginning with the next payment after the failure and continuing with each payment until the district complies with this subsection. If a district does not comply with this subsection by the end of the fiscal year, the district forfeits the amount withheld. A person who willfully falsifies a figure or statement in the certified and sworn copy of enrollment is subject to penalty as prescribed by section 161. (2) To be eligible to receive state aid under this article, not later than the twenty-fourth Wednesday after the pupil membership count day and not later than the twenty-fourth Wednesday after the supplemental count day, an intermediate district shall submit to the center, in a form and manner prescribed by the center, the audited enrollment and attendance data as described in subsection (1) for the pupils of its constituent districts and of the intermediate district. If an intermediate district fails to submit the audited data as required under this subsection, the department shall withhold state aid due to be distributed under this article from the defaulting intermediate district immediately, beginning with the next payment after the failure and continuing with each payment until the intermediate district complies with this subsection. If an intermediate district does not comply with this subsection by the end of the fiscal year, the intermediate district forfeits the amount withheld. (3) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (11) and (12) (10) and (11), all of the following apply to the provision of pupil instruction: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each district shall provide at least 1,098 hours and 180 days of pupil instruction. If a collective bargaining agreement that provides a complete school calendar was in effect for employees of a district as of June 24, 2014, and if that school calendar is not in compliance with this subdivision, then this subdivision does not apply to that district until after the expiration of that collective bargaining agreement. A district may apply for a waiver under subsection (9) from the requirements of this subdivision. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this article, a district failing to comply with the required minimum hours and days of pupil instruction under this subsection forfeits from its total state aid allocation an amount determined by applying a ratio of the number of hours or days the district was in noncompliance in relation to the required minimum number of hours and days under this subsection. Not later than the first business day in August, the board of each district shall either certify to the department that the district was in full compliance with this section regarding the number of hours and days of pupil instruction in the previous school year, or report to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the center, each instance of noncompliance. If the district did not provide at least the required minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction under this subsection, the department shall make the deduction of state aid in the following fiscal year from the first payment of state school aid. A district is not subject to forfeiture of funds under this subsection for a fiscal year in which a forfeiture was already imposed under subsection (6). (c) Hours or days lost because of strikes or teachers' conferences are not counted as hours or days of pupil instruction. (d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (e) and (f), if a district does not have at least 75% of the district's membership in attendance on any day of pupil instruction, the department shall pay the district state aid in that proportion of 1/180 that the actual percent of attendance bears to 75%. (e) If a district adds 1 or more days of pupil instruction to the end of its instructional calendar for a school year to comply with subdivision (a) because the district otherwise would fail to provide the required minimum number of days of pupil instruction even after the operation of subsection (4) due to conditions not within the control of school authorities, then subdivision (d) does not apply for any day of pupil instruction that is added to the end of the instructional calendar. Instead, for any of those days, if the district does not have at least 60% of the district's membership in attendance on that day, the department shall pay the district state aid in that proportion of 1/180 that the actual percentage of attendance bears to 60%. For any day of pupil instruction added to the instructional calendar as described in this subdivision, the district shall report to the department the percentage of the district's membership that is in attendance, in the form and manner prescribed by the department. (f) At the request of a district that operates a department-approved alternative education program and that does not provide instruction for pupils in all of grades K to 12, the superintendent shall grant a waiver from the requirements of subdivision (d). The waiver must provide that an eligible district is subject to the proration provisions of subdivision (d) only if the district does not have at least 50% of the district's membership in attendance on any day of pupil instruction. In order to be eligible for this waiver, a district must maintain records to substantiate its compliance with the following requirements: (i) The district offers the minimum hours of pupil instruction as required under this section. (ii) For each enrolled pupil, the district uses appropriate academic assessments to develop an individual education plan that leads to a high school diploma. (iii) The district tests each pupil to determine academic progress at regular intervals and records the results of those tests in that pupil's individual education plan. (g) All of the following apply to a waiver granted under subdivision (f): (i) If the waiver is for a blended model of delivery, a waiver that is granted for the 2011-2012 fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year remains in effect unless it is revoked by the superintendent. (ii) If the waiver is for a 100% online model of delivery and the educational program for which the waiver is granted makes educational services available to pupils for a minimum of at least 1,098 hours during a school year and ensures that each pupil participates in the educational program for at least 1,098 hours during a school year, a waiver that is granted for the 2011-2012 fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year remains in effect unless it is revoked by the superintendent. (iii) A waiver that is not a waiver described in subparagraph (i) or (ii) is valid for 3 fiscal years, unless it is revoked by the superintendent, and must be renewed at the end of the 3-year period to remain in effect. (h) The superintendent shall promulgate rules for the implementation of this subsection. (4) All of the following apply to the counting of days and hours of pupil instruction under this section: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the first 6 days or the equivalent number of hours for which pupil instruction is not provided because of conditions not within the control of school authorities, such as severe storms, fires, epidemics, utility power unavailability, water or sewer failure, or health conditions as defined by the city, county, or state health authorities, are counted as hours and days of pupil instruction. (b) With the approval of the superintendent of public instruction, the department shall count as hours and days of pupil instruction for a fiscal year not more than 3 additional days or the equivalent number of additional hours for which pupil instruction is not provided in a district due to unusual and extenuating occurrences resulting from conditions not within the control of school authorities such as those conditions described in this subsection. (c) A district that counts hours or days of professional development for teachers as hours or days of pupil instruction, as provided under subsection (10), is eligible to have additional hours or days counted as hours and days of pupil instruction as provided under subdivision (b) to the same extent as a district that does not count hours or days of professional development for teachers as hours or days of pupil instruction. (d) In deciding whether or not to approve the counting of additional hours or days of pupil instruction under subdivision (b) for a district, the superintendent of public instruction shall not take into account whether or not the district counts hours or days of professional development for teachers as hours or days of pupil instruction, as provided under subsection (10). (c) (e) Subsequent hours or days beyond those described in subdivisions (a) and (b) are not counted as hours or days of pupil instruction. (5) A district does not forfeit part of its state aid appropriation because it adopts or has in existence an alternative scheduling program for pupils in kindergarten if the program provides at least the number of hours required under subsection (3) for a full-time equated membership for a pupil in kindergarten as provided under section 6(4). (6) In addition to any other penalty or forfeiture under this section, if at any time the department determines that 1 or more of the following have occurred in a district, the district forfeits in the current fiscal year beginning in the next payment to be calculated by the department a proportion of the funds due to the district under this article that is equal to the proportion below the required minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction under subsection (3), as specified in the following: (a) The district fails to operate its schools for at least the required minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction under subsection (3) in a school year, including hours and days counted under subsection (4). (b) The board of the district takes formal action not to operate its schools for at least the required minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction under subsection (3) in a school year, including hours and days counted under subsection (4). (7) In providing the minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction required under subsection (3), a district shall use the following guidelines, and a district shall maintain records to substantiate its compliance with the following guidelines: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a pupil must be scheduled for at least the required minimum number of hours of instruction, excluding study halls, or at least the sum of 90 hours plus the required minimum number of hours of instruction, including up to 2 study halls. (b) The time a pupil is assigned to any tutorial activity in a block schedule may be considered instructional time, unless that time is determined in an audit to be a study hall period. (c) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a pupil in grades 9 to 12 for whom a reduced schedule is determined to be in the individual pupil's best educational interest must be scheduled for a number of hours equal to at least 80% of the required minimum number of hours of pupil instruction to be considered a full-time equivalent pupil. A pupil in grades 9 to 12 who is scheduled in a 4-block schedule may receive a reduced schedule under this subsection if the pupil is scheduled for a number of hours equal to at least 75% of the required minimum number of hours of pupil instruction to be considered a full-time equivalent pupil. (d) If a pupil in grades 9 to 12 who is enrolled in a cooperative education program or a special education pupil cannot receive the required minimum number of hours of pupil instruction solely because of travel time between instructional sites during the school day, that travel time, up to a maximum of 3 hours per school week, is considered to be pupil instruction time for the purpose of determining whether the pupil is receiving the required minimum number of hours of pupil instruction. However, if a district demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the travel time limitation under this subdivision would create undue costs or hardship to the district, the department may consider more travel time to be pupil instruction time for this purpose. (e) In grades 7 through 12, instructional time that is part of a Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps (JROTC) program is considered to be pupil instruction time regardless of whether the instructor is a certificated teacher if all of the following are met: (i) The instructor has met all of the requirements established by the United States Department of Defense and the applicable branch of the armed services for serving as an instructor in the Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps program. (ii) The board of the district or intermediate district employing or assigning the instructor complies with the requirements of sections 1230 and 1230a of the revised school code, MCL 380.1230 and 380.1230a, with respect to the instructor to the same extent as if employing the instructor as a regular classroom teacher. (8) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (11) and (12), (10) and (11), the department shall apply the guidelines under subsection (7) in calculating the full-time equivalency of pupils. (9) Upon application by the district for a particular fiscal year, the superintendent shall waive for a district the minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction requirement of subsection (3) for a department-approved alternative education program or another innovative program approved by the department, including a 4-day school week. If a district applies for and receives a waiver under this subsection and complies with the terms of the waiver, the district is not subject to forfeiture under this section for the specific program covered by the waiver. If the district does not comply with the terms of the waiver, the amount of the forfeiture is calculated based upon a comparison of the number of hours and days of pupil instruction actually provided to the minimum number of hours and days of pupil instruction required under subsection (3). A district shall report pupils enrolled in a department-approved alternative education program under this subsection to the center in a form and manner determined by the center. All of the following apply to a waiver granted under this subsection: (a) If the waiver is for a blended model of delivery, a waiver that is granted for the 2011-2012 fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year remains in effect unless it is revoked by the superintendent. (b) If the waiver is for a 100% online model of delivery and the educational program for which the waiver is granted makes educational services available to pupils for a minimum of at least 1,098 hours during a school year and ensures that each pupil is on track for course completion at proficiency level, a waiver that is granted for the 2011-2012 fiscal year or a subsequent fiscal year remains in effect unless it is revoked by the superintendent. (c) A waiver that is not a waiver described in subdivision (a) or (b) is valid for 3 fiscal years, unless it is revoked by the superintendent, and must be renewed at the end of the 3-year period to remain in effect. (10) A district may count up to 38 hours of professional development for teachers as hours of pupil instruction. All of the following apply to the counting of professional development as pupil instruction under this subsection: (a) If the professional development exceeds 5 hours in a single day, that day may be counted as a day of pupil instruction. (b) At least 8 hours of the professional development counted as hours of pupil instruction under this subsection must be recommended by a districtwide professional development advisory committee appointed by the district board. The advisory committee must be composed of teachers employed by the district who represent a variety of grades and subject matter specializations, including special education; nonteaching staff; parents; and administrators. The majority membership of the committee must be composed of teaching staff. (c) Professional development provided online is allowable and encouraged, as long as the instruction has been approved by the district. The department shall issue a list of approved online professional development providers that must include the Michigan Virtual School. (d) Professional development may only be counted as hours of pupil instruction under this subsection for the pupils of those teachers scheduled to participate in the professional development. (e) The professional development must meet all of the following to be counted as pupil instruction under this subsection: (i) Be aligned to the school or district improvement plan for the school or district in which the professional development is being provided. (ii) Be linked to 1 or more criteria in the evaluation tool developed or adopted by the district or intermediate district under section 1249 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1249. (iii) Has been approved by the department as counting for state continuing education clock hours. The number of hours of professional development counted as hours of pupil instruction under this subsection may not exceed the number of state continuing education clock hours for which the professional development was approved. (iv) Not more than a combined total of 10 hours of the professional development takes place before the first scheduled day of school for the school year ending in the fiscal year and after the last scheduled day of school for that school year. (v) Not more than 10 hours of the professional development takes place in a single month. (vi) At least 75% of teachers scheduled to participate in the professional development are in attendance. (10) (11) Subsections (3) and (8) do not apply to a school of excellence that is a cyber school, as that term is defined in section 551 of the revised school code, MCL 380.551, and is in compliance with section 553a of the revised school code, MCL 380.553a. Beginning July 1, 2021, this subsection is subject to section 8c. It is the intent of the legislature that the immediately preceding sentence apply retroactively and is effective July 1, 2021. (11) (12) Subsections (3) and (8) do not apply to eligible pupils enrolled in a dropout recovery program that meets the requirements of section 23a. As used in this subsection, "eligible pupil" means that term as defined in section 23a. (12) (13) At least every 2 years the superintendent shall review the waiver standards set forth in the pupil accounting and auditing manuals to ensure that the waiver standards and waiver process continue to be appropriate and responsive to changing trends in online learning. The superintendent shall solicit and consider input from stakeholders as part of this review. Sec. 104. (1) To receive state aid under this article, a district shall comply with sections 1249, 1278a, 1278b, 1279g, and 1280b of the revised school code, MCL 380.1249, 380.1278a, 380.1278b, 380.1279g, and 380.1280b, and 1970 PA 38, MCL 388.1081 to 388.1086. Subject to subsection (2), from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $37,509,400.00 for payments on behalf of districts for costs associated with complying with those provisions of law. In addition, from the federal funds appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount estimated at $8,000,000.00 funded from DED-OESE, title VI, state assessment funds, and from DED-OSERS, part B of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1411 to 1419, plus any carryover federal funds from previous year appropriations, for the purposes of complying with the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95. (2) The results of each test administered as part of the Michigan student test of educational progress (M-STEP), including tests administered to high school students, must include an item analysis that lists all items that are counted for individual pupil scores and the percentage of pupils choosing each possible response. The department shall work with the center to identify the number of students enrolled at the time assessments are given by each district. In calculating the percentage of pupils assessed for a district's scorecard, the department shall use only the number of pupils enrolled in the district at the time the district administers the assessments and shall exclude pupils who enroll in the district after the district administers the assessments. (3) The department shall distribute federal funds allocated under this section in accordance with federal law and with flexibility provisions outlined in Public Law 107-116, and in the education flexibility partnership act of 1999, Public Law 106-25. (4) The department may recommend, but may not require, districts to allow pupils to use an external keyboard with tablet devices for online M-STEP testing, including, but not limited to, open-ended test items such as constructed response or equation builder items. (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department shall make payments on behalf of districts, intermediate districts, and other eligible entities under this section on a schedule determined by the department. (6) From the allocation in subsection (1), there is allocated an amount not to exceed $500,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the operation of an online reporting tool to provide student-level assessment data in a secure environment to educators, parents, and pupils immediately after assessments are scored. The department and the center shall ensure that any data collected by the online reporting tool do not provide individually identifiable student data to the federal government. (7) As used in this section: (a) "DED" means the United States Department of Education. (b) "DED-OESE" means the DED Office of Elementary and Secondary Education. (c) "DED-OSERS" means the DED Office of Special Education and Rehabilitative Services. Sec. 104h. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $11,500,000.00 to districts to implement benchmark assessments during the 2024-2025 2025-2026 school year. All of the following apply to the benchmark assessment system described in this subsection: (a) The system must provide for all of the following: (i) That, within the first 9 weeks of the 2024-2025 2025-2026 school year, the district shall administer 1 or more benchmark assessments provided by a provider approved under subsection (6), benchmark assessments described in subdivision (b), or local benchmark assessments, or any combination thereof, to all pupils in grades K to 8 to measure proficiency in reading and mathematics. (ii) That, in addition to the benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments administered under subparagraph (i), by not later than the last day of the 2024-2025 2025-2026 school year, the district shall administer the benchmark assessment or assessments administered under subparagraph (i) to all pupils in grades K to 8 to measure proficiency in reading and mathematics. To support fall to spring growth calculations, the same benchmark assessment that is administered in the fall must be administered in the spring. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a district may administer 1 or more of the following benchmark assessments toward meeting the requirements under subdivision (a): (i) A benchmark assessment in reading for students in grades K to 9 that contains progress monitoring tools and enhanced diagnostic assessments. (ii) A benchmark assessment in math for students in grades K to 8 that contains progress monitoring tools. (c) The system must provide that, to the extent practicable, if a district administers a benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments under this section, the district shall administer the same benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments provided by a provider approved under subsection (6), benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments described in subdivision (b), or local benchmark assessment or local benchmark assessments that it administered to pupils in previous school years, as applicable. (d) The system must provide that, if a district administers a benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments under this section, the district shall provide each pupil's data from the benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments, as available, to the pupil's parent or legal guardian within 30 days of administering the benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments. (e) The system must provide that, if a local benchmark assessment or local benchmark assessments are administered under subdivision (a), the district shall report to the department and the center, in a form and manner prescribed by the center, the local benchmark assessment or local benchmark assessments that were administered and how that assessment or those assessments measure changes, including any losses, as applicable, in learning, and the district's plan for addressing any losses in learning. (f) The system must provide that, by not later than 30 days after a benchmark assessment or benchmark assessments are administered under subdivision (a)(ii), or within a time frame specified by the department, the district shall send benchmark assessment data, including grade level, student demographics, and mode of instruction, to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department, from all benchmark assessments administered in the 2024-2025 2025-2026 school year, excluding data from a local benchmark assessment, as applicable. If available, the data described in this subdivision must include information concerning pupil growth from fall 2024 2025 to spring 2025.2026. (2) To receive funding under this section, a district must do all of the following: (a) Apply for the funding in a form and manner prescribed by the department. (b) Administer 1 or more of the benchmark assessments described in subsection (6), excluding the benchmark assessment described in subsection (4). (c) Administer the same benchmark assessment or assessments in both the fall and spring, as required under this section. (d) Meet all reporting requirements pertaining to assessment and mode-of-instruction data outlined in this section. (3) Subject to subsection (2), the department shall pay an equal amount per membership pupil in grades K to 8 in the district to each district that applies for funding under this section. (4) The department shall make 1 of the benchmark assessments provided by a provider approved under subsection (6) available to districts at no cost to the districts for purposes of meeting the requirements under this section. The benchmark assessment described in this subsection must meet all of the following: (a) Be aligned to the content standards of this state. (b) Complement the state's summative assessment system. (c) Be internet-delivered and include a standards-based assessment. (d) Provide information on pupil achievement with regard to learning content required in a given year or grade span. (e) Provide timely feedback to pupils and teachers. (f) Be nationally normed. (g) Provide information to educators about student growth and allow for multiple testing opportunities. (5) By not later than November 15, 2025, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the house and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate appropriations subcommittees on school aid, and the house and senate fiscal agencies regarding the benchmark assessment data received under this section, disaggregated by grade level and demographic subgroup for each district. If information concerning pupil growth is included in the data described in this subsection, it must be incorporated in the report described in this subsection. (6) The department shall approve at least 4 but not more than 6 providers of benchmark assessments for the purposes of this section. The department shall inform districts of all of the providers approved under this subsection in an equitable manner. The benchmark assessments, with the exclusion of the benchmark assessment described in subsection (4), provided by approved providers under this subsection must meet all of the following: (a) Be aligned to the content standards of this state. (b) Complement the state's summative assessment system. (c) Be internet-delivered and include a standards-based remote, in-person, or both remote and in-person assessment using a computer-adaptive model to target the instructional level of each pupil. (d) Provide information on pupil achievement with regard to learning content required in a given year or grade span. (e) Provide immediate feedback to pupils and teachers. (f) Be nationally normed. (g) Provide multiple measures of growth and provide for multiple testing opportunities. Sec. 107. (1) From the state school aid fund appropriation in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $40,500,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for adult education programs authorized under this section. Except as otherwise provided under subsections (14) and (15), funds allocated under this section are restricted for adult education programs as authorized under this section only. A recipient of funds under this section shall not use those funds for any other purpose. (2) To be eligible for funding under this section, an eligible adult education provider shall employ certificated teachers and qualified administrative staff and shall offer continuing education opportunities for teachers to allow them to maintain certification. (3) To be eligible to be a participant funded under this section, an individual must be enrolled in an adult basic education program, an adult secondary education program, an adult English as a second language program, a high school equivalency test preparation program, or a high school completion program, that meets the requirements of this section, and for which instruction is provided, and the individual must be at least 18 years of age by July 1 of the program year and the individual's graduating class must have graduated. (4) By April 1 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this section, the intermediate districts within a prosperity region or subregion shall determine which intermediate district will serve as the prosperity region's or subregion's fiscal agent for the next fiscal year and shall notify the department in a form and manner determined by the department. The department shall approve or disapprove of the prosperity region's or subregion's selected fiscal agent. From the funds allocated under subsection (1), an amount as determined under this subsection is allocated to each intermediate district serving as a fiscal agent for adult education programs in each of the prosperity regions or subregions identified by the department. An intermediate district shall not use more than 5% of the funds allocated under this subsection for administration costs for serving as the fiscal agent. The allocation provided to each intermediate district serving as a fiscal agent must be calculated as follows: (a) Sixty percent of this portion of the funding must be distributed based upon the proportion of the state population of individuals between the ages of 18 and 24 that are not high school graduates that resides in each of the prosperity regions or subregions located within the intermediate district, as reported by the most recent 5-year estimates from the American Community Survey (ACS) from the United States Census Bureau. (b) Thirty-five percent of this portion of the funding must be distributed based upon the proportion of the state population of individuals age 25 or older who are not high school graduates that resides in each of the prosperity regions or subregions located within the intermediate district, as reported by the most recent 5-year estimates from the ACS from the United States Census Bureau. (c) Five percent of this portion of the funding must be distributed based upon the proportion of the state population of individuals age 18 or older who lack basic English language proficiency that resides in each of the prosperity regions or subregions located within the intermediate district, as reported by the most recent 5-year estimates from the ACS from the United States Census Bureau. (5) To be an eligible fiscal agent, an intermediate district must agree to do the following in a form and manner determined by the department: (a) Distribute funds to adult education programs in a prosperity region or subregion as described in this section. (b) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory council, which is an advisory council of the workforce development boards located in the prosperity region or subregion, or its successor, to develop a regional strategy that aligns adult education programs and services into an efficient and effective delivery system for adult education learners, with special consideration for providing contextualized learning and career pathways and addressing barriers to education and employment. (c) Collaborate with the career and educational advisory council, which is an advisory council of the workforce development boards located in the prosperity region or subregion, or its successor, to create a local process and criteria that will identify eligible adult education providers to receive funds allocated under this section based on location, demand for services, past performance, quality indicators as identified by the department, and cost to provide instructional services. The fiscal agent shall determine all local processes, criteria, and provider determinations. However, the local processes, criteria, and provider services must be approved by the department before funds may be distributed to the fiscal agent. (d) Provide oversight to its adult education providers throughout the program year to ensure compliance with the requirements of this section. (e) Report adult education program and participant data and information as prescribed by the department. (6) An adult basic education program, an adult secondary education program, or an adult English as a second language program operated on a year-round or school year basis may be funded under this section, subject to all of the following: (a) The program enrolls adults who are determined by a department-approved assessment, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, to be below twelfth grade level in reading or mathematics, or both, or to lack basic English proficiency. (b) The program tests individuals for eligibility under subdivision (a) before enrollment and upon completion of the program in compliance with the state-approved assessment policy. (c) A participant in an adult basic education program is eligible for reimbursement until 1 of the following occurs: (i) The participant's reading and mathematics proficiency are assessed at or above the ninth grade level. (ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive assessments after having completed at least 450 hours of instruction. (d) A participant in an adult secondary education program is eligible for reimbursement until 1 of the following occurs: (i) The participant's reading and mathematics proficiency are assessed above the twelfth grade level. (ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive assessments after having at least 450 hours of instruction. (e) A funding recipient enrolling a participant in an English as a second language program is eligible for funding according to subsection (9) until the participant meets 1 of the following: (i) The participant is assessed as having attained basic English proficiency as determined by a department-approved assessment. (ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive department-approved assessments after having completed at least 450 hours of instruction. The department shall provide information to a funding recipient regarding appropriate assessment instruments for this program. (7) A high school equivalency test preparation program operated on a year-round or school year basis may be funded under this section, subject to all of the following: (a) The program enrolls adults who do not have a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate. (b) The program administers a pre-test approved by the department before enrolling an individual to determine the individual's literacy levels, administers a high school equivalency practice test to determine the individual's potential for success on the high school equivalency test, and administers a post-test upon completion of the program in compliance with the state-approved assessment policy. (c) A funding recipient receives funding according to subsection (9) for a participant, and a participant may be enrolled in the program until 1 of the following occurs: (i) The participant achieves a high school equivalency certificate. (ii) The participant fails to show progress on 2 successive department-approved assessments used to determine readiness to take a high school equivalency test after having completed at least 450 hours of instruction. (8) A high school completion program operated on a year-round or school year basis may be funded under this section, subject to all of the following: (a) The program enrolls adults who do not have a high school diploma. (b) The program tests participants described in subdivision (a) before enrollment and upon completion of the program in compliance with the state-approved assessment policy. (c) A funding recipient receives funding according to subsection (9) for a participant in a course offered under this subsection until 1 of the following occurs: (i) The participant passes the course and earns a high school diploma. (ii) The participant fails to earn credit in 2 successive semesters or terms in which the participant is enrolled after having completed at least 900 hours of instruction. (9) The department shall make payments to a funding recipient under this section in accordance with all of the following: (a) Statewide allocation criteria, including 3-year average enrollments, census data, and local needs. (b) Participant completion of the adult basic education objectives by achieving an educational gain as determined by the national reporting system levels; for achieving basic English proficiency, as determined by the department; for achieving a high school equivalency certificate or passage of 1 or more individual high school equivalency tests; for attainment of a high school diploma or passage of a course required for a participant to attain a high school diploma; for enrollment in a postsecondary institution; or for entry into or retention of employment, as applicable. (c) Participant completion of core indicators as identified in the workforce innovation and opportunity act, Public Law 113-128. (d) Allowable expenditures. (10) An individual who is not eligible to be a participant funded under this section may receive adult education services upon the payment of tuition. In addition, an individual who is not eligible to be served in a program under this section due to the program limitations specified in subsection (6), (7), or (8) may continue to receive adult education services in that program upon the payment of tuition. The local or intermediate district conducting the program shall determine the tuition amount. (11) An individual who is an inmate in a state correctional facility is not counted as a participant under this section. (12) A funding recipient shall not commingle money received under this section or from another source for adult education purposes with any other funds and shall establish a separate ledger account for funds received under this section. This subsection does not prohibit a district from using general funds of the district to support an adult education or community education program. (13) A funding recipient receiving funds under this section may establish a sliding scale of tuition rates based upon a participant's family income. A funding recipient may charge a participant tuition to receive adult education services under this section from that sliding scale of tuition rates on a uniform basis. The amount of tuition charged per participant must not exceed the actual operating cost per participant minus any funds received under this section per participant. A funding recipient may not charge a participant tuition under this section if the participant's income is at or below 200% of the federal poverty guidelines published by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (14) To receive funds under this section, a funding recipient shall furnish to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department, all information needed to administer this program and meet federal reporting requirements; shall allow the department or the department's designee to review all records related to the program for which it receives funds; and shall reimburse the state for all disallowances found in the review, as determined by the department. In addition, a funding recipient shall agree to pay to a career and technical education program under section 61a the amount of funding received under this section in the proportion of career and technical education coursework used to satisfy adult basic education programming, as billed to the funding recipient by programs operating under section 61a. (15) From the amount appropriated in subsection (1), an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to approved adult education programs that connect adult education participants with employers as provided under this subsection. The department shall determine regional planning allocations under this subsection to each intermediate district serving as a fiscal agent for adult education programs in each of the prosperity regions or subregions identified by the department in the same proportion as funding calculated and allocated under subsection (4). Funds not fully utilized within a region may be transferred to other regions as appropriate. To be eligible for funding under this subsection, a program must provide a collaboration linking adult education programs within the county, state-approved career and technical education programs, and local employers. To receive funding under this subsection, an eligible program must satisfy all of the following: (a) Connect adult education participants directly with employers by linking adult education, career and technical skills, and workforce development. (b) Require adult education staff to work with Michigan Works! agency to identify a cohort of participants who are most prepared to successfully enter the workforce. Except as otherwise provided under this subdivision, participants identified under this subsection must be dually enrolled in adult education programming and in at least 1 state-approved technical course through a career and technical education program. A program that links participants identified under this subsection with adult education programming and commercial driver license courses does not need to enroll the participants in at least 1 state-approved technical course through a career and technical education program to be considered an eligible program under this subsection. (c) Employ an individual staffed as an adult education navigator who will serve as a caseworker for each participant identified under subdivision (b). The navigator shall work with adult education staff and potential employers to design an educational program best suited to the personal and employment needs of the participant and shall work with human service agencies or other entities to address any barrier in the way of participant access. (16) By not later than December 1 of each year, a program funded under subsection (15) shall provide a report to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on school aid, to the senate and house fiscal agencies, and to the state budget director identifying the number of participants, graduation rates, and a measure of transition to employment. (17) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, participants under subsection (15) must be concurrently enrolled and actively working toward obtaining a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate. Concurrent enrollment is not required under this subsection for a participant that was enrolled in adult education during the same program year and obtained a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate before enrollment in an eligible career and technical skills program under subsection (15). Up to 10% of adult education participants served under subsection (15) may already have a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate at the time of enrollment in an eligible career and technical skills program under subsection (15) and receive remediation services. It is intended that the cap described in the immediately preceding sentence is continually lowered on an annual basis until it eventually is 0%. (18) The department shall approve at least 2 high school equivalency tests and determine whether a high school equivalency certificate meets the requisite standards for high school equivalency in this state. (19) As used in this section: (a) "Career and educational advisory council" means an advisory council to the local workforce development boards located in a prosperity region consisting of educational, employer, labor, and parent representatives. (b) "Career pathway" means a combination of rigorous and high-quality education, training, and other services that comply with all of the following: (i) Aligns with the skill needs of industries in the economy of this state or in the regional economy involved. (ii) Prepares an individual to be successful in any of a full range of secondary or postsecondary education options, including apprenticeships registered under the act of August 16, 1937, commonly referred to as the national apprenticeship act, 29 USC 50 et seq. (iii) Includes counseling to support an individual in achieving the individual's education and career goals. (iv) Includes, as appropriate, education offered concurrently with and in the same context as workforce preparation activities and training for a specific occupation or occupational cluster. (v) Organizes education, training, and other services to meet the particular needs of an individual in a manner that accelerates the educational and career advancement of the individual to the extent practicable. (vi) Enables an individual to attain a secondary school diploma or its recognized equivalent, and at least 1 recognized postsecondary credential. (vii) Helps an individual enter or advance within a specific occupation or occupational cluster. (c) "Department" means the department of labor and economic opportunity. (d) "Eligible adult education provider" means a district, intermediate district, a consortium of districts, a consortium of intermediate districts, or a consortium of districts and intermediate districts that is identified as part of the local process described in subsection (5)(c) and approved by the department. Sec. 147. (1) The allocation for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for the public school employees' retirement system pursuant to the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, is made using the individual projected benefit entry age normal cost method of valuation and risk assumptions adopted by the public school employees retirement board and the department of technology, management, and budget. (2) The annual level percentage of payroll contribution rates for the 2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal year, as determined by the retirement system, are estimated as follows: (a) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit before July 1, 2010 and who are enrolled in the health premium subsidy, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 41.94% 44.93% with 31.36% 35.66% paid directly by the employer. (b) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit on or after July 1, 2010 and who are enrolled in the health premium subsidy, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 38.10% 40.19% with 27.52% 30.92% paid directly by the employer. (c) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit on or after July 1, 2010 and who participate in the personal healthcare fund, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 36.85% 36.36% with 26.27% 27.09% paid directly by the employer. (d) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit on or after September 4, 2012, who elect defined contribution, and who participate in the personal healthcare fund, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 31.54% 30.23% with 20.96% paid directly by the employer. (e) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit before July 1, 2010, who elect defined contribution, and who are enrolled in the health premium subsidy, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 32.79% 34.06% with 22.21% 24.79% paid directly by the employer. (f) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit before July 1, 2010, who elect defined contribution, and who participate in the personal healthcare fund, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 31.54% 30.23% with 20.96% paid directly by the employer. (g) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit before July 1, 2010 and who participate in the personal healthcare fund, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 40.69% 41.10% with 30.11% 31.83% paid directly by the employer. (h) For public school employees who first worked for a public school reporting unit after January 31, 2018 and who elect to become members of the MPSERS plan, the annual level percentage of payroll contribution rate is estimated at 37.74% 36.43% with 27.16% paid directly by the employer. (3) In addition to the employer payments described in subsection (2), the employer shall pay the applicable contributions to the Tier 2 plan, as determined by the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437. (4) The contribution rates in subsection (2) reflect an amortization period of 14 years for 2024-2025. The public school employees' retirement system board shall notify each district and intermediate district by February 28 of each fiscal year of the estimated contribution rate for the next fiscal year. Sec. 147a. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2023-2024 an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 and for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 for payments to participating districts. A participating district that receives money under this subsection shall use that money solely for the purpose of offsetting a portion of the retirement contributions owed by the district for the fiscal year in which it is received. The amount allocated to each participating district under this subsection is based on each participating district's percentage of the total statewide payroll for all participating districts for the immediately preceding fiscal year. As used in this subsection, "participating district" means a district that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. (2) In addition to the allocation under subsection (1), from the state school aid fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $384,642,000.00 for 2023-2024 and an amount not to exceed $365,100,000.00 for 2024-2025, and from the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $24,850,000.00 for 2023-2024 only, $336,200,000.00 for 2025-2026 for payments to participating districts and intermediate districts and from the general fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $108,000.00 for 2023-2024 and an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 for payments to participating district libraries. The amount allocated to each participating entity under this subsection is based on each participating entity's reported quarterly payroll for members that became tier 1 before February 1, 2018 for the current fiscal year. A participating entity that receives money under this subsection shall use that money solely for the purpose of offsetting a portion of the normal cost contribution rate. As used in this subsection: (a) "District library" means a district library established under the district library establishment act, 1989 PA 24, MCL 397.171 to 397.196. (b) "Participating entity" means a district, intermediate district, or district library that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. (3) In addition to the allocations under subsections (1) and (2), from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 only an amount not to exceed $11,939,000.00 for payments to participating intermediate districts and participating district libraries. A participating intermediate district or participating district library shall use that money solely for the purpose of offsetting a portion of the retirement contributions owed by the participating intermediate district or participating district library for the fiscal year in which it is received. The amount allocated to each participating intermediate district or participating district library under this subsection is calculated as follows: (a) For each participating intermediate district, $11,912,000.00 multiplied by each participating intermediate district's percentage of the total statewide payroll for all participating intermediate districts for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (b) For each participating district library, $27,000.00 multiplied by each participating district library's percentage of the total statewide payroll for all participating district libraries for the immediately preceding fiscal year. (c) As used in this subsection: (i) "Participating district library" means a district library that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. (ii) "Participating intermediate district" means an intermediate district that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. (4) In addition to the allocations under subsections (1), (2), and (3), from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 an amount not to exceed $598,000,000.00 for payments to participating entities. The amount allocated to each participating entity under this subsection is based on each participating entity's percentage of the total statewide payroll for all participating entities for the immediately preceding fiscal year. The amount allocated in this subsection represents an amount to effectively reduce each participating entity's unfunded actuarial accrued liability from 20.96% to an estimated 15.21% of covered payroll. It is the intent of the legislature that the allocation under this subsection be used to support student mental health, school safety, the educator workforce, and academic interventions. (a) As used in this subsection: (i) "District library" means a district library established under the district library establishment act, 1989 PA 24, MCL 397.171 to 397.196. (ii) "Participating entity" means a district, intermediate district, district library, or community college that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. Sec. 147b. (1) The MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund is created as a separate account within the state school aid fund. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund interest and earnings from the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund. (3) Money available in the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund must not be expended without a specific appropriation. (4) Money in the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund and does not lapse to the state school aid fund or to the general fund. The department of treasury is the administrator of the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund for auditing purposes. (5) For 2022-2023, $825,000,000.00 from the state school aid fund is deposited into the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund. It is the intent of the legislature that $425,000,000.00 of the funds deposited under this subsection for 2022-2023 are used to offset costs associated with accelerating the reduction of the payroll growth assumption for reporting units that are not university reporting units until that rate is zero by October 1, 2026.For 2025-2026, the full amount of the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund, estimated at $147,340,000.00, shall be deposited into the school aid fund. Sec. 147c. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $955,000,000.00 and from the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only an amount needed, estimated at $84,100,000.00 for payments to districts and intermediate districts that are participating entities of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system. $914,200,000.00 for payments to districts and intermediate districts that are participating entities of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system. In addition, from the general fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 an amount not to exceed $300,000.00 for payments to district libraries that are participating entities of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system. It is the intent of the legislature that money allocated from the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund under this subsection for 2024-2025 represents the amount necessary to reduce the payroll growth assumption to 0.25%. All of the following apply to funding under this subsection: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, for 2024-2025, 2025-2026, the amounts allocated under this subsection are estimated to provide an average MPSERS rate cap per pupil amount of $740.00 $800.00 and are estimated to provide a rate cap per pupil for districts ranging between $2.00 $4.00 and $2,650.00.$2,550.00. (b) Payments made under this subsection are equal to the difference between the unfunded actuarial accrued liability contribution rate as calculated under section 41 of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341, as calculated without taking into account the maximum employer rate of 20.96% included in section 41 of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341, and the maximum employer rate of 20.96% included in section 41 of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341. (c) The amount allocated to each participating entity under this subsection is based on each participating entity's proportion of the total covered payroll for the immediately preceding fiscal year for the same type of participating entities. A participating entity that receives funds under this subsection shall use the funds solely for the purpose of retirement contributions as specified in subdivision (d). (d) Each participating entity receiving funds under this subsection shall forward an amount equal to the amount allocated under subdivision (c) to the retirement system in a form, manner, and time frame determined by the retirement system. (e) Funds allocated under this subsection should be considered when comparing a district's growth in total state aid funding from 1 fiscal year to the next. (f) By not later than December 20 of each fiscal year for which funding is allocated under this subsection, the department shall publish and post on its website an estimated MPSERS rate cap per pupil for each district. (2) In addition to the funds allocated under subsection (1), from the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 only $250,000,000.00 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $641,500,000.00 for payments to participating entities of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system. The amount allocated to each participating entity under this subsection must be based on each participating entity's proportion of the total covered payroll for the immediately preceding fiscal year. A participating entity that receives funds under this subsection shall use the funds solely for purposes of this subsection. Each participating entity receiving funds under this subsection shall forward an amount equal to the amount allocated under this subsection to the retirement system in a form, manner, and time frame determined by the retirement system. The retirement system shall recognize funds received under this subsection as additional assets being contributed to the system and shall not categorize them as unfunded actuarial liability contributions or normal cost contributions. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Community college" means a community college created under the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.1 to 389.195. (b) "District library" means a district library established under the district library establishment act, 1989 PA 24, MCL 397.171 to 397.196. (c) "MPSERS rate cap per pupil" means an amount equal to the quotient of the district's payment under this section divided by the district's pupils in membership. (d) "Participating entity" means, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a district, intermediate district, or district library that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. As used in subsection (2) only, "participating entity" also means a community college that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. (e) "Retirement system" means the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437. Sec. 147e. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2023-2024 an amount not to exceed $64,400,000.00, and there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $104,700,000.00 $118,400,000.00 for payments to participating entities. (2) The payment to each participating entity under this section is the sum of the amounts under this subsection as follows: (a) An amount equal to the contributions made by a participating entity for the additional contribution made to a qualified participant's Tier 2 account in an amount equal to the contribution made by the qualified participant not to exceed 3% of the qualified participant's compensation as provided for under section 131(6) of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1431. (b) Beginning October 1, 2017, an amount equal to the contributions made by a participating entity for a qualified participant who is only a Tier 2 qualified participant under section 81d of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1381d, not to exceed 4%, and, beginning February 1, 2018, not to exceed 1%, of the qualified participant's compensation. (c) An amount equal to the increase in employer normal cost contributions under section 41b(2) of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341b, for a member that was hired after February 1, 2018 and chose to participate in Tier 1, compared to the employer normal cost contribution for a member under section 41b(1) of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1341b. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Member" means that term as defined under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437. (b) "Participating entity" means a district, intermediate district, or community college that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. (c) "Qualified participant" means that term as defined under section 124 of the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1424. Sec. 147h. (1) From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2025-2026 only $850,000,000.00 for payments to participating entities of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system. The amount allocated to each participating entity under this subsection must be based on each participating entity's proportion of the total covered payroll for the immediately preceding fiscal year. A participating entity that receives funds under this subsection shall use the funds solely for purposes of this subsection. Each participating entity receiving funds under this subsection shall forward an amount equal to the amount allocated under this subsection to the retirement system in a form, manner, and time frame determined by the retirement system. The retirement system shall recognize funds received under this subsection as additional assets being contributed to the system and shall not categorize them as unfunded actuarial liability contributions or normal cost contributions. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Community college" means a community college created under the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.1 to 389.195. (b) "District library" means a district library established under the district library establishment act, 1989 PA 24, MCL 397.171 to 397.196. (c) "Participating entity" means a district, intermediate district, community college, or district library that is a reporting unit of the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437, and that reports employees to the Michigan public school employees' retirement system for the applicable fiscal year. (d) "Retirement system" means the Michigan public school employees' retirement system under the public school employees retirement act of 1979, 1980 PA 300, MCL 38.1301 to 38.1437. Sec. 152a. (1) As required by the court in the consolidated cases known as Adair v State of Michigan, 486 Mich 468 (2010), from the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated for 2024-2025 2025-2026 an amount not to exceed $41,000,500.00 to be used solely for the purpose of paying necessary costs related to the state-mandated collection, maintenance, and reporting of data to this state. From this allocation, $3,000,000.00 is allocated for costs associated with collecting data necessary to provide reporting to tribal governments on the status of students affiliated with their particular tribe and data necessary to determine student participation in federal programs funded under 20 USC 7401 to 7546 and participation in federal programs funded under the Johnson-O'Malley Supplemental Indian Education Program Modernization Act, Public Law 115-404. (2) From the allocation in subsection (1), the department shall make payments to districts and intermediate districts in an equal amount per pupil based on the total number of pupils in membership in each district and intermediate district. The department shall not make any adjustment to these payments after the final installment payment under section 17b is made. Sec. 152b. (1) From the general fund money appropriated under section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for 2024-2025 2025-2026 to reimburse actual costs incurred by nonpublic schools in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement mandated by a law or administrative rule of this state. (2) By January 1 of each applicable fiscal year, the department shall publish a form for reporting actual costs incurred by a nonpublic school in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement mandated under state law containing each health, safety, or welfare requirement mandated by a law or administrative rule of this state applicable to a nonpublic school and with a reference to each relevant provision of law or administrative rule for the requirement. The form must be posted on the department's website in electronic form. (3) By June 30 of each applicable fiscal year, a nonpublic school seeking reimbursement for actual costs incurred in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement under a law or administrative rule of this state during each applicable school year must submit a completed form described in subsection (2) to the department. This section does not require a nonpublic school to submit a form described in subsection (2). A nonpublic school is not eligible for reimbursement under this section if the nonpublic school does not submit the form described in subsection (2) in a timely manner. (4) By August 15 of each applicable fiscal year, the department shall distribute funds to each nonpublic school that submits a completed form described under subsection (2) in a timely manner. The superintendent shall determine the amount of funds to be paid to each nonpublic school in an amount that does not exceed the nonpublic school's actual costs in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement under a law or administrative rule of this state. The superintendent shall calculate a nonpublic school's actual cost in accordance with this section. (5) If the funds allocated under this section are insufficient to fully fund payments as otherwise calculated under this section, the department shall distribute funds under this section on a prorated or other equitable basis as determined by the superintendent. (6) The department may review the records of a nonpublic school submitting a form described in subsection (2) only for the limited purpose of verifying the nonpublic school's compliance with this section. If a nonpublic school does not allow the department to review records under this subsection, the nonpublic school is not eligible for reimbursement under this section. (7) The funds appropriated under this section are for purposes that are incidental to teaching and the provision of educational services to nonpublic school students; that are noninstructional in nature; that do not constitute a primary function or element necessary for a nonpublic school's existence, operation, and survival; that do not involve or result in excessive religious entanglement; and that are intended for the public purpose of ensuring the health, safety, and welfare of the children in nonpublic schools and to reimburse nonpublic schools for costs described in this section. (8) Funds allocated under this section are not intended to aid or maintain any nonpublic school, support the attendance of any student at a nonpublic school, employ any person at a nonpublic school, support the attendance of any student at any location where instruction is offered to a nonpublic school student, or support the employment of any person at any location where instruction is offered to a nonpublic school student. (9) For purposes of this section, "actual cost" means the hourly wage for the employee or employees performing a task or tasks required to comply with a health, safety, or welfare requirement under a law or administrative rule of this state identified by the department under subsection (2) and is to be calculated in accordance with the form published by the department under subsection (2), which must include a detailed itemization of costs. The nonpublic school shall not charge more than the hourly wage of its lowest-paid employee capable of performing a specific task regardless of whether that individual is available and regardless of who actually performs a specific task. Labor costs under this subsection must be estimated and charged in increments of 15 minutes or more, with all partial time increments rounded down. When calculating costs under subsection (4), fee components must be itemized in a manner that expresses both the hourly wage and the number of hours charged. The nonpublic school may not charge any applicable labor charge amount to cover or partially cover the cost of health or fringe benefits. A nonpublic school shall not charge any overtime wages in the calculation of labor costs. (10) Training fees, inspection fees, and criminal background check fees are considered actual costs in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement under a law or administrative rule of this state. (11) The funds allocated under this section for 2024-2025 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2024-2025 are carried forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the work project is to continue to reimburse nonpublic schools for actual costs incurred in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement mandated by a law or administrative rule of this state. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2026. (12) The funds allocated under this section for 2025-2026 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2025-2026 are carried forward into 2026-2027. The purpose of the work project is to continue to reimburse nonpublic schools for actual costs incurred in complying with a health, safety, or welfare requirement mandated by a law or administrative rule of this state. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2027. (13) (12) The department shall reimburse nonpublic schools for actual costs incurred in complying with health, safety, or welfare requirements under a law or administrative rule of this state from 2017-2018 through 2022-2023 using work project funds or, if those funds are insufficient to fund reimbursements under this subsection, from the allocation under subsection (1). Sec. 166. (1) The governing board of a district or intermediate district shall adopt and implement a disciplinary policy as described in subsection (2) to provide penalties for violations of section 1507 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1507, and penalties for a school official, member of a governing board, employee of the district or intermediate district, or other individual who refers a pupil for an abortion or assists a pupil in obtaining an abortion. (2) A disciplinary policy required under subsection (1) shall provide for a financial penalty to be applied against an individual employed by the district or intermediate district who violates the policy under subsection (1) that is equivalent to not less than 3% of that individual's annual compensation. (3) A district or intermediate district that applies a financial penalty against or collects a fine from an individual as provided under subsection (2) shall refund to the state school aid fund an amount of money equal to the amount of the penalty or fine. Enacting section 1. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending on school aid under article I of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1772, as amended by 2024 PA 120, 2024 PA 148, and by this amendatory act, from state sources for fiscal year 2024-2025 is estimated at $18,416,881,900.00 and state appropriations for school aid to be paid to local units of government for fiscal year 2024-2025 are estimated at $16,919,043,900.00. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending on school aid under article I of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1601 to 388.1772, as amended by this amendatory act, from state sources for fiscal year 2025-2026 is estimated at $19,100,886,100.00 and state appropriations for school aid to be paid to local units of government for fiscal year 2025-2026 are estimated at $17,675,092,000.00.